TO
W. B. SHUBRICK, ESQUIRE,
U. S. NAVY.
In
submitting this hastily-composed and
imperfect
picture of a few scenes, peculiar to the
profession, to your notice, dear
Shubrick
, I
trust much more to your kind feelings than to
any merit in the execution. Such as it may
be, however, the book is offered as another
tribute to the constant esteem and friendship of
THE AUTHOR.A 2
THE
RED ROVER,
A TALE. VOL. I.
CHAPTER I.
Par
. Mars dote on you for his novices.
All's Well that ends Well
.
No one, who is familiar with the bustle and
activity
of an American commercial town, would
recognize
,
in the repose which now reigns in the ancient
mart of Rhode Island, a place that, in its day, has
been ranked amongst the most important ports along
the whole line of our extended coast. It would
seem, at the first glance, that nature had expressly
fashioned the spot to anticipate the wants and to
realize the wishes of the mariner. Enjoying the
four great requisites of a safe and commodious haven,
a placed basin, an outer harbour, and a convenient
roadstead, with a clear offing, Newport appeared,
to the eyes of our European ancestors, designed to
shelter fleets and to nurse a race of hardy and
expert
seamen. Though the latter anticipation has
not been entirely disappointed, how little has reality
answered to expectation in respect to the former!
A successful rival has arisen, even in the immediate
vicinity of this seeming favourite of nature, to defeat
all the calculations of mercantile sagacity, and to
add another to the thousand existing evidences that
the wisdom of man is foolishness.
There are few towns of any magnitude, within
our broad territories, in which so little change has
been effected in half a century as in Newport.
Until
the vast resources of the interior were developed,
the beautiful island on which it stands was a chosen
retreat of the affluent planters of the south, from the
heats and diseases of their burning climate. Here
they resorted in crowds, to breathe the invigorating
breezes of the sea. Subjects of the same
government
,
the inhabitants of the Carolinas and of
Jamaica
met here, in amity, to compare their respective
habits and policies, and to strengthen each other in
a common delusion, which the descendants of both,
in the third generation, are beginning to perceive
and to regret.
The communion left, on the simple and
unpractised
offspring of the Puritans, its impression both
of good and evil. The inhabitants of the country,
while they derived, from the intercourse, a portion
of that bland and graceful courtesy for which the
gentry of the southern British colonies were so
distinguished
,
did not fail to imbibe some of those
peculiar
notions, concerning the distinctions in the
races of men, for which they are no less
remarkable
.
Rhode Island was the foremost among the
New-England
provinces to recede from the manners and
opinions of their simple ancestors. The first shock
was given, through her, to that rigid and ungracious
deportment which was once believed a necessary
concomitant of true religion, a sort of outward
pledge of the healthful condition of the inward man;
and it was also through her that the first palpable
departure was made from those purifying principles
which might serve as an apology for even far more
repulsive exteriors. By a singular combination of
circumstances and qualities, which is, however, no
less true than perplexing, the merchants of Newport
were becoming, at the same time, both slave-dealers
and gentlemen.
Whatever might have been the moral condition
of its proprietors at the precise period of 1759, the
island itself was never more enticing and lovely. Its
swelling crests were still crowned with the wood of
centuries; its little vales were then covered with the
living verdure of the north; and its unpretending,
but neat and comfortable villas lay sheltered in
groves, and embedded in flowers. The beauty and
fertility of the place gained for it a name which,
probably, expressed far more than was, at that early
day, properly understood. The inhabitants of the
country styled their possessions the Garden of
America. Neither were their guests, from the
scorching plains of the south, reluctant to concede
so imposing a title to distinction. The appellation
descended even to our own time; nor was it
entirely
abandoned, until the traveller had the means of
contemplating the thousand broad and lovely vallies
which, fifty years ago, lay buried in the dense
shadows
of the forest.
The date we have just named was a period fraught
with the deepest interest to the British possessions
on this Continent. A bloody and vindictive war,
which had been commenced in defeat and disgrace,
was about to end in triumph. France was deprived
of the last of her possessions on the main, while the
immense region which lay between the bay of
Hudson
and the territories of Spain submitted to the
power of England. The colonists had shared largely
in contributing to the success of the mother country.
Losses and contumely, that had been incurred by
the besotting prejudices of European commanders,
were beginning to be forgotten in the pride of
success
.
The blunders of Braddock, the indolence of
Loudon, and the impotency of Abercrombie, were
repaired by the vigour of Amherst, and the genius
of Wolfe. In every quarter of the globe the arms
of Britain were triumphant. The loyal provincials
were among the loudest in their exultations and
rejoicings
;
wilfully shutting their eyes to the scanty
meed of applause that a powerful people ever
reluctantly
bestows on its dependants, as though love
of glory, like avarice, increases by its means of
indulgence
.
The system of oppression and misrule, which
hastened a separation that sooner or later must have
occurred, had not yet commenced. The mother
country, if not just, was still complaisant. Like
all old and great nations, she was indulging in the
pleasing, but dangerous, enjoyment of
self-contemplation
.
The qualities and services of a race, who
were believed to be inferior, were, however, soon
forgotten; or, if remembered, it was in order to be
misrepresented and vituperated. As this feeling
increased
with the discontent of the civil dissensions,
it led to still more striking injustice, and greater folly.
Men who, from their observations, should have
known better, were not ashamed to proclaim, even
in the highest council of the nation, their ignorance
of the character of a people with whom they had
mingled their blood. Self-esteem gave value to the
opinions of fools. It was under this soothing
infatuation
that veterans were heard to disgrace their
noble
profession, by boastings that should have been
hushed in the mouth of a soldier of the carpet; it
was under this infatuation that Burgoyne gave, in
the Commons of England, that memorable promise
of marching from Quebec to Boston, with a force he
saw fit to namea pledge that he afterwards
redeemed
,
by going over the same ground, with twice
the number of followers, as captives; and it was
under this infatuation that England subsequently
threw away her hundred thousand lives, and lavished
her hundred millions of treasure.
The history of that memorable struggle is familiar
to every American. Content with the knowledge
that his country triumphed, he is willing to let the
glorious result take its proper place in the pages of
history. He sees that her empire rests on a broad
and natural foundation, which needs no support from
venal pens; and, happily for his peace of mind, no
less than for his character, he feels that the
prosperity
of the Republic is not to be sought in the
degradation
of surrounding nations.
Our present purpose leads us back to the period
of calm which preceded the storm of the
Revolution
.
In the early days of the month of October
1759, Newport, like every other town in America,
was filled with the mingled sentiment of grief and
joy. The inhabitants mourned the fall of Wolfe,
while they triumphed in his victory. Quebec, the
strong-hold of the Canadas, and the last place of any
importance held by a people whom they had been
educated to believe were their natural enemies, had
just changed its masters. That loyalty to the Crown
of England, which endured so much before the
strange principle became extinct, was then at its
height; and probably the colonist was not to be found
who did not, in some measure, identify his own
honour
with the fancied glory of the head of the house
of Brunswick. The day on which the action of our
tale commences had been expressly set apart to
manifest
the sympathy of the good people of the town,
and its vicinity, in the success of the royal arms. It
had opened, as thousands of days have opened since,
with the ringing of hells and the firing of cannon;
and the population had, at an early hour, poured into
the streets of the place, with that determined zeal,
in the cause of merriment, which ordinarily makes
preconcerted joy so dull an amusement. The
chosen
orator of the day had exhibited his eloquence,
in a sort of prosaic monody in praise of the dead
hero, and had sufficiently manifested his loyalty, by
laying the glory, not only of that sacrifice, but all
that had been reaped by so many thousands of his
brave companions also, most humbly at the foot of
the throne.
Content with these demonstrations of their
allegiance
,
the inhabitants began to retire to their
dwellings
,
as the sun settled towards those immense
regions
which then lay an endless and unexplored
wilderness
,
but which now are teeming with the fruits
and enjoyments of civilized life. The countrymen
from the environs, and even from the adjoining main,
were beginning to turn their faces towards their
distant
homes, with that frugal care which still
distinguishes
the inhabitants of the country even in the
midst of their greatest abandonment to pleasures, in
order that the approaching evening might not lead
them into expenditures which were not deemed
germain
to the proper feelings of the occasion. In short,
the excess of the hour was past, and each individual
was returning into the sober channels of his
ordinary
avocations, with an earnestness and discretion
which proved he was not altogether unmindful of
the time that had been squandered in the display of
a spirit that he already appeared half disposed to
consider a little supererogatory.
The sounds of the hammer, the axe, and the saw
were again heard in the place; the windows of more
than one shop were half opened, as if its owner had
made a sort of compromise between his interests
and his conscience; and the masters of the only
three inns in the town were to be seen standing
before
their doors, regarding the retiring countrymen
with eyes that plainly betrayed they were seeking
customers among a people who were always much
more ready to sell than to buy. A few noisy and
thoughtless seamen, belonging to the vessels in the
haven, together with some half dozen notorious
tavern
-hunters
were, however, the sole fruits of all
their nods of recognition, inquiries into the welfare
of wives and children, and, in some instances, of
open invitations to alight and drink.
Worldly care, with a constant, though sometimes
an oblique, look at the future state, formed the great
characteristic of all that people who then dwelt in
what were called the provinces of New-England.
The business of the day, however, was not
forgotten
,
though it was deemed unnecessary to digest its
proceedings in idleness, or over the bottle. The
travellers along the different roads that led into the
interior of the island formed themselves into little
knots, in which the policy of the great national events
they had just been commemorating, and the manner
they had been treated by the different individuals
selected to take the lead in the offices of the day,
were freely handled, though still with great
deference
to the established reputations of the
distinguished
parties most concerned. It was every where
conceded
,
that the prayers, which had been in truth a
little conversational and historical, were faultless
and searching exercises; and, on the whole, (though
to this opinion there were some clients of an
advocate
adverse to the orator, who were moderate
dissenters
)
it was established, that a more eloquent
oration
had never issued from the mouth of man, than
had that day been delivered in their presence.
Precisely
in the same temper was the subject discussed
by the workmen on a ship, which was then building
in the harbour, and which, in the same spirit of
provincial
admiration that has since immortalized so
many edifices, bridges, and even individuals, within
their several precincts, was confidently affirmed to
be the rarest specimen then extant of the nice
proportions
of naval architecture!
Of the orator himself it may be necessary to say
a word, in order that so remarkable an intellectual
prodigy should fill his proper place in our frail and
short-lived catalogue of the worthies of that day.
He was the usual oracle of his neighbourhood, when
a condensation of its ideas on any great event, like
the one just mentioned, became necessary. His
learning was justly computed, by comparison, to be
of the most profound and erudite character; and it
was very truly affirmed to have astonished more than
one European scholar, who had been tempted, by a
fame which, like heat, was only the more intense
from its being so confined, to grapple with him on
the arena of ancient literature. He was a man who
knew how to improve these high gifts to his
exclusive
advantage. In but one instance had he ever
been thrown enough off his guard to commit an act
that had a tendency to depress the reputation he had
gained in this manner; and that was, in permitting
one of his laboured flights of eloquence to be
printed
;
or, as his more witty though less successful
rival
,
the only other lawyer in the place, expressed it,
in suffering one of his
fugitive
essays to be
caught
.
But even this experiment, whatever might have been
its effects abroad, served to confirm his renown at
home. He now stood before his admirers in all the
dignity of types; and it was in vain for that
miserable
tribe of animalcul, who live by feeding on
the body of genius, to attempt to undermine a
reputation
that was embalmed in the faith of so many
parishes. The brochure was diligently scattered
through the provinces, lauded around the tea-pot,
openly extolled in the printsby some kindred
spirit, as was manifest in the striking similarity of
styleand by one believer, more zealous or perhaps
more interested than the rest, actually put on board
the next ship which sailed for home, as England
was then affectionately termed, enclosed in an
envelope
which bore an address no less imposing than
the Majesty of Britian. Its effect on the
straight-going
mind of the dogmatic German, who then
filled
the throne of the Conqueror, was never known,
though they, who were in the secret of the
transmission
,
Vol. I. B
long looked, in vain, for the signal reward
that was to follow so striking an exhibition of human
intellect.
Notwithstanding these high and beneficent gifts,
their possessor was now as unconsciously engaged in
that portion of his professional labours which bore
the strongest resemblance to the occupation of a
scrivener
,
as though nature, in bestowing such rare
endowments
,
had denied him the phrenological quality
of self-esteem. A critical observer might, however,
have seen, or fancied that he saw, in the forced
humility
of his countenance, certain gleamings of a
triumph
that should not properly be traced to the fall
of Quebec. The habit of appearing meek had,
however, united with a frugal regard for the precious
and irreclaimable minutes, in producing this
extraordinary
diligence in a pursuit of a character that was
so humble, when compared with his recent mental
efforts.
Leaving this gifted favourite of fortune and nature,
we shall pass to an entirely different individual, and
to another quarter of the place. The spot, to which
we wish now to transport the reader, was neither
more nor less than the shop of a tailor, who did not
disdain to perform the most minute offices of his
vocation
,
in his own heedful person. The humble
edifice
stood at no great distance from the water, in the
skirts of the town, and in such a situation as to
enable
its occupant to look out upon the loveliness of
the inner basin, and, through a vista cut by the
element between islands, even upon the lake-like
scenery of the outer harbour. A small, though little
frequented wharf lay before his door, while a certain
air of negligence, and the absence of bustle,
sufficiently
manifested that the place itself was not the
immediate site of the much-boasted commercial
prosperity of the port.
The afternoon was like a morning in spring, the
breeze which occasionally rippled the basin
possessing
that peculiarly bland influence which is so often
felt in the American autumn; and the worthy
mechanic
laboured at his calling, seated on his
shop-board
,
at an open window, far better satisfied with
himself than many of those whose fortune it is to be
placed in state, beneath canopies of velvet and gold.
On the outer side of the little building, a tall,
awkward
,
but vigorous and well-formed countryman was
lounging, with one shoulder placed against the side
of the shop, as if his legs found the task of
supporting
his heavy frame too grievous to be endured
without
assistance, seemingly in waiting for the
completion
of the garment at which the other toiled, and
with which he intended to adorn the graces of his
person, in an adjoining parish, on the succeeding
sabbath.
In order to render the minutes shorter, and,
possibly
,
in indulgence to a powerful propensity to talk,
of which he who wielded the needle was somewhat
the subject, but few of the passing moments were
suffered to escape without a word from one or the
other of the parties. As the subject of their
discourse
had a direct reference to the principal matter
of our tale, we shall take leave to give such portions
of it to the reader as we deem most relevant to a
clear exposition of that which is to follow. The
latter will always bear in mind, that he who worked
was a man drawing into the wane of life; that he
bore about him the appearance of one who, either
from incompetency or from some fatality of fortune,
had been doomed to struggle through the world,
keeping poverty from his residence only by the aid
of great industry and rigid frugality; and that the
idler was a youth of an age and condition that the
acquisition of an entire set of habiliments formed to
him a sort of era in his adventures.
Yes, exclaimed the indefatigable shaper of
cloth, with a species of sigh which might have been
equally construed into an evidence of the fulness of
his mental enjoyment, or of the excess of his bodily
labours; yes, smarter sayings have seldom fallen
from the lips of man, than such as the squire pour'd
out this very day. When he spoke of the plains of
father Abraham, and of the smoke and thunder of
the battle, Pardon, it stirred up such stomachy
feelings
in my bosom, that I verily believe I could have
had the heart to throw aside the thimble, and go
forth myself, to seek glory in battling in the cause of
the King.
The youth, whose Christian or `given' name, as it
is even now generally termed in New-England, had
been intended, by his pious sponsors, humbly to
express
his future hopes, turned his head towards the
heroic tailor, with an expression of drollery about
the eye, that proved nature had not been niggardly
in the gift of humour, however the quality was
suppressed
by the restraints of a very peculiar manner,
and no less peculiar education.
There's an opening now, neighbour Homespun,
for an ambitious man, he said, sin' his Majesty has
lost his stoutest general.
Yes, yes, returned the individual who, either
in his youth or in his age, had made so capital a
blunder in the choice of a profession, a fine and
promising chance it is for one who counts but
five-and-twenty
;
most of my day has gone by, and I
must spend the rest of it here, where you see me,
between buckram and osnaburghswho put the dye
into your cloth, Pardy? it is the best laid-in bark
l've fingered this fall.
Let the old woman alone for giving the lasting
colour to her web; I'll engage, neighbour
Home-spun
,
provided you furnish the proper fit, there'll
not be a better dress'd lad on the island than my own
mother's son! But, sin' you cannot be a general,
good-man, you'll have the comfort of knowing
there'll be no more fighting without you. Every
body agrees the French won't hold out much longer,
and then we must have a peace for want of enemies.
So best, so best, boy; for one, who has seen so
much of the horrors of war as I, knows how to put
a rational value on the blessings of tranquillity!
Then you ar'n't altogether unacquainted,
good-man
,
with the new trade you thought of setting up?
I! I have been through five long and bloody
wars, and I've reason to thank God that I've gone
through them all without a scratch so big as this
needle would make. Five long and bloody, ay, and
I may say glorious wars, have I liv'd through in
safety!
A perilous time it must have been for you,
neighbour
.
But I don't remember to have heard of more
than two quarrels with the Frenchmen in my day.
You are but a boy, compared to one who has
seen the end of his third score of years. Here is
this war that is now so likely to be soon ended
Heaven, which rules all things in wisdom, be praised
for the same! Then there was the business of '45,
when the bold Warren sailed up and down our
coasts; a scourge to his Majesty's enemies, and a
safeguard to all the loyal subjects. Then, there was
a business in Garmany, concerning which we had
awful accounts of battles fou't, in which men were
mowed down like grass falling before the scythe of a
strong arm. That makes three. The fourth was
the rebellion of '15, of which I pretend not to have
seen much, being but a youth at the time; and the
fifth was a dreadful rumour, that was spread through
the provinces, of a general rising among the blacks
and Indians, which was to sweep all us Christians
into eternity at a minute's warning!
Well, I had always reckoned you for a
home-staying
and a peaceable man, neighbour; returned
B 2
the admiring countryman; nor did I ever dream
that you had seen such serious movings.
I have not boasted, Pardon, or I might have
added
other heavy matters to the list. There was a
great struggle in the East, no longer than the year
'32, for the Persian throne. You have read of the
laws of the Medes and the Persians: Well, for the very
throne that gave forth those unalterable laws was
there a frightful struggle, in which blood ran like
water; but, as it was not in Christendom, I do not
account it among my own experiences; though I
might have spoken of the Porteous mob with great
reason, as it took place in another portion of the
very kingdom in which I lived.
You must have journeyed much, and been
stirring
late and early, good-man, to have seen all these
things, and to have got no harm.
Yes, yes, I've been something of a traveller too,
Pardy. Twice have I been over land to Boston,
and once have I sailed through the Great Sound of
Long Island, down to the town of York. It is an
awful undertaking the latter, as it respects the
distance
,
and more especially because it is needful to
pass a place that is likened, by its name, to the
entrance
of Tophet.
I have often heard the spot call'd `Hell Gate'
spoken of, and I may say, too, that I know a man
well
who has been through it twice; once in going to
York, and once in coming homeward.
He had enough of it, as I'll engage! Did he tell
you of the pot which tosses and roars as if the
biggest
of Beelzebub's fires was burning beneath, and
of the hog's-back over which the water pitches, as
it may tumble over the Great Falls of the West!
Owing to reasonable skill in our seamen, and
uncommon
resolution in the passengers, we happily
made a good time of it, through ourselves; though,
I care not who knows it, I will own it is a severe trial
to the courage to enter that same dreadful Strait.
We cast out our anchors at certain islands, which
lie a few furlongs this side the place, and sent the
pinnace, with the captain and two stout seamen, to
reconnoitre the spot, in order to see if it were in a
peaceful state or not. The report being favourable,
the passengers were landed, and the vessel was got
through, by the blessing of Heaven, in safety. We
had all reason to rejoice that the prayers of the
congregation
were asked before we departed from the
peace and security of our homes!
You journeyed round the `Gate' on foot?
demanded
the attentive boor.
Certain! It would have been a sinful and a
blasphemous
tempting of Providence to have done
otherwise
,
seeing that our duty called us to no such
sacrifice
.
But all that danger is gone by, and so I trust
will that of this bloody war, in which we have both
been actors; and then I humbly hope his sacred
Majesty will have leisure to turn his royal mind to
the pirates who infest the coast, and to order some
of his stout naval captains to mete out to the rouges
the treatment they are so fond of giving unto others.
It would be a joyful sight to my old eyes to see the
famous and long-hunted Red Rover brought into this
very port, towing at the poop of a King's cruiser.
And is it a desperate villain, he of whom you
now make mention?
He! There are many he's in that one lawless
ship, and bloody-minded and nefarious thieves are
they, to the smallest boy. It is heart-searching and
grievous, Pardy, to hear of their evil-doings on the
high seas of the King!
I have often heard mention made of the Rover,
returned the countryman; but never to enter into
any of the intricate particulars of his knavery.
How should you, boy, who live up in the country,
know so much of what is passing on the great deep,
as we who dwell in a port that is so much resorted
to by mariners! I am fearful you'll be making it
late home, Pardon, he added, glancing his eye at
certain lines drawn on his shop-board, by the aid of
which he was enabled to note the progress of the
setting sun. It is drawing towards the hour of five,
and you have twice that number of miles to go,
before
you can, by any manner of means, reach the
nearest boundary of your father's farm.
The road is plain, and the people honest,
returned
the countryman, who cared not if it were
midnight, provided he could be the bearer of tidings
of some dreadful sea robbery to the ears of those
whom he well knew would throng around him, at
his return, to hear the tidings from the port. And
is he, in truth, so much feared and sought for, as
people say?
Is he sought for! Is Tophet sought by a praying
Christian? Few there are on the mighty deep, let
them even be as stout for battle as was Joshua the
great Jewish captain, that would not rather behold
the land than see the top-gallants of that wicked
pirate! Men fight for glory, Pardon, as I may say I
have seen, after living through so many wars, but
none love to meet an enemy who hoists a bloody flag
at the first blow, and who is ready to cast both
parties
into the air, when he finds the hand of Satan has
no longer power to help him.
If the rogue is so desperate, returned the youth,
straightening his powerful limbs, with a look of rising
pride, why do not the Island and the Plantations
fit out a coaster in order to bring him in, that he
might get a sight of a wholesome gibbet? Let the
drum beat on such a message through our
neighbourhood
,
and I'll engage that it don't leave it without
one volunteer at least.
So much for not having seen war! Of what use
would flails and pitch-forks prove against men who
have sold themselves to the devil? Often has the
Rover been seen at night, or just as the sun has been
going down, by the King's cruisers, who, having
fairly surrounded the thieves, had good reason to
believe
that they had them already in the bilboes; but,
when the morning has come, the prize was vanished,
by fair means or by foul!
And are the villains so bloody-minded that they
are called `Red?'
Such is the title of their leader, returned the
worthy tailor, who by this time was swelling with
the importance of possessing so interesting a legend
to communicate; and such is also the name they
give to his vessel; because no man, who has put
foot on board her, has ever come back to say that
she has a better or a worse; that is, no honest
mariner
or lucky voyager. The ship is of the size of a
King's sloop, they say, and of like equipments and
form; but she has miraculously escaped from the
hands of many a gallant frigate; and once, it is
whispered
,
for no loyal subject would like to say such a
scandalous thing openly, Pardon, that she lay under
the guns of a fifty for an hour, and seemingly, to all
eyes, she sunk like hammered lead to the bottom.
But, just as every body was shaking hands, and
wishing
his neighbour joy at so happy a punishment
coming
over the knaves, a West-Indiaman came into
port, that had been robbed by the Rover on the
morning after the night in which it was thought they
had all gone into eternity together. And what makes
the matter worse, boy, while the King's ship was
careening with her keel out, to stop the holes of
cannon
balls, the pirate was sailing up and down the
coast, as sound as the day that the wrights first
turned
her from their hands!
Well, this is unheard of! returned the
countryman
,
on whom the tale was beginning to make a
sensible impression: Is she a well-turned and
comely
ship to the eye? or is it by any means certain that
she is an actual living vessel at all?
Opinions differ. Some say, yes; some say, no.
But I am well acquainted with a man who travelled
a week in company with a mariner, who passed
within
a hundred feet of her, in a gale of wind. Lucky
it was for them, that the hand of the Lord was felt
so powerfully on the deep, and that the Rover had
enough to do to keep his own ship from foundering.
The acquaintance of my friend had a good view of
both vessel and captain, therefore, in perfect safety.
He said, that the pirate was a man may-be half as
big again as the tall preacher over on the main, with
hair of the colour of the sun in a fog, and eyes that
no man would like to look upon a second time. He
saw him as plainly as I see you; for the knave stood
in the rigging of his ship, beckoning, with a hand as
big as a coat-flap, for the honest trader to keep off,
in order that the two vessels might not do one
another
damage by coming foul.
He was a bold mariner, that trader, to go so nigh
such a merciless rogue.
I warrant you, Pardon, it was desperately against
his will! But it was on a night so dark
Dark! interrupted the other; by what
contrivance
then did he manage to see so well?
No man can say! answered the tailor, but see
he did, just in the manner, and the very things I have
named to you. More than that, he took good note
of the vessel, that he might know her, if chance, or
Providence, should ever happen to throw her again
into his way. She was a long, black ship, lying low
in the water, like a snake in the grass, with a
desperate
wicked look, and altogether of dishonest
dimensions
.
Then, every body says that she appears
to sail faster than the clouds above, seeming to care
little which way the wind blows, and that no one is
a jot safer from her speed than her honesty.
According
to all that I have heard, she is something
such a craft as yonder slaver, that has been lying the
week past, the Lord knows why, in our outer
harbour
.
As the gossipping tailor had necessarily lost many
precious moments, in relating the preceding history,
he now set about redeeming them with the utmost
diligence, keeping time to the rapid movement of his
needle-hand, by corresponding jerks of his head and
shoulders. In the meanwhile, the bumpkin, whose
wondering mind was by this time charged nearly to
bursting with what he had heard, turned his look
towards the vessel the other had pointed out, in
order to get the only image that was now required,
to enable him to do fitting credit to so moving a tale,
suitably engraved on his imagination. There was
necessarily a pause, while the respective parties
were thus severally occupied. It was suddenly
broken by the tailor, who clipped the thread with
which he had just finished the garment, cast every
thing from his hands, threw his spectacles upon his
forehead, and, leaning his arms on his kness in
such a manner as to form a perfect labyrinth with
the limbs, he stretched his body forward so far as to
lean out of the window, riveting his eyes also on the
ship, which still attracted the gaze of his companion.
Do you know, Pardy, he said, that strange
thoughts and cruel misgivings have come over me
concerning that very vessel? They say she is a
slaver come in for wood and water, and there she
has been a week, and not a stick bigger than an oar
has gone up her side, and I'll engage that ten drops
from Jamaica have gone on board her, to one from
the spring. Then you may see she is anchored in
such a way that but one of the guns from the
battery
can touch her; whereas, had she been a real
timid trader, she would naturally have got into a
place where, if a straggling picaroon should come
into the port, he would have found her in the very
hottest of the fire.
You have an ingenious turn with you,
good-man
,
returned the wondering countryman; now,
a ship might have lain on the battery island itself,
and I would have hardly noticed the thing.
'Tis use and experience, Pardon, that makes
men of us all. I should know something of batteries,
having seen so many wars, and I served a campaign
of a week, in that very fort, when the rumour came
that the French were sending cruisers from
Louisburg
down the coast. For that matter, my duty was
to stand sentinel over that very cannon; and, if I
have done the thing once, I have twenty times
squinted along the piece, to see in what quarter it
would send its shot, provided such a calamity should
arrive as that it might become necessary to fire it,
loaded with real warlike balls.
And who are these? demanded Pardon, with
that species of sluggish curiosity which had been
awakened by the wonders related by the other:
Are these mariners of the slaver, or are they idle
Newporters?
Them! exclaimed the tailor; sure enough,
they are new-comers, and it may be well to have a
closer look at them in these troublesome times! Here,
Nab, take the garment, and press down the seams,
you idle hussy; for neighbour Hopkins is straitened
for time, while your tongue is going like a young
lawyer's in a justice court. Don't be sparing of your
elbow, girl; for it's no India muslin that you'll have
under the iron, but cloth that would do to side a
house with. Ah! your mother's loom, Pardy, robs
the seamster of many an honest job.
Having thus transferred the remainder of the job
from his own hands to those of an awkward, pouting
girl, who was compelled to abandon her gossip with
a neighbour, in order to obey his injunctions, he
quickly removed his own person, notwithstanding
a miserable limp with which he had come into the
world, from the shop-board to the open air. As
more important characters are, however, about to be
introduced to the reader, we shall defer the
ceremony
to the opening of another chapter.
CHAPTER II.
Sir Toby
. Excellent! I smell a device.
Twelfth Night
.
The
strangers were three in number; for
strangers
the good-man Homespun, who knew not only
the names but most of the private history of every
man and woman within ten miles of his own
residence
,
immediately proclaimed them to be, in a
whisper to his companion; and strangers, too, of a
mysterious and threatening aspect. In order that
others may have an opportunity of judging of the
probability of the latter conjecture, it becomes
necessary
that a more minute account should be given
of the respective appearances of these individuals,
who, unhappily for their reputations, had the
misfortune
to be unknown to the gossipping tailor of
Newport.
The one, by far the most imposing in his general
mien, was a youth who had apparently seen some
six or seven-and-twenty seasons. That those
seasons
had not been entirely made of sunny days, and
nights of repose, was betrayed by the tinges of brown
which had been laid on his features, layer after
layer
,
in such constant succession, as to have changed,
to a deep olive, a complexion which had once been
fair, and through which the rich blood was still
mantling
with the finest glow of vigorous health. His
features were rather noble and manly, than
distinguished
Vol. I. C
for their exactness and symmetry; his nose
being far more bold and prominent than regular in
its form, with his brows projecting, and sufficiently
marked to give to the whole of the superior parts of
his face that decided intellectual expression which
is already becoming so common to American
physiognomy
.
The mouth was firm and manly; and,
while he muttered to himself, with a meaning smile,
as the curious tailor drew slowly nigher, it discovered
a set of glittering teeth, that shone the brighter from
being cased in so dark a setting. The hair was a jet
black, in thick and confused ringlets; the eyes were
very little larger than common, gray, and, though
evidently of a changing expression, rather leaning to
mildness than severity. The form of this young man
was of that happy size which so singularly unites
activity with strength. It seemed to be well knit,
while it was justly proportioned, and strikingly
graceful. Though these several personal
qualifications
were exhibited under the disadvantages of the
perfectly simple, though neat and rather tastefully
disposed, attire of a common mariner, they were
sufficiently imposing to cause the suspicious dealer
in buckram to hesitate before he would venture to
address the stranger, whose eye appeared riveted,
by a species of fascination, on the reputed slaver in
the outer harbour. A curl of the upper lip, and
another
strange smile, in which scorn was mingled
with his mutterings, decided the vacillating mind of
the good-man. Without venturing to disturb a
reverie
that seemed so profound, he left the youth
leaning
against the head of the pile where he had long
been standing, perfectly unconscious of the presence
of any intruder, and turned a little hastily to
examine
the rest of the party.
One of the remaining two was a white man, and
the other a negro. Both had passed the middle age;
and both, in their appearances, furnished the
strongest
proofs of long exposure to the severity of climate,
and to numberless tempests. They were dressed in
the plain, weather-soiled, and tarred habiliments of
common seamen, and bore about their several
persons
all the other unerring evidences of their
peculiar
profession. The former was of a short,
thickset
,
powerful frame, in which, by a happy ordering
of nature, a little confirmed perhaps by long habit,
the strength was principally seated about the broad
and brawny shoulders, and strong sinewy arms, as if,
in the construction of the man, the inferior members
had been considered of little other use than to
transfer
the superior to the different situations in which
the former were to display their energies. His head
was in proportion to the more immediate members;
the forehead low, and nearly covered with hair; the
eyes small, obstinate, sometimes fierce, and often
dull; the nose snub, coarse, and vulgar; the mouth
large and voracious; the teeth short, clean, and
perfectly
sound; and the chin broad, manly, and even
expressive. This singularly constructed personage
had taken his seat on an empty barrel, and, with
folded arms, he sat examining the often-mentioned
slaver, occasionally favouring his companion, the
black, with such remarks as were suggested by his
observation and great experience.
The negro occupied a more humble post; one
better suited to his subdued habits and inclinations.
In stature, and the peculiar division of animal force,
there was a great resemblance between the two, with
the exception that the latter enjoyed the advantage
in height, and even in proportions. While nature
had stamped on his lineaments those distinguishing
marks which characterize the race from which he
sprung, she had not done it to that revolting degree
to which her displeasure against that stricken people
is often carried. His features were more elevated
than common; his eye was mild, easily excited to
joy, and, like that of his companion, sometimes
humorous
.
His head was beginning to be sprinkled
with gray, his skin had lost the shining jet colour
which had distinguished it in his youth, and all his
limbs and movements bespoke a man whose frame
had been equally indurated and stiffened by
unremitted
toil. He sat on a low stone, and seemed
intently
employed in tossing pebbles into the air, and
shewing his dexterity by catching them in the hand
from which they had just been cast; an amusement
which betrayed alike the natural tendency of his mind
to seek pleasure in trifles, and the absence of those
more elevating feelings which are the fruits of
education
.
The process, however, furnished a striking
exhibition of the physical force of the negro. In
order to conduct this trivial pursuit without
incumbrance
,
he had rolled the sleeve of his light canvas
jacket to the elbow, and laid bare an arm that might
have served as a model for the limb of Hercules.
There was certainly nothing sufficiently imposing
about the persons of either of these individuals to
repel the investigations of one as much influenced
by curiosity as our tailor. Instead, however, of
yielding
directly to the strong impulse, the honest shaper
of cloth chose to conduct his advance in a manner
that should afford to the bumpkin a striking proof
of his boasted sagacity. After making a sign of
caution
and intelligence to the latter, he approached
slowly from behind, with a light step, that might
give him an opportunity of overhearing any secret
that should unwittingly fall from either of the
seamen
.
His forethought was followed by no very
important
results, though it served to supply his
suspicions
with all the additional testimony of the
treachery
of their characters that could be furnished by
evidence so simple as the mere sound of their voices.
As to the words themselves, though the good-man
believed they might well contain treason, he was
compelled to acknowledge to himself that it was so
artfully concealed as to escape even his acute
capacity
.
We leave the reader himself to judge of the
correctness of both opinions.
This is a pretty bight of a basin, Guinea,
observed
the white, rolling his tobacco in his mouth,
and turning his eyes, for the first time in many
minutes
,
from the vessel; and a spot is it that a man,
who lay on a lee-shore without sticks, might be glad
to see his craft in. Now do I call myself something
of a seaman, and yet I cannot weather upon the
philosophy of that fellow, in keeping his ship in the
outer harbour, when he might warp her into this
mill-pond in half an hour. It gives his boats hard
duty, dusky S'ip; and that I call making foul weather
of fair!
The negro had been christened Scipio Africanus,
by a species of witticism which was much more
common to the Provinces than it is to the States of
America, and which filled so many of the meaner
employments of the country, in name at least, with
the counterparts of the philosophers, heroes, poets,
and princes of Rome. To him it was a matter of
small moment, whether the vessel lay in the offing
or in the port; and, without discontinuing his
childish
amusement, he manifested the same, by replying,
with great indifference of manner,
I s'pose he t'ink all the water inside lie on a
top.
I tell you, Guinea, returned the other, in a
harsh, positive tone, the fellow is a know-nothing
Would any man, who understands the behaviour of
a ship, keep his craft in a roadstead, when he might
tie her, head and stern, in a basin like this?
What he call roadstead? interrupted the negro,
seizing at once, with the avidity of ignorance, on the
little oversight of his adversary, in confounding the
outer harbour of Newport with the wilder anchorage
C 2
below, and with the usual indifference of all similar
people to the more material matter of whether the
objection was at all germain to the point in
controversy
;
I never hear 'em call anchoring ground, with
land around it, roadstead afore!
Hark ye, mister Gold-coast, muttered the white,
bending his head aside in a threatening manner,
though he still disdained to turn his eyes on his
humble
adversary, if you've no wish to wear your shins
parcelled for the next month, gather in the slack of
your wit, and have an eye to the manner in which
you let it run again. Just tell me this; isn't a port
a port? and isn't an offing an offing?
As these were two propositions to which even
the ingenuity of Scipio could raise no objection, he
wisely declined touching on either, contenting
himself
with shaking his head in great
self-complacency
,
and laughing as heartily, at his imaginary triumph
over his companion, as though he had never known
care, nor been the subject of wrong and humiliation,
so long and so patiently endured.
Ay, ay, grumbled the white, re-adjusting his
person in its former composed attitude, and again
crossing the arms, which had been a little separated,
to give force to the menace against the tender
member
of the black, now you are piping the wind out
of your throat like a flock of long-shore crows, you
think you've got the best of the matter. The Lord
made a nigger an unrational animal; and an
experienced
seaman, who has doubled both Capes, and
made all the head-lands atween Fundy and Horn, has
no right to waste his breath in teaching any of the
breed! I tell you, Scipio, since Scipio is your name
on the ship's books, though I'll wager a month's pay
against a wooden boat-hook that your father was
known at home as Quashee, and your mother as
Quasheebatherefore do I tell you, Scipio Africa
which is a name for all your colour, I believethat
yonder chap, in the outer harbour of this here
sea-port
,
is no judge of an anchorage, or he would drop
a kedge mayhap hereaway, in a line with the
southern
end of that there small matter of an island, and,
hauling his ship up to it, fasten her to the spot with
good hempen cables and iron mud-hooks. Now, look
you here, S'ip, at the reason of the matter, he
continued
,
in a manner which shewed that the little
skirmish
that had just passed was like one of those
sudden
squalls of which they had both seen so many, and
which were usually so soon succeeded by
corresponding
seasons of calm; look you at the whole
rationality
of what I say. He has come into this anchorage
either for something or for nothing. I suppose you
are ready to admit that. If for nothing, he might
have found that much outside, and I'll say no more
about it; but if for something, he could get it off
easier, provided the ship lay hereaway, just where
I told you, boy, not a fathom ahead or astern, than
where she is now riding, though the article was no
heavier than a fresh handful of feathers for the
captain's
pillow. Now, if you have any thing to gainsay
the reason of this, why, I'm ready to hear it as a
reasonable man, and one who has not forgotten his
manners in learning his philosophy.
S'pose a wind come out fresh here, at nor-west,
answered the other, stretching his brawny arm
towards
the point of the compass he named, and a
vessel want to get to sea in a hurry, how you t'ink
he get her far enough up to lay through the weather
reach? Ha! you answer me dat; you great scholar,
misser Dick, but you never see ship go in wind's
teeth, or hear a monkey talk.
The black is right! exclaimed the youth, who,
it would seem, had overheard the dispute, while he
appeared otherwise engaged; the slaver has left
his vessel in the outer harbour, knowing that the
wind holds so much to the westward at this season
of the year; and then you see he keeps his light
spars aloft, although it is plain enough, by the
manner
in which his sails are furled, that he is
strong-handed
.
Can you make out, boys, whether he has
an anchor under foot, or is he merely riding by a
single cable?
The man must be a driveller, to lie in such a
tides-way, without dropping his stream, or at least a
kedge, to steady the ship, returned the white,
without
appearing to think any thing more than the
received
practice of seamen necessary to decide the
point. That he is no great judge of an anchorage, I
am ready to allow; but no man, who can keep things
so snug aloft, would think of fastening his ship, for
any length of time, by a single cable, to sheer
starboard
and port, like that kicking colt, tied to the tree
by a long halter, that we fell in with, in our passage
over land from Boston.
'Em got a stream down, and all a rest of he
anchors stowed, said the black, whose dark eye
was glancing understandingly at the vessel, while he
still continued to cast his pebbles into the air:
S'pose he jam a helm hard a-port, misser Harry,
and take a tide on he larboard bow, what you t'ink
make him kick and gallop about! Golly! I like to
see Dick, without a foot-rope, ride a colt tied to
tree!
Again the negro enjoyed his humour, by shaking
his head, as if his whole soul was amused by the
whimsical image his rude fancy had conjured, and
indulged in a hearty laugh; and again his white
companion muttered certain exceedingly heavy and
sententious denunciations. The young man, who
seemed to enter very little into the quarrels and
witticisms
of his singular associates, still kept his gaze
intently fastened on the vessel, which to him
appeared
,
for the moment, to be the subject of some
extraordinary
interest. Shaking his own head, though in
a far graver manner, as if his doubts were drawing
to a close, he added, as the boisterous merriment of
the negro ceased,
Yes, Scipio, you are right: he rides altogether
by his stream, and he keeps every thing in readiness
for a sudden move. In ten minutes he would carry
his ship beyond the fire of the battery, provided he
had but a capful of wind.
You appear to be a judge in these matters,
said an unknown voice behind him.
The youth turned suddenly on his heel, and then,
for the first time, was he apprised of the presence
of any intruders. The surprise, however, was not
confined to himself; for, as there was another
newcomer
to be added to the company, the gossipping
tailor was quite as much, or even more, the subject
of astonishment, than any of that party, whom he
had been so intently watching as to have prevented
him from observing the approach of still another
utter stranger.
The third individual was a man between thirty
and forty, and of a mien and attire not a little
adapted
to quicken the already active curiosity of the
good-man Homespun. His person was slight, but
afforded the promise of exceeding agility, and even
of vigour, especially when contrasted with his
stature
,
which was scarcely equal to the medium height
of man. His skin had been dazzling as that of
woman
,
though a deep red, which had taken possession
of the lower lineaments of his face, and which was
particularly conspicuous on the outline of a fine
aquiline nose, served to destroy all appearance of
effeminacy. His hair was like his complexion, fair,
and fell about his temples in rich, glossy, and
exuberant
curls. His mouth and chin were beautiful in
their formation; but the former was a little scornful,
and the two together bore a decided character of
voluptuousness. The eye was blue, full without
being prominent, and, though in common placid and
even soft, there were moments when it seemed a
little unsettled and wild. He wore a high conical
hat, placed a little on one side, so as to give a
slightly
rakish expression to his physiognomy, a riding
frock of light green, breeches of buck-skin, high
boots, and spurs. In one of his hands he carried a
small whip, with which, when first seen, he was
cutting
the air with an appearance of the utmost
indifference
to the surprise occasioned by his sudden
interruption
.
I say, sir, you seem to be a judge in these
matters
,
he repeated, when he had endured the
frowning
examination of the young seaman quite as long
as comported with his own patience; you speak
like a man who feels he has a right to give an
opinion
!
Do you find it remarkable that one should not
be ignorant of a profession that he has diligently
pursued for a whole life?
Hum! I find it a little remarkable, that one,
whose business is that of a handicraft, should dignify
his trade with such a sounding name as
profession
.
We of the learned science of the law, and who
enjoy
the particular smiles of the learned universities,
can say no more!
Then call it trade; for nothing in common with
gentlemen of your craft is acceptable to a seaman,
retorted the young mariner, turning away from the
intruder with a disgust that he did not affect to
conceal
.
A lad of some metal! muttered the other, with
a rapid utterance and a meaning smile. Let not
such a trifle as a word part us, friend. I confess my
ignorance of all maritime matters, and would gladly
learn a little from one as skilful as yourself in the
noble
profession
. I think you said something
concerning
the manner in which yonder ship has
anchored
,
and of the condition in which they keep
things alow and aloft?
Alow
and aloft! exclaimed the young sailor,
facing his interrogator with a stare that was quite as
expressive as his recent disgust.
Alow and aloft! calmly repeated the other.
I spoke of her neatness aloft, but do not affect
to judge of things below at this distance.
Then it was my error; but you will have pity
on the ignorance of one who is so new to the
profession
.
As I have intimated, I am no more than
an unworthy barrister, in the service of his Majesty,
expressly sent from home on a particular errand. If
it were not a pitiful pun, I might add, I am not yet
a judge.
No doubt you will soon arrive at that
distinction
,
returned the other, if his Majesty's ministers
have any just conceptions of modest merit; unless,
indeed, you should happen to be prematurely
The youth bit his lip, made a haughty inclination
of the head, and walked leisurely up the wharf,
followed
,
with the same appearance of deliberation,
by the two seamen who had accompanied him in his
visit to the place. The stranger in green watched
the whole movement with a calm and apparently an
amused eye, tapping his boot with his whip, and
seeming
to reflect like one who would willingly find means
to continue the discourse.
Hanged! he at length uttered, as if to complete
the sentence the other had left unfinished. It is
droll enough that such a fellow should dare to foretel
so elevated a fate for
me!
He was evidently preparing to follow the retiring
party, when he felt a hand laid a little
unceremoniously
on his arm, and his step was arrested.
One word in your ear, sir, said the attentive
tailor, making a significant sign that he had matters
of importance to communicate: A single word,
sir, since you are in the particular service of his
Majesty. Neighbour Pardon, he continued, with a
dignified and patronising air, the sun is getting low,
and you will make it late home, I fear. The girl
will give you the garment, andGod speed you!
Say nothing of what you have heard and seen, until
you have word from me to that effect; for it is
seemly
that two men, who have had so much experience
in a war like this, should not lack in discretion. Fare
ye well, lad!pass the good word to the worthy
farmer, your father, not forgetting a refreshing hint
of friendship to the thrifty housewife, your mother.
Fare ye well, honest youth; fare ye well!
Homespun, having thus disposed of his admiring
companion, waited, with much elevation of mien,
until the gaping bumpkin had left the wharf, before
he again turned his look on the stranger in green.
The latter had continued standing in his tracks, with
an air of undisturbed composure, until he was once
more addressed by the tailor, whose character and
dimensions he seemed to have taken in, at a single
glance of his rapid eye.
You say, sir, you are a servant of his Majesty?
demanded the latter, determined to solve all doubts
as to the other's claims on his confidence, before he
committed himself by any precipitate disclosure.
I may say more;his familiar confident!
It is an honour to converse with such a man,
that I feel in every bone in my body, returned the
cripple, smoothing his scanty hairs, and bowing
nearly
to the earth; a high and loyal honour do I feel
this gracious privilege to be.
Such as it is, my friend, I take on myself in his
Majesty's name, to bid you welcome.
Such munificent condescension would open my
whole heart, though treason, and all other
unright-cousness
,
was locked up in it. I am happy,
honoured
,
and I doubt not, honourable sir, to have this
opportunity
of proving my zeal to the King, before one
who will not fail to report my humble efforts to his
royal ears.
Speak freely, interrupted the stranger in green,
with an air of princely condescension; though one,
less simple and less occupied with his own budding
honours than the tailor, might have easily discovered
that he began to grow weary of the other's prolix
loyalty
:
Speak without reserve, friend; it is what we
always do at court. Then, switching his boot with
his riding whip, he muttered to himself, as he swung
his light frame on his heel, with an indolent,
indifferent
air, If the fellow swallows that, he is as stupid
as his own goose!
I shall, sir, I shall; and a great proof of charity
is it in one like your noble self to listen. You see
yonder tall ship, sir, in the outer harbour of this loyal
sea-port?
I do; she seems to be an object of general
attention
among the worthy lieges of the place.
Therein I conceive, sir, you have overrated the
sagacity of my townsmen. She has been lying where
you now see her for many days, and not a syllable
have I heard whispered against her character from
mortal man, except myself.
Indeed! muttered the stranger, biting the
handle
of his whip, and fastening his glittering eyes
intently
on the features of the good-man, which were
literally swelling with the importance of his
discovery
;
and what may be the nature of
your
suspicions
?
Why, sir, I may be wrongand God forgive me
if I ambut this is no more nor less than what has
arisen in my mind on the subject. Yonder ship, and
her crew, bear the reputation of being innocent and
harmless slavers, among the good people of Newport;
and as such are they received and welcomed in the
place, the one to a safe and easy anchorage, and the
Vol. I. D
others among the taverners and shop-dealers. I would
not have you imagine that a single garment has ever
gone from my fingers for one of all her crew; no,
let it be for ever remembered that the whole of their
dealings have been with the young tradesman named
Tape, who entices customers to barter, by backbiting
and otherwise defiling the fair names of his betters in
the business: not a garment has been made by my
hands for even the smallest boy.
You are lucky, returned the stranger in green,
in being so well quit of the knaves! and yet have
you forgotten to name the particular offence with
which I am to charge them before the face of the
King.
I am coming as fast as possible to the weighty
matter. You must know, worthy and
commendable
sir, that I am a man that has seen much, and
suffered
much, in his Majesty's service. Five bloody
and cruel wars have I gone through, besides other
adventures and experiences, such as becomes a
humble
subject to suffer meekly and in silence.
All of which shall be directly communicated to
the royal ear. And now, worthy friend, relieve
your mind, by a frank communication of your
suspicions
.
Thanks, honourable sir; your goodness in my
behalf cannot be forgotten, though it shall never be
said that any impatience to seek the relief you
mention
,
hurried me into a light and improper manner
of unburthening my mind. You must know,
honoured
gentleman, that yesterday, as I sat alone, at
this very hour, on my board, reflecting in my thoughts
for the plain reason that my envious neighbour
had enticed all the newly arrived customers to his
own shopwell, sir, the head will be busy when
the hands are idle; there I sat, as I have briefly told
you, reflecting in my thoughts, like any other
accountable
being, on the calamities of life, and on the
great experiences that I have had in the wars. For
you must know, valiant gentleman, besides the affair
in the land of the Medes and Persians, and the
Porteous
mob in Edinbro', five cruel and bloody
There is that in your air which sufficiently
proclaims
the soldier, interrupted his listener, who
evidently
struggled to keep down his rising impatience;
but, as my time is so precious, I would now more
especially hear what you have to say concerning
yonder ship.
Yes, sir, one gets a military look after seeing
numberless wars; and so, happily for the need of
both, I have now come to the part of my secret
which touches more particularly on the character of
that vessel. There sat I, reflecting on the manner
in which the strange seamen had been deluded by
my tonguey neighbourfor, as you should know,
sir, a desperate talker is that Tape, and a younker
who has seen but one war at the utmosttherefore,
was I thinking of the manner in which he had
enticed
my lawful customers from my shop, when, as
one thought is the father of another, the following
concluding reasoning, as our pious priest has it
weekly
in his reviving and searching discourses, came
uppermost
in my mind: If these mariners were
honest
and conscientious slavers, would they overlook a
labouring man with a large family, to pour their
well-earned gold into the lap of a common babbler?
I proclaimed to myself at once, sir, that they would
not. I was bold to say the same in my own mind;
and, thereupon, I openly put the question to all in
hearing, If they are not slavers, what are they? A
question which the King himself would, in his royal
wisdom, allow to be a question easier asked than
answered
;
upon which I replied, If the vessel be no
fair-trading slaver, nor a common cruiser of his
Majesty
,
it is as tangible as the best man's reasoning,
that she may be neither more nor less than the ship
of that nefarious pirate the Red Rover.
The Red Rover! exclaimed the stranger in
green, with a start so natural as to evidence that his
dying interest in the tailor's narrative was suddenly
and powerfully revived. That indeed would be a
secret worth having!but why do you suppose the
same?
For sundry reasons, which I am now about to
name, in their respective order. In the first place,
she is an armed ship, sir. In the second, she is no
lawful cruiser, or the same would be publicly
known, and by no one sooner than myself, inasmuch
as it is seldom that I do not finger a penny from the
King's ships. In the third place, the burglarious and
unfeeling conduct of the few seamen who have
landed
from her go to prove it; and, lastly, what is well
proved may be considered as substantially
established
.
These are what, sir, I should call the opening
premises of my inferences, all of which I hope you
will properly lay before the royal mind of his
Majesty
.
The barrister in green listened to the somewhat
wire-drawn deductions of Homespun with great
attention
,
notwithstanding the confused and obscure
manner in which they were delivered by the
aspiring
tradesman. His keen eye rolled quickly, and
often, from the vessel to the countenance of his
companion
;
but several moments elapsed before he saw
fit to make any reply. The reckless gayety with
which he had introduced himself, and which he had
hitherto maintained in the discourse, was entirely
superseded by a musing and abstracted air, which
sufficiently proved, that, whatever levity he might
betray in common, he was far from being a stranger
to deep and absorbing thought. Suddenly throwing
off his air of gravity, however, he assumed one in
which irony and sincerity were singularly blended,
and, laying his hand familiarly on the shoulder of the
expecting tailor, he replied
You have communicated such matter as
becometh
a faithful and loyal servant of the King. It is
well known that a heavy price is set on the head of
the meanest follower of the Rover, and that a rich,
ay, a splendid reward will be the fortune of him who
is the instrument of delivering the whole knot of
miscreants into the hands of the executioner.
Indeed
,
I know not but some marked evidence of the
royal pleasure might follow such a service. There
was Phipps, a man of humble origin, who received
knighthood
Knighthood! echoed the tailor, in awful
admiration
.
Knighthood, coolly repeated the stranger;
honourable and chivalric knighthood. What may
have been the appellation you received from your
sponsors in baptism?
My given name, gracious and grateful sir, is
Hector.
And the house itself?the distinctive
appellation
of the family?
We have
always
been called Homespun.
Sir Hector Homespun will sound as well as
another
!
But to secure these rewards, my friend, it is
necessary to be discreet. I admire your ingenuity,
and am a convert to your logic. You have so
entirely
demonstrated the truth of your suspicions, that
I have no more doubt of yonder vessel being the
pirate, than I have of your wearing spurs, and being
called sir Hector. The two things are equally
established
in my mind: but it is needful that we proceed
in the matter with caution. I understand you to say,
that no one else has been enlightened by your
erudition
in this affair?
D 2
Not a soul. Tape himself is ready to swear that
the crew are conscientious slavers.
So best. We must first render conclusions
certain
;
then to our reward. Meet me at the hour of
eleven this night, at yonder low point, where the
land juts into the outer harbour. From that stand
will we make our observations; and, having
removed
every doubt, let the morning produce a discovery
that shall ring from the Colony of the Bay to the
settlements of Oglethorpe. Until then we part; for
it is not wise that we be longer seen in conference.
Remember silence, punctuality, and the favour of
the King. These are our watch-words.
Adieu, honourable gentlemen, said his
companion
,
making a reverence nearly to the earth, as the
other slightly touched his hat in passing.
Adieu, sir Hector, returned the stranger in
green, with an affable smile and a gracious wave of
the hand. He then walked slowly up the wharf,
and disappeared behind the mansion of the
Home-spuns
;
leaving the head of that ancient family, like
many a predecessor and many a successor, so rapt
in the admiration of his own good fortune, and so
blinded by his folly, that, while physically he saw to
the right and to the left as well as ever, his mental
vision was completely obscured in the clouds of
ambition.
CHAPTER III.
Alonzo
. Good boatswain, have care.
Tempest
.
The
instant the stranger had separated from the
credulous tailor, he lost his assumed air in one far
more natural and sedate. Still it would seem that
thought was an unwonted, or an unwelcome tenant
of his mind; for, switching his boot with his little
riding whip, he entered the principal street of the
place with a light step and a wandering eye. Though
his look was unsettled, few of the individuals, whom
he passed, escaped his quick glances; and it was
quite apparent, from the hurried manner in which
he began to regard objects, that his mind was not
less active than his body. A stranger thus accoutred,
and one bearing about his person so many evidences
of his recent acquaintance with the road, did not
fail to attract the attention of the provident
publicans
we have had occasion to mention in our opening
chapter. Declining the civilities of the most
favoured
of the inn-keepers, he suffered his steps to be,
oddly enough, arrested by the one whose house was
the usual haunt of the hangers-on of the port.
On entering the bar-room of this tavern, as it was
called, but which in the mother country would
probably
have aspired to be termed no more than a
pothouse
,
he found the hospitable apartment thronged
with its customary revellers. A slight interruption
was produced by the appearance of a guest who was
altogether superior, in mien and attire, to the
ordinary
customers of the house, but it ceased the
moment
the stranger had thrown himself on a bench,
and intimated to the host the nature of his wants.
As the latter furnished the required draught, he made
a sort of apology, which was intended for the ears
of all his customers nigh the stranger, for the manner
in which an individual, in the further end of the long
narrow room, not only monopolized the discourse,
but appeared to extort the attention of all within
hearing to some portentous legend he was
recounting
.
It is the boatswain of the slaver in the outer
harbour, squire, the worthy disciple of Bacchus
concluded; a man who has followed the water
many a day, and who has seen sights and prodigies
enough to fill a smart volume. Old Bor'us the
people
call him, though his lawful name is Jack
Nightingale
.
Is the toddy to the squire's relish?
The stranger assented to the latter query, by
smacking his lips, and bowing, as he put down the
nearly untouched draught. He then turned his head,
to examine the individual who might, by the
manner
in which he declaimed, have been termed, in
the language of the country, the second orator of
the day.
A stature which greatly exceeded six feet;
enormous
whiskers, that quite concealed a moiety of his
grim countenance; a scar, which was the memorial
of a badly healed gash, that had once threatened to
divide that moiety in quarters; limbs in proportion;
the whole rendered striking by the dress of a
seaman
;
a long, tarnished silver chain, and a little
whistle of the same metal, served to render the
individual
in question sufficiently remarkable.
Without
appearing to be in the smallest degree aware of
the entrance of one altogether so superior to the class
of his usual auditors, this son of the Ocean
continued
his narrative as follows, and in a voice that
seemed
given to him by nature as if in very mockery of his
musical name; indeed, so very near did his tones
approach to the low murmurings of a bull, that some
little practice was necessary to accustom the ear to
the strangely uttered words.
Well! he continued, thrusting his brawny arm
forth, with the fist clenched, indicating the
necessary
point of the compass by the thumb; the coast
of Guinea might have lain hereaway, and the wind,
you see, was dead off shore, blowing in squalls, as a
cat spits, all the same as if the old fellow, who keeps
it bagged for the use of us seamen, sometimes let the
stopper slip through his fingers, and was sometimes
fetching it up again with a double turn round the
end of his sack.You know what a sack is, brother?
This abrupt question was put to the gaping
bumpkin
,
already known to the reader, who, with the
nether garment just received from the tailor under
his arm, had lingered, to add the incidents of the
present legend to the stock of lore that he had already
obtained for the ears of his kinsfolk in the country.
A general laugh, at the expense of the admiring
Pardon
,
succeeded. Nightingale bestowed a knowing
wink on one or two of his familiars, and, profiting
by the occasion, to freshen his nip, as he quaintly
styled swallowing a pint of rum and water, he
continued
his narrative by saying, in a sort of
admonitory
tone,
And the time may come when you will know
what a round-turn is, too, if you let go your hold of
honesty. A man's neck was made, brother, to keep
his head above water, and not to be stretched out of
shape like a pair of badly fitted dead-eyes.
Therefore
,
have your reckoning worked up in season, and
the lead of conscience going, when you find yourself
drifting on the shoals of temptation. Then, rolling
his tobacco in his mouth, he looked boldly about
him, like one who had acquitted himself of a moral
obligation, and continued: Well, there lay the land,
and, as I was saying, the wind was here, at
east-and-by-south
,
or mayhap at east-and-by-south-half-south,
sometimes blowing like a fin-back in a hurry, and
sometimes leaving all the canvas chafing ag'in the
rigging and spars, as if a bolt of duck cost no more
nor a rich man's blessing. I didn't like the looks of
the weather, seeing that there was altogether too
much unsartainty for a quiet watch, so I walked aft,
in order to put myself in the way of giving an
opinion
,
if-so-be such a thing should be asked. You must
know, brothers, that, according to my notions of
religion
and behaviour, a man is not good for much,
unless he has a fall share of manners; therefore I
am never known to put my spoon into the captain's
mess, unless I am invited, for the plain reason, that
my berth is for'ard, and his'n aft. I do not say in
which end of a ship the better man is to be found;
that is a matter concerning which men have different
opinions, though most judges in the business are
agreed. But aft I walked, to put myself in the way
of giving an opinion, if one should be asked; nor
was it long before the thing came to pass just as I
had foreseen. `Mister Nightingale,' says he; for
our Captain is a gentleman, and never forgets his
behaviour on deck, or when any of the ship's
company
are at hand, `
Mister
Nightingale,' says he, `what
do you think of that rag of a cloud, hereaway at
the north-west?' says he. `Why, sir,' says I, boldly,
for I'm never backward in speaking, when properly
spoken to, so, `why, sir,' says I, `saving your
Honour's
better judgment,'which was all a flam, for he
was but a chicken to me in years and experience,
but then I never throw hot ashes to windward, or
any thing else that is warmso, `sir,' says I, `it is my
advice to hand the three topsails and to stow the jib.
We are in no hurry; for the plain reason, that Guinea
will be to-morrow just where Guinea is to-night.
As for keeping the ship steady in these matters of
squalls, we have the mainsail on her'
You should have furl'd your mainsail too,
exclaimed
a voice from behind, that was quite as
dogmatical
,
though a little less grum, than that of the
loquacious boatswain.
What know-nothing says that? demanded
Nightingale fiercely, as if all his latent ire was
excited
by so rude and daring an interruption.
A man who has run Africa down, from Bon to
Good-Hope, more than once, and who knows a white
squall from a rainbow, returned Dick Fid, edging
his short person stoutly towards his furious
adversary
,
making his way through the crowd by which the
important personage of the boatswain was
environed
,
by dint of his massive shoulders; ay, brother,
and a man, know-much or know-nothing, who would
never advise his officer to keep so much after-sail on
a ship, when there was the likelihood of the wind
taking her aback.
To this bold vindication of an opinion which all
present deemed to be so audacious, there succeeded
a general and loud murmur. Encouraged by this
evidence of his superior popularity, Nightingale was
not slow, nor very meek, with his retort; and then
followed a clamorous concert, in which the voices
of the company in general served for the higher and
shriller notes, through which the bold and vigorous
assertions, contradictions, and opinions of the two
principal disputants were heard running a
thorough-bass
.
For some time, no part of the discussion was very
distinct, so great was the confusion of tongues; and
there were certain symptoms of an intention, on the
part of Fid and the boatswain, to settle their
controversy
by the last appeal. During this moment of
suspense, the former had squared his firm-built frame
in front of his gigantic opponent, and there were
very vehement passings and counter-passings, in the
way of gestures from four athletic arms, each of
which was knobbed, like a fashionable rattan, with
a lump of bones, knuckles, and sinews, that
threatened
annihilation to any thing that should oppose
them. As the general clamour, however, gradually
abated, the chief reasoners began to be heard; and,
as if content to rely on their respective powers of
eloquence, each gradually relinquished his hostile
attitude, and appeared disposed to maintain his ground
by a member scarcely less terrible than his brawny
arm.
You are a bold seaman, brother, said
Nightingale
,
resuming his seat, and, if saying was doing,
no doubt you would make a ship talk. But I, who
have seen fleets of two and three deckersand that
of all nations, except your Mohawks, mayhap, whose
cruisers I will confess never to have fallen in with
lying as snug as so many white gulls, under reefed
mainsails, know how to take the strain off a ship,
and to keep my bulkheads in their places.
I deny the judgment of heaving-to a boat under
her after square-sails, retorted Dick. Give her
the staysails, if you will, and no harm done; but a
true seaman will never get a bagful of wind between
his mainmast and his lee-swifter, if-so-be he knows
his business. But words are like thunder, which
rumbles aloft, without coming down a spar, as I have
yet seen; let us therefore put the question to some
one who has been on the water, and knows a little
of life and of ships.
If the oldest admiral in his Majesty's fleet was
here, he wouldn't be backward in saying who is right
and who is wrong. I say, brothers, if there is a man
among you all who has had the advantage of a sea
education, let him speak, in order that the truth of
this matter may not be hid, like a marlingspike
jammed
between a brace-block and a blackened yard.
Here, then, is the man, returned Fid; and,
stretching out his arm, he seized Scipio by the collar,
and drew him, without ceremony, into the centre of
the circle, that had opened around the two
disputants
.
There is a man for you, who has made one
more voyage between this and Africa than myself,
for the reason that he was born there. Now, answer
as if you were hallooing from a lee-earing, S'ip,
under
what sail would you heave-to a ship, on the coast
of your native country, with the danger of a white
squall at hand?
I no heave-'em-to, said the black, I make 'em
scud.
Ay, boy; but, to be in readiness for the puff,
would you jam her up under a mainsail, or let her
lie a little off under a fore course?
Any fool know dat, returned Scipio, grumly,
and evidently tired already of being thus catechised.
If you want 'em fall off, how you'm expect, in
reason, he do it under a main course? You answer
me dat, misser Dick.
Gentlemen, said Nightingale, looking about him
with an air of great gravity, I put it to your
Honours
,
is it genteel behaviour to bring a nigger, in this
out-of-the-way fashion, to give an opinion in the teeth
of a white man?
This appeal to the wounded dignity of the
company
was answered by a common murmur. Scipio,
who was prepared to maintain, and would have
maintained, his professional opinion, after his
positive
and peculiar manner, against any disputant, had
not the heart to resist so general an evidence of the
impropriety of his presence. Without uttering a
word in vindication or apology, he folded his arms,
and walked out of the house, with the submission
and meekness of one who had been too long trained
in humility to rebel. This desertion on the part of
his companion was not, however, so quietly
acquiesced
in by Fid, who found himself thus
unexpectedly
deprived of the testimony of the black. He loudly
remonstrated against his retreat; but, finding it in
vain, he crammed the end of several inches of
tobacco
into his mouth, swearing, as he followed the
African, and keeping his eye, at the same time,
firmly
fastened on his adversary, that, in his opinion,
the lad, if he was fairly skinned, would be found
to be the whiter man of the two.
The triumph of the boatswain was now complete;
nor was he at all sparing of his exultation.
Gentlemen, he said, addressing himself, with
an air of increased confidence, to the motley audience
who surrounded him, you see that reason is like a
ship bearing down with studding-sails on both sides,
leaving a straight wake and no favours. Now, I
Vol. I. E
scorn boasting, nor do I know who the fellow is who
has just sheered off, in time to save his character,
but this I will say, that the man is not to be found,
between Boston and the West Indies, who knows
better than myself how to make a ship walk, or how
to make her stand still, provided I
The deep voice of Nightingale became suddenly
hushed, and his eye was riveted, by a sort of
enchantment
,
on the keen glance of the stranger in
green, whose countenance was now seen blended
among the more vulgar faces of the crowd.
Mayhap, continued the boatswain, swallowing
his words, in the surprise of seeing himself so
unexpectedly
confronted by so imposing an eye,
mayhap
this gentleman has some knowledge of the sea,
and can decide the matter in dispute.
We do not study naval tactics at the universities,
returned the other briskly, though I will confess, from
the little I have heard, I am altogether in favour of
scudding
.
He pronounced the latter word with an emphasis
which rendered it questionable if he did not mean to
pun; the more especially as he threw down his
reckoning
,
and instantly left the field to the quiet
possession
of Nightingale. The latter, after a short pause,
resumed his narrative, though, either from weariness
or some other cause, it was observed that his voice
was far less positive than before, and that his tale
was cut prematurely short. After completing his
narrative and his grog, he staggered to the beach,
whither a boat was shortly after despatched to
convey
him on board the ship, which, during all this
time, had not ceased to be the constant subject of
the suspicious examination of the good-man
Home-spun
.
In the mean while, the stranger in green had
pursued
his walk along the main street of the town. Fid
had given chase to the disconcerted Scipio,
grumbling
as he went, and uttering no very delicate
remarks
on the knowledge and seamanship of the
boat-swain
.
They soon joined company again, the former
changing his attack to the negro, whom he
liberally
abused, for abandoning a point which he
maintained was as simple, and as true, as that
yonder
bit of a schooner would make more way, going
wing-and-wing, than jammed up on a wind.
Probably diverted with the touches of peculiar
character he had detected in this singular pair of
confederates, or possibly led by his own wayward
humour, the stranger followed their footsteps. After
turning from the water, they mounted a hill, the
latter
a little in the rear of his pilots, until he lost sight
of them in a bend of the street, or rather road; for,
by this time, they were past even the little suburbs
of the town. Quickening his steps, the barrister, as
he had announced himself to be, was glad to catch
a glimpse of the two worthies, seated under a fence
several minutes after he had believed them lost.
They were making a frugal meal, off the contents of
a little bag which the white had borne under his arm,
and from which he now dispensed liberally to his
companion, who had taken his post sufficiently nigh
to proclaim that perfect amity was restored, though
still a little in the back ground, in deference to the
superior condition which the other enjoyed through
favour of his colour. Approaching the spot, the
stranger observed,
If you make so free with the bag, my lads, your
third man may have to go supperless to bed.
Who hails? said Dick, looking up from his
bone, with an expression much like that of a mastiff
when engaged at a similar employment.
I merely wished to remind you that you had
another messmate, cavalierly returned the other.
Will you take a cut, brother? said the seaman,
offering the bag, with the liberality of a sailor, the
moment he fancied there was an indirect demand
made on its contents.
You still mistake my meaning; on the wharf you
had another companion.
Ay, ay; he is in the offing there, overhauling
that bit of a light-house, which is badly enough
moored
,
unless they mean it to shew the channel to your
ox-teams and inland traders; hereaway, gentlemen,
where you see that pile of stones which seems likely
to be coming down shortly by-the-run.
The stranger looked in the direction indicated by
the other, and saw the young mariner, to whom he
had alluded, standing at the foot of a ruined tower,
which was crumbling under the slow operations of
time, at no great distance from the place where he
stood. Throwing a handful of small change to the
seamen, he wished them a better meal, and crossed
the fence, with an apparent intention of examining
the ruin also.
The lad is free with his coppers, said Dick,
suspending the movements of his teeth, to give the
stranger another and a better look; but, as they
will not grow where he has planted them, S'ip, you
may turn them over to my pocket. An off-handed
and a free-handed chap that, Africa; but then these
law-dealers get all their pence of the devil, and they
are sure of more, when the shot begins to run low
in the locker.
Leaving the negro to collect the money, and to
transfer it, as in duty bound, to the hands of him
who, if not his master, was at all times ready and
willing to exercise the authority of one, we shall
follow the stranger in his walk toward the tottering
edifice. There was little about the ruin itself to
attract
the attention of one who, from his assertions,
had probably often enjoyed the opportunities of
examining
far more imposing remains of former ages,
on the other side of the Atlantic. It was a small
circular tower, which stood on rude pillars,
connected
by arches, and might have been constructed, in
the infancy of the country, as a place of defence,
though it is far more probable that it was a work
of a less warlike nature. More than half a century
after the period of which we are writing, this little
edifice, peculiar in its form, its ruinous condition,
and its materials, has suddenly become the study
and the theme of that very learned sort of
individual
,
the American antiquarian. It is not surprising
that a ruin thus honoured should have become the
object of many a hot and erudite discussion. While
the chivalrous in the arts and in the antiquities of
the country have been gallantly breaking their lances
around the mouldering walls, the less instructed and
the less zealous have regarded the combatants with
the same species of wonder as they would have
manifested
had they been present when the renowned
knight of La Mancha tilted against those other
wind-mills
,
so ingeniously described by the immortal
Cervantes
.
On reaching the place, the stranger in green gave
his boot a smart blow with the riding whip, as if to
attract the attention of the abstracted young sailor,
and freely remarked,
A very pretty object this would be, if covered
with ivy, to be seen peeping through an opening in
a wood. But I beg pardon; gentlemen of your
profession
have little to do with woods and crumbling
stones. Yonder is the tower, pointing to the tall
masts of the ship in the outer harbour, you love to
look on; and your only ruin is a wreck!
You seem familiar with our tastes, sir, coldly
returned the other.
It is by instinct, then; for it is certain I have
had but little opportunity of acquiring my knowledge
by actual communion with any of thecloth; nor
do I perceive that I am likely to be more fortunate
E 2
at present. Let us be frank, my friend, and talk in
amity: What do you see about this pile of stones,
that can keep you so long from your study of yonder
noble and gallant ship?
Did it then surprise you that a seaman out of
employment should examine a vessel that he finds
to his mind, perhaps with an intention to ask for
service?
Her commander must be a dull fellow, if he
refuse
it to so proper a lad! But you seem to be too
well instructed for any of the meaner births.
Births! repeated the other, again fastening his
eyes, with a singular expression, on the stranger in
green.
Births! It is your nautical word for `situation,'
or `station;' is it not? We know but little of the
marine vocabulary, we barristers; but I think I may
venture on that as the true Doric. Am I justified by
your authority?
The word is certainly not yet obsolete; and, by
a figure, it is as certainly correct in the sense you
used it.
Obsolete! repeated the stranger in green,
returning
the meaning look he had just received: Is
that the name of any part of a ship? Perhaps, by
figure
, you mean figure-head; and, by
obsolete
, the
long-boat!
The young seaman laughed; and, as if this sally
had broken through the barrier of his reserve, his
manner lost much of its cold restraint during the
remainder
of their conference.
It is just as plain, he said, that you have been
at sea, as it is that I have been at school. Since we
have both been so fortunate, we may afford to be
generous
,
and cease speaking in parables. For instance,
what think you has been the object and use of this
ruin, when it was in good condition?
In order to judge of that, returned the stranger
in green, it may be necessary to examine it more
closely. Let us ascend.
As he spoke, the barrister mounted, by a crazy
ladder, to the floor which lay just above the crown of
the arches, through which he passed by an open
trap-door
.
His companion hesitated to follow; but,
observing
that the other expected him at the summit
of the ladder, and that he very kindly pointed out a
defective round, he sprang forward, and went up the
ascent with the agility and steadiness peculiar to his
calling.
Here we are! exclaimed the stranger in green,
looking about at the naked walls, which were formed
of such small and irregular stones as to give the
building the appearance of dangerous frailty, with
good oaken plank for our deck, as you would say,
and the sky for our roof, as we call the upper part
of a house at the universities. Now let us speak of
things on the lower world. Aa; I forget what
you said was your usual appellation
That might depend on circumstances. I have
been known by different names in different
situations
.
However, if you call me Wilder, I shall not
fail to answer.
Wilder! a good name; though, I dare say, it
would have been as true were it Wildone. You
young ship-boys have the character of being a little
erratic in your humours at times. How many tender
hearts have you left to sigh for your errors, amid
shady bowers, while you have been ploughingthat
is the word, I believeploughing the salt-sea ocean?
Few sigh for me, returned Wilder, thoughtfully,
though he evidently began to chafe a little under
this free sort of catechism. Let us now return to
our study of the tower. What think you has been
its object?
Its present use is plain, and its former use can
be no great mystery. It holds at this moment two
light hearts; and, if I am not mistaken, as many light
heads, not overstocked with the stores of wisdom.
Formerly it had its granaries of corn, at least, and, I
doubt not, certain little quadrupeds, who were quite
as light of fingers as we are of head and heart. In
plain English, it has been a mill.
There are those who think it had been a
fortress
.
Hum! The place might do, at need, returned
he in green, casting a rapid and peculiar glance
around him. But mill it has been, not withstanding
one might wish it a nobler origin. The windy
situation
,
the pillars to keep off the invading vermin,
the shape, the air, the very complexion, prove it.
Whir-r-r, whir-r-r; there has been clatter enough
here in time past, I warrant you. Hist! It is not
done yet!
Stepping lightly to one of the little perforations
which had once served as windows to the tower, he
cautiously thrust his head through the opening; and,
after gazing there half a minute, he withdrew it again,
making a gesture to the attentive Wilder to be silent.
The latter complied; nor was it long before the
nature
of the interruption was sufficiently explained.
The silvery voice of woman was first heard at a
little distance; and then, as the speakers drew
nigher
,
the sounds arose directly from beneath, within
the very shadow of the tower. By a sort of tacit
consent, Wilder and the barrister chose spots
favourable
to the execution of such a purpose; and each
continued, during the time the visiters remained near
the ruin, examining their persons, unseen themselves,
and we are sorry we must do so much violence to
the breeding of two such important characters in our
legend, amused and attentive listeners also to their
conversation.
CHAPTER IV.
They fool me to the top of my bent.
Hamlet
.
The
party below consisted of four individuals, all
of whom were females. One was a lady in the
decline
of her years; another was past the middle age;
the third was on the very threshold of what is called
life, as it is applied to intercourse with the world;
and the fourth was a negress, who might have seen
some five-and-twenty revolutions of the seasons.
The latter, at that time, and in that country, of course
appeared only in the character of a humble, though
perhaps favoured domestic.
And now, my child, that I have given you all
the advice which circumstances and your own
excellent
heart need, said the elderly lady, among
the first words that were distinctly intelligible to the
listeners, I will change the ungracious office to one
more agreeable. You will tell your father of my
continued affection, and of the promise he has given,
that you are to return once again, before we separate
for the last time.
This speech was addressed to the younger female,
and was apparently received with as much
tenderness
and sincerity as it was uttered. The one who
was addressed raised her eyes, which were glittering
with tears she evidently struggled to conceal, and
answered in a voice that sounded in the ears of the
two youthful listeners like the notes of the Syren, so
very sweet and musical were its tones.
It is useless to remind me of a promise, my
beloved
aunt, which I have so much interest in
remembering
,
she said. I hope for even more than you
have perhaps dared to wish; if my father does not
return with me in the spring, it shall not be for want
of urging on my part.
Our good Wyllys will lend her aid, returned
the aunt, smiling and bowing to the third female,
with that mixture of suavity and form which was
peculiar to the stately manners of the time, and
which was rarely neglected, when a superior
addressed
an inferior. She is entitled to command
some interest with General Grayson, from her
fidelity
and services.
She is entitled to every thing that love and heart
can give! exclaimed the niece, with a haste and
earnestness that proclaimed how willingly she would
temper the formal politeness of the other by the
warmth of her own affectionate manner; my father
will scarcely refuse
her
any thing.
And have we the assurance of Mrs Wyllys that
she will be in our interests? demanded the aunt,
without permitting her own sense of propriety to be
overcome by the stronger feelings of her niece;
with so powerful an ally, our league will be
invincible
.
I am so entirely of opinion, that the salubrious
air of this healthful island is of great importance
to my young charge, Madam, that, were all other
considerations wanting, the little I can do to aid your
wishes shall be sure to be done.
Wyllys spoke with dignity, and perhaps with some
portion of that reserve which distinguished all the
communications between the wealthy and high-born
aunt and the salaried and dependent governess of
her brother's heiress. Still her manner was gentle,
and the voice, like that of her pupil, soft and
strikingly
feminine.
We may then consider the victory as achieved,
as my late husband the Rear-Admiral was
accustomed
to say. Admiral de Lacey, my dear Mrs Wyllys,
adopted it in early life as a maxim, by which all his
future conduct was governed, and by adhering to
which he acquired no small share of his professional
reputation, that, in order to be successful, it was only
necessary to be determined one would be so;a
noble and inspiriting rule, and one that could not fail
to lead to those signal results which, as we all know
them, I need not mention.
Wyllys bowed her head, in acknowledgment of the
truth of the opinion, and in testimony of the renown
of the deceased Admiral; but did not think it
necessary
to make any reply. Instead of allowing the
subject to occupy her mind any longer, she turned
to her young pupil, and observed, speaking in a voice
and with a manner from which every appearance of
restraint was banished,
Gertrude, my love, you will have pleasure in
returning to this charming island, and to these
cheering
sea breezes.
And to my aunt! exclaimed Gertrude. I wish
my father could be persuaded to dispose of his estates
in Carolina, and come northward, to reside the whole
year.
It is not quite as easy for an affluent proprietor
to remove as you may imagine, my child, returned
Mrs de Lacey. Much as I wish that some such
plan could be adopted, I never press my brother on
the subject. Besides, I am not certain, that, if we
were ever to make another change in the family, it
would not be to return
home
altogether. It is now
more than a century, Mrs Wyllys, since the Graysons
came into the colonies, in a moment of dissatisfaction
with the government in England. My
great-grandfather
,
sir Everard, was displeased with his second
son, and the dissension led my grandfather to the
province of Carolina. But, as the breach has long
since been healed, I often think my brother and
myself
may yet return to the halls of our ancestors.
Much will, however, depend on the manner in which
we dispose of our treasure on this side of the
Atlantic
.
As the really well-meaning, though, perhaps, a
little too much self-satisfied lady concluded her
remark
,
she glanced her eye at the perfectly
unconscious
subject of the close of her speech. Gertrude
had, as usual, when her aunt chose to favour her
governess with any of her family reminiscences,
turned her head aside, and was now offering her
cheek, burning with health, and perhaps a little with
shame, to the cooling influence of the evening breeze.
The instant the voice of Mrs de Lacey had ceased,
she turned hastily to her companions; and, pointing
to a noble-looking ship, whose masts, as it lay in the
inner harbour, were seen rising above the roofs of
the town, she exclaimed, as if glad to change the
subject in any manner,
And yonder gloomy prison is to be our home,
dear Mrs Wyllys, for the next month!
I hope your dislike to the sea has magnified the
time, mildly returned her governess; the passage
between this place and Carolina has been often made
in a shorter period.
That it has been so done, I can testify, resumed
the Admiral's widow, adhering a little
pertinaciously
to a train of thoughts, which, once thoroughly
awakened in her bosom, was not easily diverted into
another channel, since my late estimable and (I
feel certain all who hear me will acquiesce when I
add) gallant husband once conducted a squadron of
his Royal Master, from one extremity of his Majesty's
American dominions to the other, in a time less than
that named by my niece: It may have made some
difference in his speed that he was in pursuit of the
enemies of his King and country, but still the fact
proves that the voyage can be made within the
month.
There is that dreadful Henlopen, with its sandy
shoals and shipwrecks on one hand, and that stream
they call the Gulf on the other! exclaimed
Gertrude
,
with a shudder, and a burst of natural female
terror, which makes timidity sometimes attractive,
when exhibited in the person of youth and beauty.
If it were not for Henlopen, and its gales, and its
shoals, and its gulfs, I could think only of the pleasure
of meeting my father.
Mrs Wyllys, who never encouraged her pupil in
those natural weaknesses, however pretty and
becoming
they might appear to other eyes, turned with
a steady mien to the young lady, as she remarked,
with a brevity and decision that were intended to put
the question of fear at rest for ever,
If all the dangers you appear to apprehend
existed
in reality, the passage would not be made daily,
or even hourly, in safety. You have often, Madam,
come from the Carolinas by sea, in company with
Admiral de Lacey?
Never, the widow promptly and a little drily
remarked. The water has not agreed with my
constitution, and I have never neglected to journey
by land. But then you know, Wyllys, as the
consort
and relict of a flag-officer, it was not seemly
that I should be ignorant of naval science. I believe
there are few ladies in the British empire who are
more familiar with ships, either singly or in
squadron
,
particularly the latter, than myself. This
information
I have naturally acquired, as the
companion
of an officer, whose fortune it was to lead fleets.
I presume these are matters of which you are
profoundly
ignorant.
The calm, dignified countenance of Wyllys, on
which it would seem as if long cherished and painful
recollections had left a settled, but mild expression
of sorrow, that rather tempered than destroyed the
traces of character which were still remarkable in
her firm collected eye, became clouded, for a
moment
,
Vol. I. F
with a deeper shade of melancholy. After
hesitating, as if willing to change the subject, she
replied,
I have not been altogether a stranger to the sea.
It has been my lot to have made many long, and
some perilous voyages.
As a mere passenger. But we wives of sailors
only, among our sex, can lay claim to any real
knowledge of the noble profession! What natural
object is there, or can there be, exclaimed the
nautical
dowager, in a burst of professional enthusiasm,
finer than a stately ship breasting the billows, as I
have heard the Admiral say a thousand times, its
taffrail ploughing the main, and its cut-water gliding
after, like a sinuous serpent pursuing its shining
wake, as a living creature choosing its path on the
land, and leaving the bone under its fore-foot, a
beacon
for those that follow? I know not, my dear
Wyllys, if I make myself intelligible to you, but, to
my instructed eye, this charming description conveys
a picture of all that is grand and beautiful!
The latent smile, on the countenance of the
governess
,
might have betrayed that she was imagining
the deceased Admiral had not been altogether devoid
of the waggery of his vocation, had not a slight noise,
which sounded like the rustling of the wind, but
which in truth was suppressed laughter, proceeded
from the upper room of the tower. The words, It
is lovely! were still on the lips of the youthful
Gertrude, who saw all the beauty of the picture her
aunt had essayed to describe, without descending to
the humble employment of verbal criticism. But
her voice became hushed, and her attitude that of
startled attention:
Did you hear nothing? she said.
The rats have not yet altogether deserted the
mill, was the calm reply of Wyllys.
Mill! my dear Mrs Wyllys, will you persist in
calling this picturesque ruin
a mill?
However fatal it may be to its charms, in the
eyes of eighteen, I must call it
a mill
.
Ruins are not so plenty in this country, my dear
governess, returned her pupil, laughing, while the
ardour of her eye denoted how serious she was in
defending her favourite opinion, as to justify us in
robbing them of any little claims to interest they may
happen to possess.
Then, happier is the country! Ruins in a land
are, like most of the signs of decay in the human
form, sad evidences of abuses and passions, which
have hastened the inroads of time. These provinces
are like yourself, my Gertrude, in their freshness and
their youth, and, comparatively, in their innocence
also. Let us hope for both a long, an useful, and a
happy existence.
Thank you for myself, and for my country; but
still I can never admit this picturesque ruin has been
a mill
.
Whatever it may have been, it has long occupied
its present place, and has the appearance of
continuing
where it is much longer, which is more than can
be said of our prison, as you call yonder stately ship,
in which we are so soon to embark. Unless my eyes
deceive me, Madam, those masts are moving slowly
past the chimnies of the town.
You are very right, Wyllys. The seamen are
towing the vessel into the outer harbour, where they
will warp her fast to the anchors, and thus secure
her, until they shall be ready to unmake their sails,
in order to put to sea in the morning. This is a
manuvre often performed, and one which the
Admiral
has so clearly explained, that I should find little
difficulty in superintending it in my own person,
were it suitable to my sex and station.
This is, then, a hint that all our own
preparations
are not completed. However lovely this spot
may seem, Gertrude, we must now leave it, for some
months at least.
Yes, continued Mrs de Lacey, slowly following
the footsteps of the governess, who had already
moved
from beneath the ruin; whole fleets have often
been towed to their anchors, and there warped,
waiting
for wind and tide to serve. None of our sex
know the dangers of the Ocean, but we who have
been bound in the closest of all ties to officers of
rank and great service; and none others can ever
truly enjoy the real grandeur of the ennobling
profession
.
A charming object is a vessel cutting the
waves with her taffrail, and chasing her wake on the
trackless waters, like a courser that ever keeps in
his path, though dashing madly on at the very top of
his speed!
The reply of Mrs Wyllys was not audible to the
covert listeners. Gertrude had followed her
companions
;
but, when at some little distance from the
tower, she paused, to take a parting look at its
mouldering
walls. A profound stillness succeeded for
more than a minute.
There is something in that pile of stones,
Cassandra
,
she said to the jet-black maiden at her
elbow
,
that could make me wish it had been
something
more than a mill.
There rat in 'em, returned the literal and
simple-minded
black; you hear what Misse Wyllys
say?
Gertrude turned, laughed, patted the dark cheek
of her attendant, with fingers that looked like snow
by the contrast, as if to chide her for wishing to
destroy
the pleasing illusion she would so gladly
harbour
,
and then bounded down the hill after her aunt
and governess, like a joyous and youthful Atalanta.
The two singularly consorted listeners in the
tower
stood gazing, at their respective look-outs, so long
as the smallest glimpse of the flowing robe of her
light form was to be seen; and then they turned to
each other, and stood confronted, the eyes of each
endeavouring to read the expression of his
neighbour's
countenance.
I am ready to make an affidavit before my Lord
High Chancellor, suddenly exclaimed the barrister,
that this has never been a mill!
Your opinion has undergone a sudden change!
I am open to conviction, as I hope to be a judge.
The case has been argued by a powerful advocate,
and I have lived to see my error.
And yet there are rats in the place.
Land rats, or water rats? quickly demanded
the other, giving his companion one of those startling
and searching glances, which his keen eye had so
freely at command.
Both, I believe, was the dry and caustic reply;
certainly the former, or the gentlemen of the long
robe are much injured by report.
The barrister laughed; nor did his temper appear
in the slightest degree ruffled at so free an allusion at
his learned and honourable profession.
You gentlemen of the Ocean have such an
honest
and amusing frankness about you, he said, that
I vow to God you are overwhelming. I am a
down-right
admirer of your noble calling, and something
skilled in its terms. What spectacle, for instance,
can be finer than a noble ship `stemming the waves
with her taffrail,' and chasing her wake, like a racer
on the course!
Leaving the `bone in her mouth' under her stern,
as a light-house for all that come after!
Then, as if they found singular satisfaction in
dwelling on these images of the worthy relict of the
gallant Admiral, they broke out simultaneously into
a fit of clamorous merriment, that caused the old
F 2
ruin to ring, as in its best days of windy power. The
barrister was the first to regain his self-command, for
the mirth of the young mariner was joyous, and
without the least restraint.
But this is dangerous ground for any but a
seaman's
widow to touch, the former observed, as
suddenly
causing his laughter to cease as he had
admitted
of its indulgence. The younger, she who is no
lover of a mill, is a rare and lovely creature! it
would seem that she is the niece of the nautical
critic.
The young mariner ceased laughing in his turn,
as though he were suddenly convinced of the glaring
impropriety of making so near a relative of the fair
vision he had seen the subject of his merriment.
Whatever might have been his secret thoughts, he
was content with replying,
She so declared herself.
Tell me, said the barrister, walking close to the
other, like one who communicated an important
secret
in the question, was there not something
remarkable
,
searching, extraordinary, heart-touching,
in the voice of her they called Wyllys?
Did you note it?
It sounded to me like the tones of an oracle
the whisperings of fancythe very words of truth!
It was a strange and persuasive voice!
I confess I felt its influence, and in a way for
which I cannot account!
It amounts to infatuation! returned the
barrister
,
pacing up and down the little apartment, every
trace of humour and irony having disappeared in a
look of settled and abstracted care. His companion
appeared little disposed to interrupt his meditations,
but stood leaning against the naked walls, himself
the subject of deep and sorrowful reflection. At
length the former shook off his air of thought, with
that startling quickness which seemed common to
his manner; he approached a window, and,
directing
the attention of Wilder to the ship in the outer
harbour, abruptly demanded,
Has all your interest in yon vessel ceased?
Far from it; it is just such a boat as a seaman's
eye most loves to study!
Will you venture to board her?
At this hour? alone? I know not her
commander
,
or her people.
There are other hours beside this, and a sailor
is certain of a frank reception from his messmates.
These slavers are not always willing to be
boarded
;
they carry arms, and know how to keep
strangers
at a distance.
Are there no watch-words, in the masonry of
your trade, by which a brother is known? Such
terms as `stemming the waves with the taffrail,' for
instance, or some of those knowing phrases we have
lately heard?
Wilder kept his own keen look on the
countenance
of the other, as he thus questioned him, and
seemed to ponder long before he ventured on a
reply.
Why do you demand all this of me? he coldly
asked.
Because, as I believe that `faint heart never won
fair lady,' so do I believe that indecision never won
a ship. You wish a situation, you say; and, if I were
an Admiral, I would make you my flag-captain. At
the assizes, when we wish a brief, we have our
manner of letting the thing be known. But
perhaps
I am talking too much at random for an utter
stranger. You will however remember, that, though
it is the advice of a lawyer, it is given gratuitously.
And is it the more to be relied on for such
extraordinary
liberality?
Of that you must judge for yourself, said the
stranger in green, very deliberately putting his foot
on the ladder, and descending, until no part of his
person but his head was seen. Here I go, literally
cutting the waves with my taffrail, he added, as he
descended backwards, and seeming to take great
pleasure in laying particular emphasis on the words.
Adieu, my friend; if we do not meet again, I
enjoin
you never to forget the rats in the Newport
ruin.
He disappeared as he concluded, and in another
instant his light form was on the ground. Turning
with the most admirable coolness, he gave the bottom
of the ladder a trip with one of his feet, and laid the
only means of descent prostrate on the earth. Then,
looking up at the wondering Wilder, he nodded his
head familiarly, repeated his adieu, and passed with
a swift step from beneath the arches.
This is extraordinary conduct, muttered
Wilder
,
who was by the process left a prisoner in the
ruin. After ascertaining that a fail from the trap
might endanger his legs, the young sailor ran to one
of the windows of the place, in order to reproach
his treacherous comrade, or indeed to assure himself
that he was serious in thus deserting him. The
barrister
was already out of hailing distance, and, before
Wilder had time to decide on what course to take,
his active footsteps had led him into the skirts of the
town, among the buildings of which his person became
immediately lost to the eye.
During all the time occupied by the foregoing
scenes and dialogue, Fid and the negro had been
diligently
discussing the contents of the bag, under the
fence where they were last seen. As the appetite of
the former became appeased, his didactic disposition
returned, and, at the precise moment when Wilder
was left alone in the tower, he was intently engaged
in admonishing the black on the delicate subject of
behaviour in mixed society.
And so you see, Guinea, he concluded, in
order
to keep a weather-helm in company, you are
never to throw all aback, and go stern foremost out
of a dispute, as you have this day seen fit to do.
According to my l'arning, that Master Nightingale is
better in a bar-room than in a squall; and if you had
just luffed-up on his quarter, when you saw me
laying
myself athwart his hawse in the argument, you
see we should have given him a regular jam in the
discourse, and then the fellow would have been
shamed in the eyes of all the by-standers. Who
hails? what cook is sticking his neighbour's pig
now?
Lor'! Misser Fid, cried the black, here
masser
Harry, wid a head out of port-hole, up dereaway
in a light-house, singing-out like a marine in a boat
wid a plug out!
Ay, ay, let him alone for hailing a top-gallant
yard, or a flying-jib-boom! The lad has a voice like
a French horn, when he has a mind to tune it! And
what the devil is he manning the guns of that
weather-beaten
wreck for? At-all events, if he has to fight
his craft alone, there is no one to blame but himself,
since he has gone to quarters without beat of drum,
or without, in any other manner, seeing fit to muster
his people.
As Dick and the negro had both been making the
best of their way towards the ruin, from the moment
they discovered the situation of their friend, by this
time they were within speaking distance of the spot
itself. Wilder, in those brief, pithy tones that
distinguish
the manner in which a sea officer issues his
orders, directed them to raise the ladder. When he
was liberated, he demanded, with a sufficiently
significant
air, if they had observed the direction in
which the stranger in green had made his retreat?
Do you mean the chap in boots, who was for
shoving his oar into another man's rullock, a bit ago,
on the small matter of wharf, hereaway, in a range,
over yonder house, bringing the north-east chimney
to bear in a line, with the
mizen-top-gallant-mast-head
of that ship they are warping into the stream?
The very same.
He made a slant on the wind until he had
weathered
yonder bit of a barn, and then he tacked and
stretched away off here to the east-and-by-south,
going large, and with studding sails alow and aloft,
as I think, for he made a devil of a head-way.
Follow, cried Wilder, starting forward in the
direction indicated by Fid, without waiting to hear
any more of the other's characteristic explanations.
The search, however, was vain. Although they
continued their inquiries until long after the sun had
set, no one could give them the smallest tidings of
what had become of the stranger in green. Some
had seen him, and marvelled at his singular costume,
and bold and wandering look; but, by all accounts,
he had disappeared from the town as strangely and
mysteriously as he had entered it.
CHAPTER V.
Are you so brave? I'll have you talked with anon.
Coriolanus
.
The
good people of the town of Newport sought
their rest at an early hour. They were remarkable
for that temperance and discretion which, even to
this day, distinguish the manners of the inhabitants
of New-England. By ten, the door of every house
in the place was closed for the night; and it is quite
probable, that, before another hour had passed,
scarcely an eye was open, among all those which,
throughout the day, had been sufficiently alert, not
only to superintend the interests of their proper
owners, but to spare some wholesome glances at the
concerns of the rest of the neighbourhood.
The landlord of the Foul Anchor, as the inn,
where Fid and Nightingale had so nearly come to
blows, was called, scrupulously closed his doors at
eight; a sort of expiation, by which he endeavoured
to atone, while he slept, for any moral peccadillos
that he might have committed during the day.
Indeed
,
it was to be observed as a rule, that those who
had the most difficulty in maintaining their good
name, on the score of temperance and moderation,
were the most rigid in withdrawing, in season, from
the daily cares of the world. The Admiral's widow
had given no little scandal, in her time, because lights
were so often seen burning in her house long after
the hour prescribed by custom for their extinction.
Indeed, there were several other little particulars in
which this good lady had rendered herself obnoxious
to the whispered remarks of some of her female
visitants
.
An Episcopalian herself, she was always
observed
to be employed with her needle on the evenings
of Saturdays, though by no means distinguished for
her ordinary industry. It was, however, a sort of
manner
the good lady had of exhibiting her adherence
to the belief that the night of Sunday was the
orthodox
evening of the Sabbath. On this subject there
was, in truth, a species of silent warfare between
herself and the wife of the principal clergyman of
the town. It resulted, happily, in no very striking
marks of hostility. The latter was content to
retaliate
,
by bringing her work, on the evenings of
Sundays
,
to the house of the dowager, and occasionally
interrupting their discourse, by a diligent application
of the needle for some five or six minutes at a time.
Against this contamination Mrs de Lacey took no
other precaution than to play with the leaves of a
prayer book, precisely on the principle that one
uses holy water to keep the devil at that distance
which the Church has considered safest for its
proselytes
.
Let these matters be as they would, by ten o'clock
on the night of the day our tale commences, the
town of Newport was as still as though it did not
contain a living soul. Watchmen there were none;
for roguery had not yet begun to thrive openly in
the provinces. When, therefore, Wilder and his
two companions issued, at that hour, from their
place of retirement into the empty streets, they
found them as still as if man had never trod there.
Not a candle was to be seen, nor the smallest
evidence
of human life to be heard. It would seem
our adventurers knew their errand well; for, instead
of knocking up any of the drowsy publicans to
demand
admission, they held their way steadily to the
water's side; Wilder leading, Fid coming next, and
Scipio, in conformity to all usage, bringing up the
rear, in his ordinary, quiet, submissive manner.
At the margin of the water they found several
small boats, moored under the shelter of a
neighbouring
wharf. Wilder gave his companions their
directions, and walked to a place convenient for
embarking. After waiting the necessary time, the
bows of two boats came to the land at the same
moment, one of which was governed by the hands
of the negro, and the other by those of Fid.
How's this? demanded Wilder; Is not one
enough? There is some mistake between you.
No mistake at all, responded Dick, suffering
his oar to float on its blade, and running his fingers
into his hair, as if he was content with his
achievement
;
no more mistake than there is in taking the
sun on a clear day and in smooth water. Guinea
is in the boat you hired; but a bad bargain you
made of it, as I thought at the time; and so, as
`better late than never' is my rule, I have just been
casting an eye over all the craft; if this is not the
tightest and fastest rowing clipper of them all, then
am I no judge; and yet the parish priest would tell
you, if he were here, that my father was a
boat-builder
,
ay, and swear it too; that is to say, if you
paid him well for the same.
Fellow, returned Wilder, angrily, you will
one day induce me to turn you adrift. Return the
boat to the place where you found it, and see it
secured
in the same manner as before.
Turn me adrift! deliberately repeated Fid,
that would be cutting all your weather lanyards at
one blow, master Harry. Little good would come
of Scipio Africa and you, after I should part
company
.
Have you ever fairly logg'd the time we have
sailed together?
Ay, have I; but it is possible to break even a
friendship of twenty years.
Saving your presence, master Harry, I'll be
dd if I believe any such thing. Here is Guinea,
who is no better than a nigger, and therein far from
being a fitting messmate to a white man; but, being
used to look at his black face for four-and-twenty
years, d'ye see, the colour has got into my eye, and
now it suits as well as another. Then, at sea, in a
dark night, it is not so easy a matter to tell the
difference
.
No, no, I am not tired of you yet, master
Harry; and it is no trifle that shall part us.
Then, abandon your habit of making free with
the property of others.
I abandon nothing. No man can say he ever
knowed me to quit a deck while a plank stuck to
the beams; and shall I abandon, as you call it, my
rights? What is the mighty matter, that all hands
must be called to see an old sailor punished? You
gave a lubberly fisherman, a fellow who has never
been in deeper water than his own line will sound,
you gave him, I say, a glittering spaniard, just for the
Vol. I. G
use of a bit of a skiff for the night, or, mayhap, for a
small reach into the morning. Well, what does Dick
do? He says to himselffor de if he's any
blab to run round a ship grumbling at his officer
so, he just says to himself, `That's too much;' and
he looks about, to find the worth of it in some of the
fisherman's neighbours. Money can be eaten; and,
what is better, it may be drunk; therefore, it is not
to be pitched overboard with the cook's ashes. I'll
warrant me, if the truth could be fairly come by, it
would be found, that, as to the owners of this here
yawl, and that there skiff, their mothers are cousins,
and that the dollar will go in snuff and strong drink
among the whole familyso, no great harm done,
after all.
Wilder made an impatient gesture to the other to
obey, and walked up the bank, while he had time to
comply. Fid never disputed a positive and distinct
order, though he often took so much discretionary
latitude in executing those which were less precise.
He did not hesitate, therefore, to return the boat;
but he did not carry his subordination so far as to
do it without complaint. When this act of justice
was performed, Wilder entered the skiff; and,
seeing
that his companions were seated at their oars, he
bade them to pull down the harbour, admonishing
them, at the same time, to make as little noise as
possible.
The night I rowed you into Louisbourg,
a-reconnoitring
,
said Fid, thrusting his left hand into his
bosom, while, with his right, he applied sufficient
force to the light oar to make the skiff glide swiftly
over the waterthat night we muffled every thing,
even to our tongues. When there is occasion to put
stoppers on the mouths of a boat's crew, why, I'm
not the man to gainsay it; but, as I am one of them
that thinks tongues were just as much made to talk
with, as the sea was made to live on, I uphold rational
conversation in sober society. S'ip, you Guinea,
where are you shoving the skiff to? hereaway lies
the island, and you are for going into yonder bit of
a church.
Lay on your oars, interrupted Wilder; let
the boat drift by this vessel.
They were now in the act of passing the ship,
which had been warping from the wharfs to an
anchorage
,
and in which the young sailor had so
clandestinely
heard that Mrs Wyllys and the fascinating
Gertrude were to embark, on the following morning,
for the distant province of Carolina. As the skiff
floated past, Wilder examined the vessel, by the dim
light of the stars, with a seaman's eye. No part of
her hull, her spars, or her rigging, escaped his notice;
and, when the whole became confounded, by the
distance, in one dark mass of shapeless matter, he
leaned his head over the side of his little bark, and
mused long and deeply with himself. To this
abstraction
Fid presumed to offer no interruption. It
had the appearance of professional duty; a subject
that, in his eyes, was endowed with a species of
character that might be called sacred. Scipio was
habitually silent. After losing many minutes in this
manner, Wilder suddenly regained his recollection,
and abruptly observed,
It is a tall ship, and one that should make a long
chase!
That's as may be, returned the ready Fid.
Should that fellow get a free wind, and his canvas
all abroad, it might worry a King's cruiser to get
nigh enough to throw the iron on his decks; but
jamm'd up close hauled, why, I'd engage to lay on
his weather quarter, with the saucy He
Boys, interrupted Wilder, it is now proper
that you should know something of my future
movements
.
We have been shipmates, I might almost
say messmates, for more than twenty years. I was
no better than an infant, Fid, when you brought me
to the commander of your ship, and not only was
instrumental in saving my life, but in putting me into
a situation to make an officer.
Ay, ay, you were no great matter, master Harry,
as to bulk; and a short hammock served your turn
as well as the captain's birth.
I owe you a heavy debt, Fid, for that one
generous
act, and something, I may add, for your steady
adherence to me since.
Why, yes, I've been pretty steady in my
conduct
,
master Harry, in this here business, more
particularly
,
seeing that I have never let go my
grapplings
,
though you've so often sworn to turn me
adrift. As for Guinea, here, the chap makes fair
weather with you, blow high or blow low, whereas
it is no hard matter to get up a squall between us,
as might be seen in that small affair about the
boat;
Say no more of it, interrupted Wilder, whose
feelings appeared sensibly touched, as his
recollections
ran over long-past and bitterly-remembered
scenes: You know that little else than death can
part us, unless indeed you choose to quit me now.
It is right that you should know that I am engaged
in a desperate pursuit, and one that may easily end
in ruin to myself and all who accompany me. I feel
reluctant to separate from you, my friends, for it may
be a final parting, but, at the same time, you should
know all the danger.
Is there much more travelling by land? bluntly
demanded Fid.
No; the duty, such as it is, will be done entirely
on the water.
Then bring forth your ship's books, and find room
for such a mark as a pair of crossed anchors, which
stand for all the same as so many letters reading
Richard Fid.'
But perhaps, when you know
I want to know nothing about it, master Harry.
Haven't I sailed with you often enough under sealed
orders, to trust my old body once more in your
company
,
without forgetting my duty? What say you,
Guinea? will you ship? or shall we land you at once,
on yonder bit of a low point, and leave you to scrape
acquaintance with the clams?
'Em berry well off, here, muttered the
perfectly
contented negro.
Ay, ay, Guinea is like the launch of one of the
coasters, always towing in your wake, master Harry;
whereas I am often luffing athwart your hawse, or
getting foul, in some fashion or other, on one of your
quarters. Howsomever, we are both shipped, as
you see, in this here cruise, with the particulars of
which we are both well satisfied. So pass the word
among us, what is to be done next, and no more
parley.
Remember the cautions you have already
received
,
returned Wilder, who saw that the devotion
of his followers was too infinite to need quickening,
and who knew, from long and perilous experience,
how implicitly he might rely on their fidelity,
notwithstanding
certain failings, that were perhaps
peculiar
to their condition; remember what I have
already given in charge; and now pull directly for yon
ship in the outer harbour.
Fid and the black promptly complied; and the
boat was soon skimming the water between the
little
island and what might, by comparison, be called
the main. As they approached the vessel, the strokes
of the oars were moderated, and finally abandoned
altogether, Wilder preferring to let the skiff drop
down with the tide upon the object he wished well
to examine before venturing to board.
Has not that ship her nettings triced to the
rigging
?
he demanded, in a voice that was lowered to
G 2
the tones necessary to escape observation, and which
betrayed, at the same time, the interest he took in
the reply.
According to my sight, she has, returned Fid;
your slavers are a little pricked by conscience, and
are never over-bold, unless when they are chasing a
young nigger on the coast of Congo. Now, there is
about as much danger of a Frenchman's looking in
here to-night, with this land breeze and clear sky, as
there is of my being made Lord High Admiral of
England; a thing not likely to come to pass soon,
seeing that the King don't know a great deal of my
merit.
They are, to a certainty, ready to give a warm
reception to any boarders! continued Wilder, who
rarely paid much attention to the amplifications with
which Fid so often saw fit to embellish the discourse.
It would be no easy matter to carry a ship thus
prepared, if her people were true to themselves.
I warrant ye there is a full quarter-watch at least
sleeping among her guns, at this very moment, with
a bright look-out from her cat-heads and taffrail. I
was once on the weather fore-yard-arm of the Hebe,
when I made, hereaway to the south-west, a sail
coming large upon us,
Hist! they are stirring on her decks!
To be sure they are. The cook is splitting a
log; the captain has sung out for his night-cap.
The voice of Fid was lost in a summons from the
ship, that sounded like the roaring of some sea
monster
,
which had unexpectedly raised its head above
the water. The practised ears of our adventurers
instantly comprehended it to be, what it truly was,
the manner in which it was not unusual to hail a
boat. Without taking time to ascertain that the
plashing of oars was to be heard in the distance,
Wilder raised his form in the skiff, and answered.
How now? exclaimed the same strange voice;
there is no one victualled aboard here that speaks
thus. Whereaway are you, he that answers?
A little on your larboard bow; here, in the
shadow of the ship.
And what are ye about, within the sweep of my
hawse?
Cutting the waves with my taffrail, returned
Wilder, after a moment's hesitation.
What fool has broke adrift here! muttered his
interrogator. Pass a blunderbuss forward, and
let us see if a civil answer can't be drawn from the
fellow.
Hold! said a calm but authoritative voice from
the most distant part of the ship; it is as it should
be; let them approach.
The man in the bows of the vessel bade them
come along side, and then the conversation ceased.
Wilder had now an opportunity to discover, that, as
the hail had been intended for another boat, which
was still at a distance, he had answered prematurely.
But, perceiving that it was too late to retreat with
safety, or perhaps only acting in conformity to his
original determination, he directed his companions
to obey.
`Cutting the waves with the taffrail,' is not the
civillest answer a man can give to a hail, muttered
Fid, as he dropped the blade of his oar into the
water; nor is it a matter to be logged in a man's
memory, that they have taken offence at the same.
Howsomever, master Harry, if they are so minded
as to make a quarrel about the thing, give them as
good as they send, and count on manly backers.
No reply was made to this encouraging assurance;
for, by this time, the skiff was within a few feet of the
ship. Wilder ascended the side of the vessel amid
a deep, and, as he felt it to be, an ominous silence.
The night was dark, though enough light fell from
the stars, that were here and there visible, to render
objects sufficiently distinct to the practised eyes of a
seaman. When our young adventurer touched the
deck, he cast a hurried and scrutinizing look about
him, as if doubts and impressions, which had long
been harboured, were all to be resolved by that first
view.
An ignorant landsman would have been struck
with the order and symmetry with which the tall
spars rose towards the heavens, from the black mass
of the hull, and with the rigging that hung in the
air, one dark line crossing another, until all design
seemed confounded in the confusion and intricacy of
the studied maze. But to Wilder these familiar
objects
furnished no immediate attraction. His first
rapid glance had, like that of all seamen, it is true,
been thrown upward, but it was instantly succeeded
by the brief, though keen, examination to which we
have just alluded. With the exception of one who,
though his form was muffled in a large sea-cloak,
seemed to be an officer, not a living creature was to
be seen on the decks. On either side there was a
dark, frowning battery, arranged in the beautiful and
imposing order of marine architecture; but nowhere
could he find a trace of the crowd of human beings
which usually throng the deck of an armed ship, or
that was necessary to render the engines effective.
It might be that her people were in their hammocks,
as usual at that hour, but still it was customary to
leave a sufficient number on the watch, to look to
the safety of the vessel. Finding himself so
unexpectedly
confronted with a single individual, our
adventurer began to be sensible of the awkwardness
of his situation, and of the necessity of some
explanation
.
You are no doubt surprised, sir, he said, at
the lateness of the hour that I have chosen for my
visit.
You were certainly expected earlier, was the
laconic answer.
Expected!
Ay, expected. Have I not seen you, and your
two companions who are in the boat, reconnoitring
us half the day, from the wharfs of the town, and
even from the old tower on the hill? What did all
this curiosity foretel, but an intention to come on
board?
This is odd, I will acknowledge! exclaimed
Wilder, in some secret alarm. And, then, you had
notice of my intentions?
Hark ye, friend, interrupted the other,
indulging
in a short, low laugh; from your outfit and
appearance
,
I think I am right in calling you a seaman:
Do you imagine that glasses were forgotten in the
inventory of this ship? or, do you fancy that we don't
know how to use them?
You must have strong reasons for looking so
deeply into the movements of strangers on the land.
Hum! Perhaps we expect our cargo from the
country. But I suppose you have not come so far
in the dark to look at our manifest. You would see
the Captain?
Do I not see him?
Where? demanded the other, with a start that
manifested he stood in a salutary awe of his
superior
.
In yourself.
I! I have not got so high in the books, though
my time may come yet, some fair day. Hark ye,
friend; you passed under the stern of yonder ship,
which has been hauling into the stream, in coming
out to us?
Certainly; she lies, as you see, directly in my
course.
A wholesome-looking craft that! and one well
found, I warrant you. She is quite ready to be off,
they tell me.
It would so seem: her sails are bent, and she
floats like a ship that is full.
Of what? abruptly demanded the other.
Of articles mentioned in her manifest, no doubt.
But you seem light yourself: if you are to load at
this port, it will be some days before you put to sea.
Hum! I don't think we shall be long after our
neighbour, the other remarked, a little drily.
Then, as if he might have said too much, he added
hastily, We slavers carry little else, you know,
than our shackles and a few extra tierces of rice;
the rest of our ballast is made up of these guns, and
the stuff to put into them.
And is it usual for ships in the trade to carry so
heavy an armament?
Perhaps it is, perhaps not. To own the truth,
there is not much law on the coast, and the strong
arm often does as much as the right. Our owners,
therefore, I believe, think it quite as well there
should be no lack of guns and ammunition on board.
They should also give you people to work
them.
They have forgotten that part of their wisdom,
certainly.
His words were nearly drowned by the same gruff
voice that had brought-to the skiff of Wilder, which
sent another hoarse summons across the water,
rolling
out sounds that were intended to say,
Boat, ahoy!
The answer was quick, short, and nautical; but
it was rendered in a low and cautious tone. The
individual, with whom Wilder had been holding such
equivocating parlance, seemed embarrassed by the
sudden interruption, and a little at a loss to know
how to conduct himself. He had already made a
motion to wards leading his visiter to the cabin, when
the sounds of oars were heard clattering in a boat
along side of the ship, announcing that he was too
late. Bidding the other remain where he was, he
sprang to the gangway, in order to receive those
who had just arrived.
By this sudden desertion, Wilder found himself in
entire possession of that part of the vessel where he
stood. It gave him a better opportunity to renew
his examination, and to cast a scrutinizing eye also
over the new comers.
Some five or six athletic-looking seamen ascended
from the boat, in profound silence. A short and
whispered conference took place between them and
their officer, who appeared both to receive a report,
and to communicate an order. When these
preliminary
matters were ended, a line was lowered, from
a whip on the main-yard, the end evidently dropping
into the newly-arrived boat. In a moment, the
burthen
it was intended to transfer to the ship was seen
swinging in the air, midway between the water and
the spar. It then slowly descended, inclining
in-board
,
until it was safely, and somewhat carefully,
landed on the decks of the vessel.
During the whole of this process, which in itself
had nothing extraordinary or out of the daily
practice
of large vessels in port, Wilder had strained his
eyes, until they appeared nearly ready to start from
their sockets. The black mass, which had been
lifted from the boat, seemed, while it lay against the
back-ground of sky, to possess the proportions of the
human form. The seamen gathered about this
object
.
After much bustle, and a good deal of low
conversation, the burthen or body, whichever it
might be called, was raised by the men, and the
whole disappeared together, behind the masts, boats,
and guns which crowded the forward part of the
vessel.
The whole event was of a character to attract
the attention of Wilder. His eye was not, however,
so intently riveted on the groupe in the gangway, as
to prevent his detecting a dozen black objects, that
were suddently thrust forward, from behind the spars
and other dark masses of the vessel. They might
be blocks swinging in the air, but they bore also a
wonderful resemblance to human heads. The
simultaneous
manner in which they both appeared and
disappeared, served to confirm this impression; nor,
to confess the truth, had our adventurer any doubt
that curiosity had drawn so many inquiring
countenances
from their respective places of concealment.
He had not much leisure, however, to reflect on all
these little accompaniments of his situation, before
he was rejoined by his former companion, who, to
all appearance, was again left, with himself, to the
entire possession of the deck.
You know the trouble of getting off the people
from the shore, the officer observed, when a ship
is ready to sail.
You seem to have a summary method of
hoisting
them in, returned Wilder.
Ah! you speak of the fellow on the whip? Your
eyes are good, friend, to tell a jack-knife from a
marling-spike, at this distance. But the lad was
mutinous; that is, not absolutely mutinousbut,
drunk. As mutinous as a man can well be, who can
neither speak, sit, nor stand.
Then, as if as well content with his humour as
with this simple explanation, the other laughted and
chuckled, in a manner that showed he was in
perfect
good humour with himself.
But all this time you are left on deck, he
quickly
added, and the Captain is waiting your
appearance
in the cabin: Follow; I will be your pilot.
Hold, said Wilder; will it not be as well to
announce my visit?
He knows it already: Little takes place aboard,
here, that does not reach his ears before it gets into
the log-book.
Wilder made no further objection, but indicated
his readiness to proceed. The other led the way to
the bulkhead which separated the principal cabin
from the quarter-deck of the ship; and, pointing to
a door, he rather whispered than said aloud,
Tap twice; if he answer, go in.
Wilder did as he was directed. His first summons
was either unheard or disregarded. On repeating
it, he was bid to enter. The young seaman opened
the door, with a crowd of sensations, that will find
their solution in the succeeding parts of our
narrative
,
and instantly stood, under the light of a
powerful
lamp, in the presence of the stranger in green.
CHAPTER VI.
The good old plan,
That they should get, who have the power,
And they should keep, who can.
Wordsworth
.
The
apartment, in which our adventurer now
found himself, afforded no bad illustration of the
character of its occupant. In its form, and
proportions
,
it was a cabin of the usual size and
arrangements
;
but, in its furniture and equipments, it
exhibited
a singular admixture of luxury and martial
preparation. The lamp, which swung from the
upper deck, was of solid silver; and, though
adapted
to its present situation by mechanical ingenuity,
there was that, in its shape and ornaments, which
betrayed it had once been used before some shrine
of a far more sacred character. Massive
candle-sticks
,
of the same precious metal, and which
partook
of the same ecclesiastical formation, were on a
venerable table, whose mahogany was glittering with
Vol. I. H
the polish of half a century, and whose gilded claws,
and carved supporters, bespoke an original
destination
very different from the ordinary service of a
ship. A couch, covered with cut velvet, stood
along the transom; while a divan, of blue silk, lay
against the bulkhead opposite, manifesting, by its
fashion, its materials, and its piles of pillows, that
even Asia had been made to contribute to the ease
of its luxurious owner. In addition to these prominent
articles, there were cut glass, mirrors, plate, and even
hangings; each of which, by something peculiar in
its fashion or materials, bespoke an origin different
from that of its neighbour. In short, splendour and
elegance seemed to have been much more consulted
than propriety, or conformity in taste, in the
selection
of most of those articles, which had been, oddly
enough, made to contribute to the caprice or to the
comfort of their singular possessor.
In the midst of this medley of wealth and luxury,
appeared the frowning appendages of war. The
cabin included four of those dark cannon whose
weight and number had been first to catch the
attention of Wilder. Notwithstanding they were
placed in such close proximity to the articles of ease
just enumerated, it only needed a seaman's eye to
perceive that they stood ready for instant service,
and that five minutes of preparation would strip the
place of all its tinsel, and leave it a warm and well
protected battery. Pistols, sabres, half-pikes,
boarding-axes
,
and all the minor implements of marine
warfare, were arranged about the cabin in such a
manner as to aid in giving it an appearance of wild
embellishment, while, at the same time, each was
convenient to the hand.
Around the mast was placed a stand of muskets;
and strong wooden bars, that were evidently made
to fit in brackets on either side of the door,
sufficiently
showed that the bulkhead might easily be
converted into a barrier. The entire arrangement
proclaimed that the cabin was considered the
citadel
of the ship. In support of this latter opinion,
appeared a hatch, which evidently communicated
with the apartments of the inferior officers, and
which also opened a direct passage into the magazine.
These dispositions, a little different from what he had
been accustomed to see, instantly struck the eye of
Wilder, though leisure was not then given to reflect
on their uses and objects.
There was a latent expression of satisfaction,
something modified, perhaps, by irony, on the
countenance
of the stranger in green, (for he was still
clad as when first introduced to the reader,) as he
arose, on the entrance of his visiter. The two stood
several moments without speaking, when the
pretended
barrister saw fit to break the awkward
silence.
To what happy circumstance is this ship
indebted
for the honour of such a visit? he demanded.
I believe I may answer, To the invitation of her
Captain, Wilder answered, with a steadiness and
calmness equal to that displayed by the other.
Did he show you his commission, in assuming
that office? They say, at sea, I believe, that no
cruiser should be found without a commission.
And what say they at the universities on this
material point?
I see I may as well lay aside my gown, and own
the marling-spike! returned the other, smiling.
There is something about the trade
profession
,
though, I believe, is your favourite wordthere is
something about the profession, which betrays us to
each other. Yes, Mr Wilder, he added with
dignity
motioning to his guest to imitate his example,
and take a seat, I am, like yourself, a seaman bred;
and happy am I to add, the Commander of this
gallant
vessel.
Then, must you admit that I have not intruded
without a sufficient warrant.
I confess the same. My ship has filled your eye
agreeably; nor shall I be slow to acknowledge, that
I have seen enough about your air, and person, to
make me wish to be an older acquaintance. You
want service?
One should be ashamed of idleness in these
stirring
times.
It is well. This is an oddly-constructed world
in which we live, Mr Wilder! Some think themselves
in danger, with a foundation beneath them no less
solid than
terra firma
, while others are content to
trust their fortunes on the sea. So, again, some there
are who believe praying is the business of man; and
then come others who are sparing of their breath,
and take those favours for themselves which they
have not always the leisure or the inclination to ask
for. No doubt you thought it prudent to inquire
into the nature of our trade, before you came hither
in quest of employment?
You are said to be a slaver, among the
towns-men
of Newport.
They are never wrong, your village gossips! If
witchcraft ever truly existed on earth, the first of the
cunning tribe has been a village innkeeper; the
second, its doctor; and the third, its priest. The
right to the fourth honour may be disputed between
the barber and the tailor.Roderick!
The Captain accompanied the word by which he
so unceremoniously interrupted himself, by striking
a light blow on a Chinese gong, which, among other
curiosities, was suspended from one of the beams of
the upper deck, within reach of his hand.
I say, Roderick, do you sleep?
A light and active boy darted out of one of the
two little state-rooms which were constructed on
the quarters of the ship, and answered to the
summons
by announcing his presence.
Has the boat returned?
The reply was in the affirmative.
And has she been successful?
The General is in his room, sir, and can give you
an answer better than I.
Then, let the General appear, and report the
result of his campaign.
Wilder was by far too deeply interested, to break
the sudden reverie into which his companion had
now evidently fallen, even by breathing as loud as
usual. The boy descended through the hatch like a
serpent gliding into his hole, or, rather, a fox darting
into his burrow, and then a profound stillness reigned
in the cabin. The Commander of the ship leaned
his head on his hand, appearing utterly unconscious
of the presence of any stranger. The silence might
have been of much longer duration, had it not been
interrupted by the appearance of a third person. A
straight, rigid form slowly elevated itself through the
little hatchway, very much in the manner that
theatrical
spectres are seen to make their appearance on
the stage, until about half of the person was visible,
when it ceased to rise, and turned its disciplined
countenance on the Captain.
I wait for orders, said a mumbling voice,
which issued from lips that were hardly perceived
to move.
Wilder started as this unexpected individual
appeared
;
nor was the stranger wanting in an aspect
sufficiently remarkable to produce surprise in any
spectator. The face was that of a man of fifty, with
the lineaments rather indurated than faded by time.
Its colour was an uniform red, with the exception of
one of those expressive little fibrous tell-tales on each
cheeck, which bear so striking a resemblance to the
H 2
mazes of the vine, and which would seem to be the
true origin of the proverb which says that good
wine needs no bush. The head was bald on its
crown; but around either ear was a mass of grizzled
hair, pomatumed and combed into formal military
bristles. The neck was long, and supported by a
black stock; the shoulders, arms, and body were
those of a man of tall stature; and the whole were
enveloped in an over-coat, which, though it had
something methodical in its fashion, was evidently
intended as a sort of domino. The Captain raised
his head as the other spoke, exclaiming,
Ah! General, are you at your post? Did you
find the land?
Yes.
And the point?and the man?
Both.
And what did you?
Obey orders.
That was right.You are a jewel for an
executive
officer, General; and, as such, I wear you near
my heart. Did the fellow complain?
He was gagged.
A summary method of closing remonstrance. It
is as it should be, General; as usual, you have
merited
my approbation.
Then reward me for it.
In what manner? You are already as high in
rank as I can elevate you. The next step must be
knighthood.
Pshaw! my men are no better than militia.
They want coats.
They shall have them. His Majesty's guards
shall not be half so well equipt. General, I wish
you a good night.
The figure descended, in the same rigid, spectral
manner as it had risen on the sight, leaving Wilder
again alone with the Captain of the ship. The lat
ter seemed suddenly struck with the fact that this
odd interview had occurred in the presence of one
who was nearly a stranger, and that, in his eyes at
least, it might appear to require some explanation.
My friend, he said, with an air something
explanatory
,
while it was at the same time, not a little
haughty, commands what, in a more regular cruiser,
would be called the `marine guard.' He has
gradually
risen, by service, from the rank of a subaltern,
to the high station which he now fills. You
perceive
he smells of the camp?
More than of the ship. Is it usual for slavers to
be so well provided with military equipments? I
find you armed at all points.
You would know more of us, before we
proceed
to drive our bargain? the Captain answered,
with a smile. He then opened a little casket that
stood on the table, and drew from it a parchment,
which he coolly handed to Wilder, saying, as he did
so, with one of the quick, searching glances of his
restless eye, You will see, by that, we have `letters
of marque,' and are duly authorized to fight the
battles
of the King, while we are conducting our own
more peaceable affairs.
This is the commission of a brig!
True, true. I have given you the wrong paper.
I believe you will find this more accurate.
This is truly a commission for the `good ship
Seven Sisters;' but you surely carry more than ten
guns; and, then, these in your cabin throw nine
instead
of four pound shot!
Ah! you are as precise as though you had been
the barrister, and I the blundering seaman. I dare
say you have heard of such a thing as stretching a
commission, continued the Captain drily, as he
carelessly threw the parchment back among a pile
of similar documents. Then, rising from his seat,
he began to pace the cabin with quick steps, as he
continued, I need not tell you, Mr Wilder, that
ours is a hazardous pursuit. Some call it lawless.
But, as I am little addicted to theological disputes,
we will wave the question. You have not come
here without knowing your errand.
I am in search of a birth.
Doubtless you have reflected well on the matter,
and know your own mind as to the trade in which
you would sail. In order that no time may be
wasted
,
and that our dealings may be frank, as becomes
two honest seamen, I will confess to you, at once,
that I have need of you. A brave and skilful man,
one older, though, I dare say, not better than
yourself
,
occupied that larboard state-room, within the
month; but, poor fellow, he is food for fishes ere
this.
He was drowned?
Not he! He died in open battle with a King's
ship!
A King's ship! Have you then stretched your
commission so far as to find a warranty for giving
battle to his Majesty's cruisers?
Is there no King but George the Second!
Perhaps
she bore the white flag, perhaps a Dane. But
he was truly a gallant fellow; and there lies his
birth, as empty as the day he was carried from it, to
be cast into the sea. He was a man fit to succeed
to the command, should an evil star shine on my
fate. I think I could die easier, were I to know
this noble vessel was to be transmitted to one who
would make such use of her as should be.
Doubtless your owners would provide a
successor
,
in the event of such a calamity.
My owners are very reasonable, returned the
other, with a meaning smile, while he cast another
searching glance at his guest, which compelled
Wilder
to lower his own eyes to the cabin floor; they
seldom trouble me with importunities, or orders.
They are indulgent! I see that flags were not
forgotten in your inventory: Do they also give you
permission to wear any one of all those ensigns, as
you may please?
As this question was put, the expressive and
understanding
looks of the two seamen met. The
Captain drew a flag from the half-open locker, where
it had caught the attention of his visiter, and, letting
the roll unfold itself on the deck, he answered,
This is the Lily of France, you see. No bad
emblem of your stainless Frenchman. An escutcheon
of pretence without spot, but, nevertheless, a little
soiled by too much use. Here, you have the
calculating
Dutchman; plain, substantial, and cheap. It
is a flag I little like. If the ship be of value, her
owners are not often willing to dispose of her
without
a price. This is your swaggering Hamburgher.
He is rich in the possession of one town, and makes
his boast of it, in these towers. Of the rest of his
mighty possessions he wisely says nothing in his
allegory
.
These are the Crescents of Turkey; a
moon-struck
nation, that believe themselves the inheritors
of heaven. Let them enjoy their birthright in peace;
it is seldom they are found looking for its blessings
on the high seasand these, the little satellites that
play about the mighty moon; your Barbarians of
Africa. I hold but little communion with these
wide-trowsered gentry, for they seldom deal in
gainful
traffic. And yet, he added, glancing his eye at
the silken divan before which Wilder was seated,
I have met the rascals; nor have we parted
entirely
without communication! Ah! here comes
the man I like; your golden, gorgeous Spaniard!
This field of yellow reminds one of the riches of her
mines; and this Crown! one might fancy it of
beaten
gold, and stretch forth a hand to grasp the
treasure
.
What a blazonry is this for a galleon! Here
is the humbler Portuguese; and yet is he not
without
a wealthy look. I have often fancied there were
true Brazilian diamonds in this kingly bauble.
Yonder
crucifix, which you see hanging in pious
proximity
to my state-room door, is a specimen of the
sort I mean. Wilder turned his head, to throw a
look on the valuable emblem, that was really
suspended
from the bulkhead, within a few inches of
the spot the other named. After satisfying his
curiosity
,
he was in the act of giving his attention again
to the flags, when he detected another of those
penetrating
,
but stolen glances with which his
companion
so often read the countenance of his associates.
It might have been that the Captain was
endeavouring
to discover the effect his profuse display of
wealth had produced on the mind of his visiter.
Let that be as it would, Wilder smiled; for, at that
moment, the idea first occurred that the ornaments
of the cabin had been thus studiously arranged with
an expectation of his arrival, and with the wish that
their richness might strike his senses favourably.
The other caught the expression of his eye; and
perhaps he mistook its meaning, when he suffered
his construction of what it said to animate him to
pursue his whimsical analysis of the flags, with an
air still more cheerful and vivacious than before.
These double-headed monsters are land birds,
and seldom risk a flight over deep waters. They
are not for me. Your hardy, valiant Dane; your
sturdy Swede; a nest of smaller fry, he continued,
passing his hand rapidly over a dozen little rolls as
they lay, each in its own repository, who spread
their bunting like larger states; and your luxurious
Neapolitan. Ah! here come the Keys of Heaven!
This is a flag to die under! I lay yard-arm and
yard-arm, once, under that very bit of bunting, with
a heavy corsair from Algiers
What! Did you choose to fight under the
banners
of the Church?
In mere devotion. I pictured to myself the
surprise
that would overcome the barbarian, when he
should find that we did not go to prayers. We gave
him but a round or two, before he swore that Allah
had decreed he might surrender. There was a
moment
,
while I luffed-up on his weather-quarter, I
believe, that the Mussulman thought the whole of the
holy Conclave was afloat, and that the downfall of
Mahomet and his offspring was ordained. I
provoked
the conflict, I will confess, in showing him these
peaceful Keys, which he is dull enough to think
open half the strong boxes of Christendom.
When he had confessed his error, you let him
go?
Hum!with my blessing. There was some
interchange
of commodities between us, and then we
parted. I left him smoking his pipe, in a heavy sea,
with his fore-topmast over the side, his mizzenmast
under his counter, and some six or seven holes in his
bottom, that let in the water just as fast as the pumps
discharged it. You see he was in a fair way to
acquire
his portion of the inheritance. But Heaven
had ordained it all, and he was satisfied!
And what flags are these which you have
passed
?
They seem rich, and many.
These are England; like herself, aristocratic,
party-coloured, and a good deal touched by humour.
Here is bunting to note all ranks and conditions, as
if men were not made of the same flesh, and the
people of one kingdom might not all sail honestly
under the same emblems. Here is my Lord High
Admiral; your St. George; your field of red, and of
blue, as chance may give you a leader, or the humour
of the moment prevail; the stripes of mother India,
and the Royal Standard itself!
The Royal Standard!
Why not? a commander is termed a `monarch
in his ship.' Ay; this is the Standard of the King;
and, what is more, it has been worn in presence of
an Admiral!
This needs explanation! exclaimed his listener,
who seemed to feel much that sort of horror that a
churchman would discover at the detection of
sacrilege
.
To wear the Royal Standard in presence of
a flag! We all know how difficult, and even
dangerous
,
it becomes, to sport a simple pennant, with the
eyes of a King's cruiser on us
I love to flaunt the rascals! interrupted the
other, with a smothered, but bitter laugh. There
is pleasure in the thing!In order to punish, they
must possess the power; an experiment often made,
but never yet successful. You understand balancing
accounts with the law, by showing a broad sheet of
canvas! I need say no more.
And which of all these flags do you most
use? demanded Wilder, after a moment of intense
thought.
As to mere sailing, I am as whimsical as a girl
in her teens in the choice of her ribbons. I will
often show you a dozen in a day. Many is the
worthy
trader who has gone into port with his veritable
account of this Dutchman, or that Dane, with whom
he has spoken in the offing. As to fighting, though I
have been known to indulge a humour, too, in that
particular, still is there one which I most affect.
And that is?
The Captain kept his hand, for a moment, on the
roll he had touched, and seemed to read the very
soul of his visiter, so intent and keen was his look
the while. Then, suffering the bunting to fall, a
deep, blood-red field, without relief or ornament of
any sort, unfolded itself, as he answered, with
emphasis
,
This.
That is the colour of a Rover!
Ay, it is
red!
I like it better than your gloomy
fields of black, with death's heads, and other childish
scare-crows. It threatens nothing; but merely says.
`Such is the price at which I am to be bought.' Mr
Wilder, he added, losing the mixture of irony and
pleasantry with which he had supported the
previous
dialogue, in an air of authority, We
understand
each other. It is time that each should sail
under his proper colours. I need not tell you who
I am.
I believe it is unnecessary, said Wilder. If
I can comprehend these palpable signs, I stand in
presence ofof
The Red Rover, continued the other, observing
that he hesitated to pronounce the appalling name.
It is true; and I hope this interview is the
commencement
of a durable and firm friendship. I
know not the secret cause, but, from the moment of
our meeting, a strong and indefinable interest has
drawn me towards you. Perhaps I felt the void
which my situation has drawn about me;be that
as it may, I receive you with a longing heart and
open arms.
Though it must be very evident, from what
preceded
this open avowal, that Wilder was not
ignorant
of the character of the ship on board of which
he had just ventured, yet did he not receive the
acknowledgment
without embarrassment. The
reputation
of this renowned freebooter, his daring, his
acts of liberality and licentiousness so frequently
blended, and his desperate disregard of life on all
occasions, were probably crowding together in the
recollection of our more youthful adventurer, and
caused him to feel that species of responsible
hesitation
,
to which we are all more or less subject on
the occurrence of important events, be they ever so
much expected.
You have not mistaken my purpose, or my
suspicions
,
he at length answered, for I own I have
Vol. I. I
come in search of this very ship. I accept the
service
;
and, from this moment, you will rate me in
whatever station you may think me best able to
discharge
my duty with credit.
You are next to myself. In the morning, the
same shall be proclaimed on the quarter-deck; and,
in the event of my death, unless I am deceived in
my man, you will prove my successor. This may
strike you as sudden confidence. It is so, in part, I
must acknowledge; but our shipping lists cannot be
opened, like those of the King, by beat of drum in
the streets of the metropolis; and, then, am I no
judge of the human heart, if my frank reliance on
your faith does not, in itself, strengthen your good
feelings in my favour.
It does! exclaimed Wilder, with sudden and
deep emphasis.
The Rover smiled calmly, as he continued,
Young gentlemen of your years are apt to carry
no small portion of their hearts in their hands. But,
notwithstanding this seeming sympathy, in order that
you may have sufficient respect for the discretion of
your leader, it is necessary that I should say we have
met before. I was apprised of your intention to seek
me out, and to offer to join me.
It is impossible! cried Wilder, No human
being
Can ever be certain his secrets are safe,
interrupted
the other, when he carries a face as
ingenuous
as your own. It is but four-and-twenty hours
since you were in the good town of Boston.
I admit that much; but
You will soon admit the rest. You were too
curious in your inquiries of the dolt who declares
he was robbed by us of his provisions and sails. The
false-tongued villain! It may be well for him to keep
from my path, or he may get a lesson that shall prick
his honesty. Does he think such pitiful game as he
would induce me to spread a single inch of canvas,
or even to lower a boat into the sea!
Is not his statement, then, true? demanded
Wilder, in a surprise he took no pains to conceal.
True! Am I what report has made me? Look
keenly at the monster, that nothing may escape you,
returned the Rover, with a hollow laugh, in which
scorn struggled to keep down the feelings of
wounded
pride. Where are the horns, and the cloven
foot? Snuff the air: Is it not tainted with sulphur?
But enough of this. I knew of your inquiries, and
liked your mien. In short, you were my study; and,
though my approaches were made with some
caution
,
they were sufficiently nigh to effect the object.
You pleased me, Wilder; and I hope the satisfaction
may be mutual.
The newly engaged buccanier bowed to the
compliment
of his superior, and appeared at some little
loss for a reply: As if to get rid of the subject at
once, he hurriedly observed,
As we now understand each other, I will intrude
no longer, but leave you for the night, and return to
my duty in the morning.
Leave me! returned the Rover, stopping short
in his walk, and fastening his eye keenly on the
other. It is not usual for my officers to leave me
at this hour. A sailor should love his ship, and never
sleep out of her, unless on compulsion.
We may as well understand each other, said
Wilder, quickly. If it is to be a slave, and, like
one of the bolts, a fixture in the vessel, that you need
me, our bargain is at an end.
Hum! I admire your spirit, sir, much more than
your discretion. You will find me an attached friend,
and one who little likes a separation, however short.
Is there not enough to content you here? I will not
speak of such low considerations as those which
administer
to the ordinary appetites. But, you have
been taught the value of reason; here are books
you have taste; here is eleganceyou are poor;
here is wealth.
They amount to nothing, without liberty,
coldly
returned the other.
And what is this liberty you ask? I hope, young
man, you would not so soon betray the confidence
you have just received! Our acquaintance is but
short, and I may have been too hasty in my faith.
I must return to the land, Wilder added, firmly,
if it be only to know that I am intrusted, and am
not a prisoner.
There is generous sentiment, or deep villany,
in all this, resumed the Rover, after a minute of
deep thought. I will believe the former.
Declare
to me, that, while in the town of Newport,
you will inform no soul of the true character of this
ship.
I will swear it, eagerly interrupted Wilder.
On this cross, rejoined the Rover, with a
sarcastic
laugh; on this diamond-mounted cross! No,
sir, he added, with a proud curl of the lip, as he
cast the jewel contemptuously aside, oaths are made
for men who need laws to keep them to their
promises
;
I need no more than the clear and unequivocal
affirmation of a gentleman.
Then, plainly and unequivocally do I declare,
that, while in Newport, I will discover the character
of this ship to no one, without your wish, or order,
so to do. Nay more
No more. It is wise to be sparing of our pledges,
and to say no more than the occasion requires. The
time may come when you might do good to yourself,
without harming me, by being unfettered by a
promise
.
In an hour, you shall land; that time will be
needed to make you acquainted with the terms of
your enlistment, and to grace my rolls with your
name.Roderick, he added, again touching the
gong, you are wanted, boy.
The same active lad, that had made his
appearance
at the first summons, ran up the steps from the
cabin beneath, and announced his presence again by
his voice.
Roderick, continued the Rover, this is my
future lieutenant, and, of course, your officer, and
my friend. Will you take refreshment, sir? there
is little, that man needs, which Roderick cannot
supply.
I thank you; I have need of none.
Then, have the goodness to follow the boy. He
will show you into the dining apartment beneath,
and give you the written regulations. In an hour,
you will have digested the code, and by that time I
shall be with you. Throw the light more upon the
ladder, boy; you can descend
without
a ladder though,
it would seem, or I should not, at this moment, have
the pleasure of your company.
The intelligent smile of the Rover was
unanswered
by any corresponding evidence from the subject
of his joke, that he found satisfaction in the
remembrance
of the awkward situation in which he had
been left in the tower. The former caught the
displeased
expression of the other's countenance, as he
gravely prepared to follow the boy, who already stood
in the hatchway with a light. Advancing a step,
with the grace and tones of sensitive breeding, he
said quickly,
Mr Wilder, I owe you an apology for my
seeming
rudeness at parting on the hill. Though I believed
you mine, I was not sure of my acquisition. You
will readily see how necessary it might be, to one in
my situation, to throw off a companion at such a
moment.
Wilder turned, with a countenance from which
I2
every shade of displeasure had vanished, and
motioned
to him to say no more.
It was awkward enough, certainly, to find one's
self in such a prison; but I feel the justice of what
you say. I might have done the very thing myself,
if the same presence of mind were at hand to help
me.
The good man, who grinds in the Newport ruin,
must be in a sad way, since all the rats are leaving
his mill, cried the Rover gaily, as his companion
descended after the boy. Wilder now freely
returned
his open, cordial laugh, and then, as he descended,
the cabin was left to him who, a few minutes before,
had been found in its quiet possession.
CHAPTER VII.
The world affords no law to make thee rich;
Then be not poor, but break it, and take this.
Apoth
. My poverty, but not my will, consents.
Romeo and Juliet
.
The
Rover arrested his step, as the other
disappeared
,
and stood for more than a minute in an
attitude
of high and self-gratulating triumph. It was
quite apparent he was exulting in his success. But,
though his intelligent face betrayed the satisfaction
of the inward man, it was illumined by no
expression
of vulgar joy. It was the countenance of one
who was suddenly relieved from intense care, rather
than that of a man who was greedy of profiting by
the services of others. Indeed, it would not have
been difficult, for a close and practised observer, to
have detected a shade of regret in the lightings of
his seductive smile, or in the momentary flashes of
his changeful eye. The feeling, however, quickly
passed away, and his whole figure and countenance
resumed the ordinary easy mien in which he most
indulged in his hours of retirement.
After allowing sufficient time for the boy to
conduct
Wilder to the necessary cabin, and to put him
in possession of the regulations for the police of the
ship, the Captain again touched the gong, and once
more summoned the former to his presence. The lad
had, however, to approach the elbow of his master,
and to speak thrice, before the other was conscious
that he had answered his call.
Roderick, said the Rover, after a long pause,
are you there?
I am here, returned a low, and seemingly a
mournful voice.
Ah! you gave him the regulations?
I did.
And he reads?
He reads.
It is well. I would speak to the General.
Roderick
,
you must have need of rest; good night; let
the General be summoned to a council, andGood
night, Roderick.
The boy made an assenting reply; but, instead of
springing, with his former alacrity, to execute the
order
,
he lingered a moment nigh his master's chair.
Failing, however, in his wish to catch his eye, he
slowly and reluctantly descended the stairs which
led into the lower cabins, and was seen no more.
It is needless to describe the manner in which the
General made his second appearance. It differed
in no particular from his former entre, except that,
on this occasion, the whole of his person was
developed
.
He appeared a tall, upright form, that was
far from being destitute of natural grace and
proportions
,
but which had been so exquisitely drilled into
simultaneous movement, that the several members
had so far lost the power of volition, as to render it
impossible for one to stir, without producing
something
like a correspondent demonstration in all its
fellows
.
This rigid and well-regulated personage, after
making a formal military bow to his superior, helped
himself to a chair, in which, after some little time
lost in preparation, he seated himself in silence.
The Rover seemed conscious of his presence; for
he acknowledged his salute by a gentle inclination
of his own head; though he did not appear to think
it necessary to suspend his ruminations the more on
that account. At length, however, he turned short
upon his companion, and said abruptly,
General, the campaign is not finished.
What remains? the field is won, and the enemy
is a prisoner.
Ay, your part of the adventure is well achieved,
but much of mine remains to be done. You saw
the youth in the lower cabin?
I did.
And how find you his appearance?
Maritime.
That is as much as to say, you like him not.
I like discipline.
I am much mistaken if you do not find him to
your taste on the quarter-deck. Let that be as it
may, I have still a favour to ask of you!
A favour!it is getting late.
Did I say `a favour?' there is duty to be yet
done.
I wait your orders.
It is necessary that we use great precaution;
for, as you know
I wait your orders, laconically repeated the
other.
The Rover compressed his mouth, and a scornful
smile struggled about the nether lip; but it changed
into a look half bland, half authoritative, as he
continued
,
You will find two seamen, in a skiff, alongside
the ship; the one is white, and the other is black.
These men you will have conducted into the
vessel
into
one of the forward state-roomsand you
will have them both thoroughly intoxicated.
It shall be done, returned he who was called
the General, rising, and marching with long strides
towards the door of the cabin.
Pause a moment, exclaimed the Rover; what
agent will you use?
Nightingale has the strongest head but one in
the ship.
He is too far gone already. I sent him ashore,
to look about for any straggling seamen who might
like our service; and I found him in a tavern, with
all the fastenings off his tongue, declaiming like a
lawyer who had taken a fee from both parties.
Besides, he had a quarrel with one of these very
men, and it is probable they would get to blows in
their cups.
I will do it myself. My night-cap is waiting for
me; and it is only to lace it a little tighter than
common.
The Rover seemed content with this assurance;
for he expressed his satisfaction with a familiar nod
of the head. The soldier was now about to depart,
when he was again interrupted.
One thing more, General; there is your
captive
.
Shall I make him drunk too?
By no means. Let him be conducted hither.
The General made an ejaculation of assent, and
left the cabin. It were weak, thought the Rover,
as he resumed his walk up and down the apartment,
to trust too much to an ingenuous face and
youthful
enthusiasm. I am deceived if the boy has not
had reason to think himself disgusted with the world,
and ready to embark in any romantic enterprise;
but, still, to be deceived might be fatal; therefore
will I be prudent, even to excess of caution. He is
tied in an extraordinary manner to these two
seamen
.
I would I knew his history. But all that
will come in proper time. The men must remain
as hostages for his own return, and for his faith. If
he prove false, why, they are seamen;and many
men are expended in this wild service of ours! It
is well arranged; and no suspicion of any plot on
our part will wound the sensitive pride of the boy,
if he be, as I would gladly think, a true man.
Such was, in a great manner, the train of thought
in which the Rover indulged, for many minutes,
after his military companion had left him. His lips
moved; smiles, and dark shades of thought, in turn,
chased each other from his speaking countenance,
which betrayed all the sudden and violent changes
that denote the workings of a busy spirit within.
While thus engrossed in mind, his step became more
rapid, and, at times, he gesticulated a little
extravagantly
,
when he found himself, in a sudden turn,
unexpectedly confronted by a form that seemed to
rise on his sight like a vision.
While most engaged in his own humours, two
powerful seamen had, unheeded, entered the cabin;
and, after silently depositing a human figure in a seat,
they withdrew without speaking. It was before this
personage that the Rover now found himself. The
gaze was mutual, long, and uninterrupted by a
syllable
from either party. Surprise and indecision held
the Rover mute, while wonder and alarm appeared
to have literally frozen the faculties of the other. At
length the former, suffering a quaint and peculiar
smile to gleam for a moment across his countenance,
said abruptly,
I welcome sir Hector Homespun!
The eyes of the confounded tailorfor it was no
other than that garrulous acquaintance of the reader
who had fallen into the toils of the Roverthe
eyes of the good-man rolled from right to left,
embracing
,
in their wanderings, the medley of elegance
and warlike preparation that they every where met,
never failing to return, from each greedy look, to
devour the figure that stood before him.
I say, Welcome, sir Hector Homespun!
repeated
the Rover.
The Lord will be lenient to the sins of a
miserable
father of seven small children! ejaculated the
tailor. It is but little, valiant Pirate, that can be
gotten from a hard-working, upright tradesman, who
sits from the rising to the setting sun, bent over his
labour.
These are debasing terms for chivalry, sir
Hector
,
interrupted the Rover, laying his hand on the
little riding whip, which had been thrown carelessly
on the cabin table, and, tapping the shoulder of the
tailor with the same, as though he were a sorcerer,
and would disenchant the other with the touch:
Cheer up, honest and loyal subject: Fortune has at
length ceased to frown: it is but a few hours since
you complained that no custom came to your shop
from this vessel, and now are you in a fair way to do
the business of the whole ship.
Ah! honourable and magnanimous Rover,
rejoined
Homespun, whose fluency returned with his
senses, I am an impoverished and undone man.
My life has been one of weary and probationary
hardships. Five bloody and cruel wars
Enough. I have said that Fortune was just
beginning
to smile. Clothes are as necessary to
gentlemen
of our profession as to the parish priest. You
shall not baste a seam without your reward.
Behold
!
he added, touching the spring of a secret
drawer, which flew open, and discovered a confused
pile of gold, in which the coins of nearly every
Christian people were blended, we are not without
the means of paying those who serve us faithfully.
The sudden exhibition of a horde of wealth, which
not only greatly exceeded any thing of the kind he
had ever before witnessed, but which actually
surpassed
his limited imaginative powers, was not
without
its effect on the sensitive feelings of the
good-man
.
After feasting on the sight, for the few
moments
that his companion left the treasure exposed
to view, he turned to the envied possessor of so
much gold, and demanded,the tones of increased
confidence gradually stealing into his voice, as the
inward man felt additional motives of
encouragement
,
And what am I expected to perform, mighty
Seaman, for my portion of this wealth?
That which you daily perform on the landto
cut, to fashion, and to sew. Perhaps, too, your
talent
at a masquerade dress may be taxed, from time
to time.
Ah! they are lawless and irreligious devices of
the enemy, to lead men into sin and worldly
abominations
.
But, worthy Mariner, there is my
disconsolate
consort, Desire; though stricken in years, and
given to wordy strife, yet is she the lawful partner
of my bosom, and the mother of a numerous
offspring
.
She shall not want. This is an asylum for
distressed
husbands. Your men, who have not force
enough to command at home, come to my ship as to
a city of refuge. You will make the seventh who has
found peace by fleeing to this sanctuary. Their
families
are supported by ways best known to ourselves,
and all parties are content. This is not the least of
my benevolent acts.
It is praiseworthy and just, honourable Captain;
and I hope that Desire and her offspring may not be
forgotten. The labourer is surely worthy of his hire;
and if, peradventure, I should toil in your behalf,
through stress of compulsion, I hope the good woman,
and her young, may fatten on your liberality.
You have my word; they shall not be neglected.
Perhaps, just Gentleman, if an allotment should
be made in advance from that stock of gold, the
mind of my consort would be relieved, her inquiries
after my fate not so searching, and her spirit less
troubled. I have reason to understand the temper
of Desire; and am well identified, that, while the
prospect of want is before her eyes, there will be a
clamour in Newport. Now that the Lord has
graciously
given me the hopes of a respite, there can be
no sin in wishing to enjoy it in peace.
Although the Rover was far from believing, with
his captive, that the tongue of Desire could disturb
the harmony of his ship, he was in the humour to be
indulgent. Touching the spring again, he took a
handful of the gold, and, extending it towards
Home-spun
,
demanded,
Will you take the bounty, and the oath? The
money will then be your own.
The Lord defend us from the evil one, and
deliver
us all from temptation! ejaculated the tailor:
Heroic Rover, I have a dread of the law. Should
any evil overcome you, in the shape of a King's
cruiser, or a tempest cast you on the land, there
might be danger in being contaminated too closely
with your crew. Any little services which I may
render, on compulsion, will be overlooked, I humbly
hope; and I trust to your magnanimity, honest and
honourable Commander, that the same will not be
forgotten in the division of your upright earnings.
This is but the spirit of cabbaging, a little
distorted
,
muttered the Rover, as he turned lightly on
his heel, and tapped the gong, with an impatience
that sent the startling sound through every cranny of
the ship. Four or five heads were thrust in at the
different
Vol. I. K
doors of the cabin, and the voice of one was
heard, desiring to know the wishes of their leader.
Take him to his hammock, was the quick,
sudden order.
The good-man Homespun, who, from fright or
policy, appeared to be utterly unable to move, was
quickly lifted from his seat, and conveyed to the
door which communicated with the quarter-deck.
Pause, he exclaimed to his unceremonious
bearers, as they were about to transport him to the
place designated by their Captain; I have one
word yet to say. Honest and loyal Rebel, though I
do not accept your service, neither do I refuse it in
an unseemly and irreverent manner. It is a sore
temptation, and I feel it at my fingers' ends. But a
covenant may be made between us, by which neither
party shall be a loser, and in which the law shall
find no grounds of displeasure. I would wish,
mighty Commodore, to carry an honest name to my
grave, and I would also wish to live out the number
of my days; for, after having passed with so much
credit, and unharmed, through five bloody and cruel
wars
Away with him! was the stern and startling
interruption.
Homespun vanished, as though magic had been
employed in transporting him, and the Rover was
again left to himself. His meditations were not
interrupted
,
for a long time, by human footstep or
voice. That breathing stillness, which unbending
and stern discipline can alone impart, pervaded the
ship. A landsman, seated in the cabin, might have
fancied himself, although surrounded by a crew of
lawless and violent men, in the solitude of a
deserted
church, so suppressed, and deadened, were even
those sounds that were absolutely necessary. There
were heard at times, it is true, the high and harsh
notes of some reveller who appeared to break forth
in the strains of a sea song, which, as they issued
from the depths of the vessel, and were not very
musical in themselves, broke on the silence like the
first discordant strains of a new practitioner on a
bugle. But even these interruptions gradually grew
less frequent, and finally became inaudible. At
length the Rover heard a hand fumbling about the
handle of the cabin door, and then his military friend
once more made his appearance.
There was that in the step, the countenance, and
the whole air of the General, which proclaimed
that his recent service, if successful, had not been
achieved entirely without personal hazard. The
Rover, who had started from his seat the moment he
saw who had entered, instantly demanded his report.
The white is so drunk, that he cannot lie down
without holding on to the mast; but the negro is
either a cheat, or his head is made of flint.
I hope you have not too easily abandoned the
design.
I would as soon batter a mountain! my retreat
was not made a minute too soon.
The Rover fastened his eyes on the General, for a
moment, in order to assure himself of the precise
condition of his subaltern, ere he replied,
It is well. We will now retire for the night.
The other carefully dressed his tall person, and
brought his face in the direction of the little
hatch-way
so often named. Then, by a sort of desperate
effort, he essayed to march to the spot, with his
customary
upright mien and military step. As one or
two erratic movements, and crossings of the legs,
were not commented on by his Captain, the worthy
martinet descended the stairs, as he believed, with
sufficient dignity; the moral man not being in the
precise state which is the best adapted to discover
any little blunders that might be made by his
physical
coadjutor. The Rover looked at his watch; and,
after allowing sufficient time for the deliberate
retreat
of the General, he stepped lightly on the stairs,
and descended also.
The lower apartments of the vessel, though less
striking in their equipments than the upper cabin,
were arranged with great attention to neatness and
comfort. A few offices for the servants occupied
the extreme after-part of the ship, communicating
by doors with the dining apartment of the secondary
officers; or, as it was called in technical language,
the ward-room. On either side of this, again, were
the state-rooms, an imposing name, by which the
dormitories of those who are entitled to the honours
of the quarter-deck are ever called. Forward of
the ward-room, came the apartments of the minor
officers; and, immediately in front of them, the
corps of the individual who was called the General
was lodged, forming, by their discipline, a barrier
between
the more lawless seamen and their superiors.
There was little departure, in this disposition of
the accommodations, from the ordinary arrangements
of vessels of war of the same description and force
as the Rover; but Wilder had not failed to
remark
,
that the bulkheads which separated the cabins
from the birth-deck, or the part occupied by the
crew, were far stouter than common, and that a
small howitzer was at hand, to be used, as a
physician
might say, internally, should occasion require.
The doors were of extraordinary strength, and the
means of barricadoing them resembled more a
preparation
for battle, than the usual securities against
petty encroachments on private property. Muskets,
blunderbusses, pistols, sabres, half-pikes, &c., were
fixed to the beams and carlings, or were made to
serve as ornaments against the different bulkheads.
in a profusion that plainly told they were there as
much for use as for show. In short, to the eye of a
seaman, the whole betrayed a state of things, in
which the superiors felt that their whole security,
against the violence and insubordination of their
inferiors
,
depended on their influence and their ability
to resist, united; and that the former had not
deemed
it prudent to neglect any of the precautions which
might aid their comparatively less powerful physical
force.
In the principal of the lower apartments, or the
ward-room, the Rover found his newly enlisted
lieutenant
,
apparently busy in studying the regulations
of the service in which he had just embarked.
Approaching
the corner in which the latter had seated
himself, the former said, in a frank, encouraging, and
even confidential manner,
I hope you find our laws sufficiently firm, Mr
Wilder.
Want of firmness is not their fault; if the same
quality can always be observed in administering
them, it is well, returned the other, rising to salute
his superior. I have never found such rigid rules,
even in
Even in what, sir? demanded the Rover,
perceiving
that his companion hesitated.
I was about to say, `Even in his Majesty's
service
,'
returned Wilder, slightly colouring. I know
not whether it may be a fault, or a recommendation,
to have served in a King's ship.
It is the latter; at least I, for one, should
think it so, since I learned my trade in the same
service.
In what ship? eagerly interrupted Wilder.
In many, was the cold reply. But, speaking
of rigid rules, you will soon perceive, that, in a service
where there are no courts on shore to protect us,
nor any sister-cruisers to look after each other's
welfare
,
no small portion of power is necessarily vested
in the Commander. You find my authority a good
deal extended.
K 2
A little unlimited, said Wilder, with a smile
that might have passed for ironical.
I hope you will have no occasion to say that it
is arbitrarily executed, returned the Rover, without
observing, or perhaps without letting it appear that
he observed, the expression of his companion's
countenance
.
But your hour is come, and you are now
at liberty to land.
The young man thanked him, with a courteous
inclination
of the head, and expressed his readiness to
go. As they ascended the ladder into the upper
cabin, the Captain expressed his regret that the hour,
and the necessity of preserving the incognito of his
ship, would not permit him to send an officer of his
rank ashore in the manner he could wish.
But then there is the skiff, in which you came
off, still alongside, and your own two stout fellows
will soon twitch you to yon point. A propos of
those two men, are they included in our
arrangements
?
They have never quitted me since my childhood,
and would not wish to do it now.
It is a singular tie that unites two men, so oddly
constituted, to one so different, by habits and
education
,
from themselves, returned the Rover, glancing
his eye keenly at the other, and withdrawing it the
instant he perceived his interest in the answer was
observed.
It is, Wilder calmly replied; but, as we are
all seamen, the difference is not so great as one
would at first imagine. I will now join them, and
take an opportunity to let them know that they are
to serve in future under your orders.
The Rover suffered him to leave the cabin,
following
to the quarter-deck, with a careless step, as
if he had come abroad to breathe the open air of the
night.
The weather had not changed, but it still
continued
dark, though mild. The same stillness as
before reigned on the decks of the ship; and
nowhere
,
with a solitary exception, was a human form
to be seen, amid the collection of dark objects that
rose on the sight, all of which Wilder well
understood
to be necessary fixtures in the vessel. The
exception was the same individual who had first
received our adventurer, and who still paced the
quarter-deck, wrapped, as before, in a watch-coat.
To this personage the youth now addressed himself,
announcing his intention temporarily to quit the
vessel
.
His communication was received with a respect
that satisfied him his new rank was already known,
although, as it would seem, it was to be made to
succumb to the superior authority of the Rover.
You know, sir, that no one, of whatever station,
can leave the ship at this hour, without an order
from the Captain, was the civil, but steady reply.
So I presume; but I have the order, and
transmit
it to you. I shall land in my own boat.
The other, seeing a figure within hearing, which
he well knew to be that of his Commander, waited
an instant, to ascertain if what he heard was true.
Finding that no objection was made, nor any sign
given, to the countrary, he merely indicated the place
where the other would find his boat.
The men have left it! exclaimed Wilder,
stepping
back in surprise, as he was about to descend
the vessel's side.
Have the rascals run?
Sir, they have not run; neither are they
rascals
.
They are in this ship, and must be found.
The other waited, to witness the effect of these
authoritative words, too, on the individual, who still
lingered in the shadow of a mast. As no answer
was, however, given from that quarter, he saw the
necessity of obedience. Intimating his intention to
seek the men, he passed into the forward parts of
the vessel, leaving Wilder, as he thought, in the sole
possession of the quarter-deck. The latter was,
however, soon undeceived. The Rover, advancing
carelessly to his side, made an allusion to the
condition
of his vessel, in order to divert the thoughts
of his new lieutenant, who, by his hurried manner of
pacing the deck, he saw, was beginning to indulge
in uneasy meditations.
A charming sea-boat, Mr Wilder, he continued,
and one that never throws a drop of spray abaft
her mainmast. She is just the craft a seaman loves;
easy on her rigging, and lively in a sea. I call her
the `Dolphin,' from the manner in which she cuts
the water; and, perhaps, because she has as many
colours as that fish, you will sayJack must have a
name for his ship, you know, and I dislike your
cut-throat
appellations, your `Spit-fires' and `
Bloody-murders
.'
You were fortunate in finding such a vessel.
Was she built to your orders?
Few ships, under six hundred tons, sail from
these colonies, that are not built to serve my
purposes
,
returned the Rover, with a smile; as if he
would cheer his companion, by displaying the mine
of wealth that was opening to him, through the new
connexion he had made. This vessel was originally
built for his Most Faithful Majesty; and, I believe,
was either intended as a present or a scourge to the
Algerines; butbut she has changed owners, as you
see, and her fortune is a little altered; though how,
or why, is a trifle with which we will not, just now,
divert ourselves. I have had her in port; she has
undergone some improvements, and is now altogether
suited to a running trade.
You then venture, sometimes, inside the forts?
When you have leisure, my private journal may
afford some interest, the other evasively replied.
I hope, Mr Wilder, you find this vessel in such a
state that a seaman need not blush for her?
Her beauty and neatness first caught my eye,
and induced me to make closer inquiries into her
character.
You were quick in seeing that she was kept at a
single anchor! returned the other, laughing. But
I never risk any thing without a reason; not even
the loss of my ground tackle. It would be no great
achievement, for so warm a battery as this I carry,
to silence yonder apology for a fort; but, in doing it,
we might receive an unfortunate hit, and therefore
do I keep ready for an instant departure.
It must be a little awkward, to fight in a war
where one cannot lower his flag in any emergency!
said Wilder; more like one who mused, than one
who intended to express the opinion aloud.
The bottom is always beneath us, was the
laconic
answer. But to you I may say, that I am,
on principle, tender on my spars. They are
examined
daily, like the heels of a racer; for it often
happens that our valour must be well-tempered by
discretion.
And how, and where, do you refit, when
damaged
in a gale, or in a fight?
Hum! We contrive to refit, sir, and to take the
sea in tolerable condition.
He stopped; and Wilder, perceiving that he was
not yet deemed entitled to entire confidence,
continued
silent. In this pause, the officer returned,
followed
by the black alone. A few words served to
explain the condition of Fid. It was very apparent
that the young man was not only disappointed, but
that he was deeply mortified. The frank and
ingenuous
air, however, with which he turned to the
Rover
,
to apologize for the dereliction of his follower,
satisfied the latter that he was far from suspecting
any improper agency in bringing about his awkward
condition.
You know the character of seamen too well,
sir, he said, to impute this oversight to my poor
fellow as a heinous fault. A better sailor never lay
on a yard, or stretched a ratlin, than Dick Fid; but
I must allow he has the quality of good fellowship
to excess.
You are fortunate in having one man left you
to pull the boat ashore, carelessly returned the
other.
I am more than equal to that little exertion
myself
:
nor do I like to separate the men. With your
permission, the black shall be birthed, too, in the
ship to-night.
As you please. Empty hammocks are not scarce
among us, since the last brush.
Wilder then directed the negro to return to his
messmate, and to watch over him so long as he should
be unable to look after himself. The black, who
was far from being as clear-headed as common,
willingly
complied. The young man then took leave
of his companions, and descended into the skiff. As
he pulled, with vigorous arms, away from the dark
ship, his eyes were cast upward, with a seaman's pleasure, on the order and neatness of her gear, and
thence they fell on the frowning mass of the hull.
A light-built, compact form was seen standing on the
heel of the bowsprit, apparently watching his
movements
;
and, notwithstanding the gloom of the
clouded
star-light, he was enabled to detect, in the
individual
who took so much apparent interest in his
proceedings, the person of the Rover.
CHAPTER VIII.
What is yon gentleman?
Nurse
. The son and their of old Tiberio.
Juliet
. What's he that follows there, that would not dance?
Nurse
. Marry, I know not.
Romeo and Juliet
.
The
sun was just heaving up, out of the field of
waters in which the blue islands of Massachusetts
lie, when the inhabitants of Newport were seen
opening their doors and windows, and preparing for
the different employments of the day, with the
freshness
and alacrity of people who had wisely adhered
to the natural allotments of time in seeking their
rests, or in pursuing their pleasures. The morning
salutations passed cheerfully from one to another, as
each undid the slight fastenings of his shop; and
many a kind inquiry was made, and returned, after
the condition of a daughter's fever, or the rheumatism
of some aged grandam. As the landlord of the
Foul Anchor was so wary in protecting the
character
of his house from any unjust imputations of
unseemly revelling, so was he among the foremost
in opening his doors, to catch any transient customer,
who might feel the necessity of washing away the
damps of the past night, in some invigorating
stomachic
.
This cordial was very generally taken in the
British provinces, under the various names of
bitters
,
juleps, morning-drams, fogmatics, &c.,
according as the situation of each district appeared
to require some particular preventive. The custom
is getting a little into disuse, it is true; but still it
retains much of that sacred character which it would
seem is the concomitant of antiquity. It is not a
little extraordinary that this venerable and laudable
practice, of washing away the unwholesome
impurities
engendered in the human system, at a time when,
as it is entirely without any moral protector, it is
left exposed to the attacks of all the evils to which
flesh is heir, should subject the American to the
witticisms
of his European brother. We are not among
the least grateful to those foreign philanthropists who
take so deep an interest in our welfare as seldom to
let any republican foible pass, without applying to
it, as it merits, the caustic application of their
purifying
pens. We are, perhaps, the more sensible of
this generosity, because we have had so much
occasion
to witness, that, so great is their zeal in behalf
of our infant States, (robust, and a little
unmanageable
perhaps, but still infant) they are wont, in the
warmth of their ardour, to reform Cis-atlantic sins,
to overlook not a few backslidings of their own.
Numberless are the moral missionaries that the
mother country, for instance, has sent among us, on
these pious and benevolent errands. We can only
regret that their efforts have been crowned with so
little success. It was our fortune to be familiarly
acquainted with one of these worthies, who never
lost an opportunity of declaiming, above all, against
the infamy of the particular practice to which we
have just alluded. Indeed, so broad was the ground
he took, that he held it to be not only immoral, but,
what was far worse, ungenteel, to swallow any thing
stronger than small beer, before the hour allotted to
dinner. After that important period, it was not only
permitted to assuage the previous mortifications of
the flesh, but, so liberal did he show himself in the
orthodox indulgence, that he was regularly carried
to his bed at midnight, from which he as regularly
issued, in the course of the following morning, to
discourse again on the thousand deformities of
premature
drink. And here we would take occasion
to say, that, as to our own insignificant person, we
eschew the abomination altogether; and only regret
that those of the two nations, who find pleasure in
the practice, could not come to some amicable
understanding
as to the precise period, of the
twenty-four
hours, when it is permitted to such Christian
gentlemen as talk English to get drunk. That the
negotiators who framed the last treaty of amity
should have overlooked this important moral topic,
is another evidence that both parties were so tired
of an unprofitable war as to patch up a peace in a
hurry. It is not too late to name a commission for
this purpose; and, in order that the question may be
fairly treated on its merits, we presume to suggest to
the Executive the propriety of nominating, as our
commissioner, some confirmed advocate of the
system
of juleps. It is believed our worthy and
indulgent
Mother can have no difficulty in selecting a
suitable opponent from the ranks of her numerous
and well-trained diplomatic corps.
With this manifestation of our personal liberality,
united to so much interest in the proper, and we
hope final, disposition of this important question, we
may be permitted to resume the narrative, without
being set down as advocates for morning stimulants,
or evening intoxication; which is a very just
division
of the whole subject, as we believe, from no
very limited observation.
The landlord of the Foul Anchor, then, was
early a-foot, to gain an honest penny from any of the
supporters of the former system who might chance
to select his bar for their morning sacrifices to
Bacchus
,
in preference to that of his neighbour, he who
endeavoured to entice the lieges, by exhibiting a
redfaced
man, in a scarlet coat, that was called the
Head of George the Second, It would seem
that the commendable activity of the alert publican
was not to go without its reward. The tide of
custom
set strongly, for the first half-hour, towards the
haven of his hospitable bar; nor did he appear
entirely
to abandon the hopes of a further influx, even
Vol. I L
after the usual period of such arrivals began to pass
away. Finding, however, that his customers were
beginning to depart, on their several pursuits, he left
his station, and appeared at the outer door, with a
hand in each pocket, as though he found a secret
pleasure in the merry jingling of their new tenants.
A stranger, who had not entered with the others,
and who, of course, had not partaken of the
customary
libations, was standing at a little distance,
with a hand thrust into the bosom of his vest, as if
he were chiefly occupied with his own reflections.
This figure caught the understanding eye of the
publican
,
who instantly conceived that no man, who had
had recourse to the proper morning stimulants, could
wear so meditative a face at that early period in the
cares of the day, and that consequently something
was yet to be gained, by opening the path of direct
communication between them.
A clean air this, friend, to brush away the damps
of the night, he said, snufling the really delicious
and invigorating breathings of a fine October
morning
.
It is such purifiers as this, that gives our island
its character, and makes it perhaps the very
healthiest
,
as it is universally admitted to be the
beautiful-lest
,
spot in creation.A stranger here, 'tis likely?
But quite lately arrived, sir, was the reply.
A seafaring man, by your dress? and one in
search of a ship, as I am ready to qualify to;
continued
the publican, chuckling, perhaps, at his own
penetration. We have many such that passes
here-away
;
but people mustn't think, because Newport
is so flourishing a town, that births can always be had
for asking. Have you tried your luck yet in the
Capital of the Bay Province?
I left Boston no later than the day before
yesterday
.
What, couldn't the proud townsfolk find you a
ship! Ay, they are a mighty people at talking, and
it isn't often that they put their candle under the
bushel; and yet there are what I call good judges,
who think Narraganset Bay is in a fair way, shortly,
to count as many sail as Massachusetts. There,
yonder, is a wholesome brig, that is going, within the
week, to turn her horses into rum and sugar; and
here is a ship that hauled into the stream no longer
ago than yesterday sun-down. That is a noble
vessel
,
and has cabins fit for a prince! She'll be off
with the change of the wind; and I dare say a good
hand wouldn't go a-begging aboard her just now.
Then yonder is a slaver, off the fort, if you like a
cargo of wool-heads for your money.
And is it thought the ship in the inner harbour
will sail with the first wind? demanded the
stranger
.
It is downright. My wife is a full cousin to the
wife of the Collector's clerk; and I have it straight
that the papers are ready, and that nothing but the
wind detains them. I keep some short scores, you
know, friend, with the blue-jackets, and it behoves
an honest man to look to his interests in these hard
times. Yes, there she lies; a well-known ship, the
`Royal Caroline.' She makes a regular v'yage once
a year between the Provinces and Bristol, touching
here, out and home, to give us certain supplies, and
to wood and water; and then she goes home, or to
the Carolinas, as the case may be.
Pray, sir, has she much of an armament?
continued
the stranger, who began to lose his thoughtful
air, in the more evident interest he was beginning to
take in the discourse.
Yes, yes; she is not without a few bull-dogs, to
bark in defence of her own rights, and to say a word
in support of his Majesty's honour, too; God bless
him! Judy! you Jude! he shouted, at the top of
his voice, to a negro girl, who was gathering
kind-ling-wood
among the chips of a ship-yard, scamper
over to neighbour Homespun's, and rattle away at
his bed-room windows: the man has overslept
himself
:
it is not common to hear seven o'clock strike,
and the thirsty tailor not appear for his bitters.
A short cessation took place in the dialogue, while
the wench was executing her master's orders. The
summons produced no other effect than to draw a
shrill reply from Desire, whose voice penetrated,
through the thin board coverings of the little
dwelling
,
as readily as sound would be conveyed through
a sieve. In another moment a window was opened,
and the worthy housewife thrust her disturbed visage
into the fresh air of the morning.
What next! what next! demanded the
offended
,
and, as she was fain to believe, neglected wife,
under the impression that it was her truant husband,
making his tardy return to his domestic allegiance,
who had thus presumed to disturb her slumbers. Is
it not enough that you have eloped from my bed and
board, for a long night, but you must dare to break
in on the natural rest of a whole family, seven
blessed
children, without counting their mother! O
Hector
!
Hector! an example are you getting to be to the
young and giddy, and a warning will you yet prove
to the unthoughtful!
Bring hither the black book, said the publican
to his wife, who had been drawn to a window by the
lamentations of Desire; I think the woman said
something about starting on a journey between two
days; and, if such has been the philosophy of the
good-man, it behoves all honest people to look into
their accounts. Ay, as I live, Keziah, you have let
the limping beggar get seventeen and sixpence into
arrears, and that for such trifles as morning-drams
and night-caps!
You are wrathy, friend, without reason; the man
has made a garment for the boy at school, and found
the
Hush, good woman, interrupted her husband,
returning the book, and making a sign for her to
retire
;
I dare say it will all come round in proper
time, and the less noise we make about the
back-slidings
of a neighbour, the less will be said of our
own transgressions. A worthy and hard-working
mechanic, sir, he continued, addressing the
stranger
;
but a man who could never get the sun to
shine in at his windows, though, Heaven knows, the
glass is none too thick for such a blessing.
And do you imagine, on evidence as slight as
this we have seen, that such a man has actually
absconded
?
Why, it is a calamity that has befallen his
betters
!
returned the publican, interlocking his fingers
across the rotundity of his person, with an air of
grave consideration. We innkeeperswho live,
as it were, in plain sight of every man's secrets; for
it is after a visit to us that one is apt truly to open
his heartshould know something of the affairs of a
neighbourhood. If the good-man Homespun could
smooth down the temper of his companion as easily
as he lays a seam into its place, the thing might not
occur, butDo you drink this morning, sir?
A drop of your best.
As I was saying, continued the other, while he
furnished his customer, according to his desire, if a
tailor's goose would take the wrinkles out of the
ruffled temper of a woman, as it does out of the
cloth; and then, if, after it had done this task, a man
might eat it, as he would yonder bird hanging behind
my barPerhaps you will have occasion to make
your dinner with us, too, sir?
I cannot say I shall not, returned the stranger,
paying for the dram he had barely tasted; it
greatly
depends on the result of my inquiries concerning
the different vessels in the port.
Then would I, though perfectly disinterested, as
L 2
you know, sir, recommend you to make this house
your home, while you sojourn in the town. It is the
resort of most of the seafaring men; and I may say
this much of myself, without conceitNo man can
tell you more of what you want to know, than the
landlord of the `Foul Anchor.'
You advise an application to the Commander of
this vessel, in the stream, for a birth: Will she sail
so soon as you have named?
With the first wind. I know the whole history
of the ship, from the day they laid the blocks for her
keel to the minute when she let her anchor go where
you now see her. The great Southern Heiress,
General Grayson's fine daughter, is to be a
passenger
;
she, and her overlooker, Government-lady, I
believe they call hera Mrs Wyllysare waiting
for the signal, up here, at the residence of Madam
de Lacey; she that is the relict of the
Rear-Admiral
of that name, who is full-sister to the General;
and, therefore, an aunt to the young lady, according
to my reckoning. Many people think the two
fortunes
will go together; in which case, he will be
not only a lucky man, but a rich one, who gets Miss
Getty Grayson for a wife.
The stranger, who had maintained rather an
indifferent
manner during the close of the foregoing
dialogue
,
appeared now disposed to enter into it, with
a degree of interest suited to the sex and condition
of the present subject of their discourse. After
waiting
to catch the last syllable that the publican chose
to expend his breath on, he demanded, a little
abruptly
,
And you say the house near us, on the rising
ground, is the residence of Mrs de Lacey?
If I did, I know nothing of the matter. By `up
here,' I mean half a mile off. It is a place fit for a
lady of her quality, and none of your elbowy
dwellings
,
like these crowded about us. One may easily
tell the house, by its pretty blinds and its shades. I'll
engage there are no such shades, in all Europe, as
them very trees that stand before the door of Madam
de Lacey.
It is very probable, muttered the stranger,
who, not appearing quite as sensitive in his
provincial
admiration as the publican, had already
relapsed
into his former musing air. Instead of pushing
the discourse, he suddenly turned the subject, by
making some common-place remark; and then,
repeating the probability of his being obliged to
return, he walked deliberately away, taking the
direction
of the residence of Mrs de Lacey. The
observing publican would, probably, have found
sufficient
matter for observation, in this abrupt
termination
of the interview, had not Desire, at that
precise
moment, broken out of her habitation, and
diverted his attention, by the peculiarly piquant
manner in which she delineated the character of her
delinquent husband.
The reader has probably, ere this, suspected that
the individual who had conferred with the publican,
as a stranger, was not unknown to himself. It was,
in truth, no other than Wilder. But, in the
completion
of his own secret purposes, the young mariner
left the wordy war in his rear; and, turning up the
gentle ascent, against the side of which the town is
built, he proceeded towards the suburbs.
It was not difficult to distinguish the house he
sought, among a dozen other similar retreats, by its
shades, as the innkeeper, in conformity to a
provincial
use of the word, had termed a few really
noble elms that grew in the little court before its
door. In order, however, to assure himself that he
was right, he confirmed his surmises by actual
inquiry
,
and then continued thoughtfully on his path.
The morning had, by this time, fairly opened,
with every appearance of another of those fine,
bland, autumnal days for which the climate is, or
ought to be, so distinguished. The little air there
was, came from the south, fanning the face of our
adventurer
,
as he occasionally paused, in his ascent, to
gaze at the different vessels in the harbour, like a
mild breeze in June. In short, it was just such a
time as one, who is fond of strolling in the fields, is
apt to seize on with rapture, and which a seaman
sets down as a day lost in his reckoning.
Wilder was first drawn from his musings by the
sound of a dialogue that came from persons who
were evidently approaching. There was one voice,
in particular, that caused his blood to thrill, he knew
not why, and which appeared unaccountably, even
to himself, to set in motion every latent faculty of
his system. Profiting, by the formation of the ground,
he sprang, unseen, up a little bank, and,
approaching
an angle in a low wall, he found himself in the
immediate proximity of the speakers.
The wall enclosed the garden and
pleasure-grounds
of a mansion, that he now perceived was
the residence of Mrs de Lacey. A rustic
summer-house
,
which, in the proper season, had been nearly
buried in leaves and flowers, stood at no great
distance
from the road. By its elevation and position,
it commanded a view of the town, the harbour, the
isles of Massachusetts to the east, those of the
Providence
Plantations to the west, and, to the south, an
illimitable expanse of ocean. As it had now lost its
leafy covering, there was no difficulty in looking
directly
into its centre, through the rude pillars which
supported its little dome. Here Wilder discovered
precisely the very party to whose conversation he
had been a listener the previous day, while caged,
with the Rover, in the loft of the ruin. Though the
Admiral's widow and Mrs Wyllys were most in
advance
,
evidently addressing some one who was, like
himself, in the public road, the quick eye of the
young sailor soon detected the more enticing person
of the blooming Gertrude, in the back-ground. His
observations were, however, interrupted by a reply
from the individual who as yet was unseen.
Directed
by the voice, Wilder was next enabled to perceive
the person of a man in a green old age, who, seated
on a stone by the way side, appeared to be resting
his weary limbs, while he answered to some
interrogations
from the summer-house. Though his head
was white, and the hand, which grasped a long
walking-staff, sometimes trembled, as its owner
sought additional support from its assistance, there
was that in the costume, the manner, and the voice
of the speaker, which furnished sufficient evidence
of his having once been a veteran of the sea.
Lord! your Ladyship, Ma'am, he said, in
tones that were getting tremulous, even while they
retained the deep characteristic intonations of his
profession, we old sea-dogs never stop to look
into an almanac, to see which way the wind will
come after the next thaw, before we put to sea.
It is enough for us, that the sailing orders are
aboard, and that the Captain has taken leave of his
Lady.
Ah! the very words of the poor lamented
Admiral
!
exclaimed Mrs de Lacey, who evidently
found great satisfaction in pursuing the discourse
with this superannuated mariner. And then you
are of opinion, honest friend, that, when a ship is
ready, she should sail, whether the wind is
Here is another follower of the sea, opportunely
come to lend us his advice, interrupted Gertrude,
with a hurried air, as if to divert the attention of her
aunt from something very like a dogmatical
termination
of an argument that had just occurred between
her and Mrs Wyllys; perhaps to serve as an
umpire
.
True, said the latter. Pray, what think you
of the weather to-day, sir? would it be profitable to
sail in such a time, or not?
The young mariner reluctantly withdrew his eyes
from the blushing Gertrude, who, in her eagerness to
point him out, had advanced to the front, and was
now shrinking back, timidly, to the centre of the
building again, like one who already repented of her
temerity. He then fastened his look on her who
put the question; and so long and riveted was his
gaze, that she saw fit to repeat it, believing that
what she had first said was not properly understood.
There is little faith to be put in the weather,
Madam, was the dilatory reply. A man has
followed
the sea to but little purpose who is tardy in
making that discovery.
There was something so sweet and gentle, at the
same time that it was manly, in the voice of Wilder,
that the ladies, by a common impulse, seemed struck
with its peculiarities. The neatness of his attire,
which, while it was strictly professional, was worn
with an air of smartness, and even of gentility, that
rendered it difficult to suppose that he was not
entitled
to lay claim to a higher station in society than
that in which he actually appeared, added to this
impression. Bending her head, with a manner that
was intended to be polite, a little more perhaps in
self-respect than out of consideration to the other,
as if in deference to the equivocal character of his
appearance, Mrs de Lacey resumed the discourse.
These ladies, she said, are about to embark in
yonder ship, for the province of Carolina, and we
were consulting concerning the quarter in which the
wind will probably blow next. But, in such a vessel,
it cannot matter much, I should think, sir, whether
the wind were fair or foul.
I think not, was the reply. She looks to me
like a ship that will not do much, let the wind be as
it may.
She has the reputation of being a very fast
sailer
.Reputation!
we know she is such, having come
from home to the Colonies in the incredibly short
passage of seven weeks! But seamen have their
favourites and prejudices, I believe, like us poor
mortals ashore. You will therefore excuse me, if
I ask this honest veteran for an opinion on this
particular
point also. What do you imagine, friend, to
be the sailing qualities of yonder shipshe with the
peculiarly high top-gallant-booms, and such
conspicuous
round-tops?
The lip of Wilder curled, and a smile struggled
with the gravity of his countenance; but he
continued
silent. On the other hand, the old mariner arose,
and appeared to examine the ship, like one who
perfectly
comprehended the technical language of the
Admiral's widow.
The ship in the inner harbour, your Ladyship,
he answered, when his examination was finished,
which is, I suppose, the vessel that Madam means,
is just such a ship as does a sailor's eye good to look
on. A gallant and a safe boat she is, as I will swear;
and as to sailing, though she may not be altogether
a witch, yet is she a fast craft, or I'm no judge of
blue water, or of those that live on it.
Here is at once a difference of opinion!
exclaimed
Mrs de Lacey. I am glad, however, you
pronounce her safe; for, although seamen love a
fast-sailing vessel, these ladies will not like her the
less for the security. I presume, sir, you will not
dispute her being
safe
.
The very quality I should most deny, was the
laconic answer of Wilder.
It is remarkable! This is a veteran seaman, sir,
and he appears to think differently.
He may have seen more, in his time, than
myself
,
Madam; but I doubt whether he can, just now,
see as well. This is something of a distance to
discover
the merits or demerits of a ship: I have been
nigher.
Then you really think there is danger to be
apprehended
,
sir? demanded the soft voice of
Gertrude
,
whose fears had gotten the better of her
diffidence
.
I do. Had I mother, or sister, touching his
hat, and bowing to his fair interrogator, as he
uttered
the latter word with much emphasis, I would
hesitate to let her embark in that ship. On my
honour
,
Ladies, I do assure you, that I think this very
vessel in more danger than any ship which has left,
or probably will leave, a port in the Provinces this
autumn.
This is extraordinary! observed Mrs Wyllys.
It is not the character we have received of the
vessel, which has been greatly exaggerated, or she is
entitled to be considered as uncommonly convenient
and safe. May I ask, sir, on what circumstances you
have founded this opinion?
They are sufficiently plain. She is too lean in
the harping, and too full in the counter, to steer.
Then, she is as wall-sided as a church, and stows
too much above the water-line. Besides this, she
carries no head-sail, but all the press upon her will
be aft, which will jam her into the wind, and, more
than likely, throw her aback. The day will come
when that ship will go down stern foremost.
His auditors listened to this opinion, which
Wilder delivered in an oracular and very decided
manner, with that sort of secret faith, and
humble
dependance, which the uninstructed are so apt
to lend to the initiated in the mysteries of any
imposing
profession. Neither of them had certainly a
very clear perception of his meaning; but there
were, apparently, danger and death in his very
words. Mrs de Lacey felt it incumbent on her
peculiar
advantages, however, to manifest how well she
comprehended the subject.
These are certainly very serious evils! she
exclaimed. It is quite unaccountable that my
agent should have neglected to mention them. Is
there any other particular quality, sir, that strikes
your eye at this distance, and which you deem
alarming
?
Too many. You observe that her
top-gallant-masts
are fidded abaft; none of her lofty sails set
flying; and then, Madam, she has depended on
bobstays
and gammonings for the security of that very
important part of a vessel, the bowsprit.
Too true! too true! said Mrs de Lacey, in a
sort of professional horror. These things had
escaped
me; but I see them all, now they are
mentioned
.
Such neglect is highly culpable; more
especially
to rely on bobstays and gammonings for the
security of a bowsprit! Really, Mrs Wyllys, I can
never consent that my niece should embark in such
a vessel.
The calm, penetrating eye of Wyllys had been
riveted on the countenance of Wilder while he was
speaking, and she now turned it, with undisturbed
serenity, on the Admiral's widow, to reply.
Perhaps the danger has been a little magnified,
she observed. Let us inquire of this other seaman
what he thinks on these several points.And do you
see all these serious dangers to be apprehended,
friend, in trusting ourselves, at this season of the
year, in a passage to the Carolinas, aboard of yonder
ship?
Lord, Madam! said the gray-headed mariner,
with a chuckling laugh, these are new-fashioned
faults and difficulties, if they be faults and
difficulties
at all! In my time, such matters were never
heard of; and I confess I am so stupid as not to
understand
Vol. I. M
the half the young gentleman has been
saying.
It is some time, I fancy, old man, since you were
last at sea, Wilder coolly observed.
Some five or six years since the last time, and
fifty since the first, was the answer.
Then you do not see the same causes for
apprehension
?
Mrs Wyllys once more demanded.
Old and worn out as I am, Lady, if her Captain
will give me a birth aboard her, I will thank him
for the same as a favour.
Misery seeks any relief, said Mrs de Lacey, in
an under tone, and bestowing on her companions a
significant glance. I incline to the opinion of the
younger seaman; for he supports it with substantial,
professional reasons.
Mrs Wyllys suspended her questions, just as long
as complaisance to the last speaker seemed to
require
;
and then she resumed them as follows,
addressing
her next inquiry to Wilder.
And how do you explain this difference in
judgment
,
between two men who ought both to be so
well qualified to decide right?
I believe there is a well-known proverb which
will answer that question, returned the young man,
smiling: But some allowance must be made for the
improvements in ships; and, perhaps, some little
deference to the stations we have respectively filled
on board them.
Both very true. Still, one would think th
changes of half a dozen years cannot be so very
considerable, in a profession that is so exceedingly
ancient.
Your pardon, Madam. They require constant
practice to know them. Now, I dare say that yonder
worthy old tar is ignorant of the manner in which a
ship, when pressed by her canvas, is made to `cut
the waves with her taffrail.'
Impossible! cried the Admiral's widow; the
youngest and the meanest mariner must have been
struck with the beauty of such a spectacle.
Yes, yes, returned the old tar, who wore the
air of an offended man, and who, probably, had he
been ignorant of any part of his art, was not just
then in the temper to confess it; many is the proud
ship that I have seen doing the very same; and, as
the lady says, a grand and comely sight it is!
Wilder appeared confounded. He bit his lip, like
one who was over-reached either by excessive
ignorance
or exceeding cunning; but the
self-complacency
of Mrs de Lacey spared him the necessity of
an immediate reply.
It would have been an extraordinary
circumstance
,
truly, she said, that a man should have
grown white-headed on the seas, and never have
been struck with so noble a spectacle. But then,
my honest tar, you appear to be wrong in
overlooking
the striking faults in yonder ship, which this, a
athis gentleman has just, and so properly, named.
I do not call them faults, your Ladyship. Such
is the way my late brave and excellent Commander
always had his own ship rigged; and I am bold to
say that a better seaman, or a more honest man,
never served in his Majesty's fleet.
And you have served the King! How was your
beloved Commander named?
How should he be! By us, who knew him well,
he was called Fair-weather; for it was always
smooth water, and prosperous times, under his
orders
;
though, on shore, he was known as the gallant
and victorious Rear-Admiral de Lacey.
And did my late revered and skilful husband
cause his ships to be rigged in this manner? said
the widow, with a tremour in her voice, that bespoke
how much, and how truly, she was overcome by
surprise
and gratified pride.
The aged tar lifted his bending frame from the
stone, and bowed low, as he answered,
If I have the honour of seeing my Admiral's
Lady, it will prove a joyful sight to my old eyes.
Sixteen years did I serve in his own ship, and five
more in the same squadron. I dare say your
Ladyship
may have heard him speak of the captain of his
main-top, Bob Bunt.
I dare sayI dare sayHe loved to talk of
those who served him faithfully.
Ay, God bless him, and make his memory
glorious
!
He was a kind officer, and one that never
forgot
a friend, let it be that his duty kept him on a
yard or in the cabin. He was the sailor's friend,
that very same Admiral!
This is a grateful man, said Mrs de Lacey,
wiping her eyes, and I dare say a competent judge
of a vessel. And are you quite sure, worthy friend,
that my late revered husband had all his ships
arranged
like the one of which we have been talking?
Very sure, Madam; for, with my own hands,
did I assist to rig them.
Even to the bobstays?
And the gammonings, my Lady. Were the
Admiral
alive, and here, he would call you `a safe and
well-fitted ship,' as I am ready to swear.
Mrs de Lacey turned, with an air of great dignity
and entire decision, to Wilder, as she continued,
I have, then, made a small mistake in memory,
which is not surprising, when one recollects, that he
who taught me so much of the profession is no
longer
here to continue his lessons. We are much
obliged
to you, sir, for your opinion; but we must think
that you have over-rated the danger.
On my honour, Madam, interrupted Wilder,
laying his hand on his heart, and speaking with
singular
emphasis, I am sincere in what I say. I do
affirm, that I believe there will be great danger in
embarking in yonder ship; and I call Heaven to
witness
,
that, in so saying, I am actuated by no malice
to her Commander, her owners, nor any connected
with her.
We dare say, sir, you are very sincere: We only
think you a little in error, returned the Admiral's
widow, with a commiserating, and what she
intended
for a condescending, smile. We are your debtors
for your good intentions, at least. Come, worthy
veteran, we must not part here. You will gain
admission
by knocking at my door; and we shall talk
further of these matters.
Then, bowing to Wilder, she led the way up the
garden, followed by all her companions. The step
of Mrs de Lacey was proud, like the tread of one
conscious of all her advantages; while that of
Wyllys was slow as if she were buried in thought.
Gertrude kept close to the side of the latter, with
her face hid beneath the shade of a gipsy hat.
Wilder
fancied that he could discover the stolen and
anxious
glance that she threw back towards one who
had excited a decided emotion in her sensitive
bosom
,
though it was a feeling no more attractive than
alarm. He lingered until they were lost amid the
shrubbery. Then, turning to pour out his
disappointment
on his brother tar, he found that the old
man had made such good use of his time, as to be
entering the gate, most probably felicitating himself
on the prospect of reaping the reward of his recent
adulation.
M 2
CHAPTER IX.
He ran this way, and leap'd this orchard wall.
Shakspeare
.
Wilder
retired from the field like a defeated man.
Accident, or, as he was willing to term it, the
sycophancy
of the old mariner, had counteracted his
own little artifice; and he was now left without the
remotest chance of being again favoured with such
another opportunity of effecting his purpose. We
shall not, at this period of the narrative, enter into
a detail of the feelings and policy which induced
our adventurer to plot against the apparent interests
of those with whom he had so recently associated
himself; it is enough, for our present object, that
the facts themselves should be distinctly set before
the reader.
The return of the disappointed young sailor,
towards
the town, was moody and slow. More than
once he stopped short in the descent, and fastened
his eyes, for minutes together, on the different
vessels
in the harbour. But, in these frequent halts, no
evidence of the particular interest he took in any
one of the ships escaped him. Perhaps his gaze at
the Southern trader was longer, and more earnest,
than at any other; though his eye, at times,
wandered
curiously, and even anxiously, over every craft
that lay within the shelter of the haven.
The customary hour for exertion had now arrived,
and the sounds of labour were beginning to be heard,
issuing from every quarter of the place. The songs
of the mariners were rising on the calm of the
morning
,
with their peculiar, long-drawn intonations.
The ship in the inner harbour was among the first to
furnish this proof of the industry of her people, and
of her approaching departure. It was only as these
movements caught his eye, that Wilder seemed to be
thoroughly awakened from his abstraction, and to
pursue his observations with an undivided mind.
He saw the seamen ascend the rigging, in that lazy
manner which is so strongly contrasted by their
activity
in moments of need; and here and there a
human form was showing itself on the black and
ponderous yards. In a few moments, the
fore-top-sail
fell, from its compact compass on the yard, into
graceful and careless festoons. This, the attentive
Wilder well knew, was, among all trading vessels,
the signal of sailing. In a few more minutes, the
lower angles of this important sail were drawn to
the extremities of the corresponding spar beneath;
and then the heavy yard was seen slowly ascending
the mast, dragging after it the opening folds of the
sail, until the latter was tightened at all its edges,
and displayed itself in one broad, snow-white sheet
of canvas. Against this wide surface the light
currents
of air fell, and as often receded; the sail
bellying
and collapsing in a manner to show that, as
yet, they were powerless. At this point the
preparations
appeared suspended, as if the mariners,
having thus invited the breeze, were awaiting to see
if their invocation was likely to be attended with
success.
It was perhaps but a natural transition for him,
who so closely observed these indications of
departure
,
in the ship so often named, to turn his eyes on the
vessel which lay without the fort, in order to witness
the effect so manifest a signal had produced in her,
also. But the closest and the keenest scrutiny could
have detected no sign of any bond of interest
between
the two. While the former was making the
movements just described, the latter lay at her
anchors
,
without the smallest proof that man existed
within the mass of her black and inanimate hull. So
quiet and motionless did she seem, that one, who had
never been instructed in the matter, might readily
have believed her a fixture in the sea, some
symmetrical
and enormous excrescence thrown up by the
waves, with its mazes of lines and pointed fingers,
or one of those fantastic monsters that are believed
to exist in the bottom of the ocean, darkened by the
fogs and tempests of ages. But, to the
understanding
eye of Wilder, she exhibited a very different
spectacle. He easily saw, through all this apparently
drowsy quietude, those signs of readiness which a
seaman only might discover. The cable, instead of
stretching in a long declining line towards the
water
,
was short, or nearly up and down, as it
is equally termed in technical language, just scope
enough being allowed out-board to resist the power
of the lively tide, which acted on the deep keel of
the vessel. All her boats were in the water, and so
disposed and prepared, as to convince him they were
in a state to be employed in towing, in the shortest
possible time. Not a sail, nor a yard, was out of its
place, undergoing those repairs and examinations
which the mariner is wont to make so often, when
lying within the security of a suitable haven; nor
was there a single rope wanting, amid the hundreds
which interlaced the blue sky that formed the
back-ground
of the picture, that might be necessary, in
bringing every art of facilitating motion into instant
use. In short, the vessel, while seeming least
prepared
,
was most in a condition to move, or, if
necessary
,
to resort to her means of offence and defence.
The boarding-nettings, it is true, were triced to the
rigging, as on the previous day; but a sufficient
apology
was to be found for this act of extreme caution,
in the war, which exposed her to attacks from the
light French cruisers, that so often ranged, from the
islands of the West-Indies, along the whole coast of
the Continent, and in the position the ship had taken,
without the ordinary defences of the harbour. In
this state, the vessel, to one who knew her real
character
,
appeared like some beast of prey, or venomous
reptile, that lay in an assumed lethargy, to delude
the unconscious victim within the limits of its leap,
or nigh enough to receive the deadly blow of its
fangs.
Wilder shook his head, in a manner which said
plainly enough how well he understood this
treacherous
tranquillity, and continued his walk towards the
town, with the same deliberate step as before. He
had whiled away many minutes unconsciously, and
would probably have lost the reckoning of as many
more, had not his attention been suddenly diverted
by a slight touch on the shoulder. Starting at this
unexpected diversion, he turned, and saw, that, in his
dilatory progress, he had been overtaken by the
seaman
whom he had last seen in that very society in
which he would have given so much to have been
included himself.
Your young limbs should carry you ahead,
Master
,
said the latter, when he had succeeded in
attracting
the attention of Wilder, like a 'Mudian
going with a clean full, and yet I have fore-reached
upon you with my old legs, in such a manner as to
bring us again within hail.
Perhaps you enjoy the extraordinary advantage
of `cutting the waves with your taffrail,'  returned
Wilder, with a sneer. There can be no
accounting
for the head way one makes, when sailing in that
remarkable manner.
I see, brother, you are offended that I
followed
your motions, though, in so doing, I did no more
than obey a signal of your own setting. Did you
expect an old sea-dog like me, who has stood his
watch so long in a flag-ship, to confess ignorance in
any matter that of right belongs to blue water? How
the devil was I to know that there is not some
sort of craft, among the thousands that are getting
into fashion, which sails best stern foremost? They
say a ship is modelled from a fish; and, if such be
the case, it is only to make one after the fashion of
a crab, or an oyster, to have the very thing you
named.
It is well, old man. You have had your
reward
,
I suppose, in a handsome present from the
Admiral's widow, and you may now lie-by for a
season, without caring much as to the manner in
which they build their ships in future. Pray, do
you intend to shape your course much further down
this hill?
Until I get to the bottom.
I am glad of it, friend, for it is my especial
intention
to go up it again. As we say at sea, when
our conversation is ended, `A good time to you!'
The old seaman laughed, in his chuckling manner,
when he saw the young man turn abruptly on his
heel, and begin to retrace the very ground along
which he had just before descended.
Ah! you have never sailed with a
Rear-Admiral
,
he said, as he continued his own course in the
former direction, picking his way with a care suited
to his age and infirmities. No, there is no getting
the finish, even at sea, without a cruise or two
under
a flag, and that at the mizzen, too!
Intolerable old hypocrite! muttered Wilder
between
his teeth. The rascal has seen better
days, and is now perverting his knowledge to juggle
a foolish woman, to his profit. I am well quit of the
knave, who, I dare say, has adopted lying for his
trade, now labour is unproductive. I will go back.
The coast is quite clear, and who can say what may
happen next?
Most of the foregoing paragraph was actually
uttered
in the suppressed manner already described,
while the rest was merely meditated, which, considering the fact that our adventurer had no auditor,
was quite as well as if he had spoken it through a
trumpet. The expectation thus vaguely expressed,
however, was not likely to be soon realized. Wilder
sauntered up the hill, endeavouring to assume the
unconcerned air of an idler, if by chance his return
should excite attention; but, though he lingered
long in open view of the windows of Mrs de Lacey's
villa, he was not able to catch another glimpse of
its tenants. There were very evident symptoms of
the approaching journey, in the trunks and packages
that left the building for the town, and in the
hurried
and busy manner of the few servants that he
occasionally saw; but it would seem that the
principal
personages of the establishment had withdrawn
into the secret recesses of the building, probably for
the very natural purpose of confidential communion
and affectionate leave-taking. He was turning,
vexed and disappointed, from his anxious and
fruitless
watch, when he once more heard female voices
on the inner side of the low wall aganst which he
had been leaning. The sounds approached; nor
was it long before his quick ears again recognized
the musical voice of Gertrude.
It is tormenting ourselves, without sufficient
reason, my dear Madam, she said, as the speakers
drew sufficiently nigh to be distinctly overheard, to
allow any thing that may have fallen from such a
such an individual, to make the slightest
impression
.
I feel the justice of what you say, my love,
returned the mournful voice of her governess, and
yet am I so weak as to be unable entirely to shake
off a sort of superstitious feeling on this subject.
Gertrude, would you not wish to see that youth
again?
Me, Ma'am! exclaimed her lve, in a sort of
alarm. Why should you, or I, wish to see an
utter stranger again? and one so lownot low
perhapsbut one who is surely not altogether a
very suitable companion for
Well-born ladies, you would say. And why do
you imagine the young man to be so much our
inferior
?
Wilder thought there was a melody in the
intonations
of the youthful voice of the maiden, which in
some measure excused the personality, as she
answered
.
I am certainly not so fastidious in my notions of
birth and station as aunt de Lacey, she said,
laughing; but I should forget some of your own
instructions, dear Mrs Wyllys, did I not feel that
education and manners make a sensible difference
in the opinions and characters of all us poor mortals.
Very true, my child. But I confess I saw or
heard nothing that induces me to believe the young
man, of whom we are speaking, either uneducated
or vulgar. On the contrary, his language and
pronunciation
were those of a gentleman, and his air
was quite suited to his utterance. He had the frank
and simple manner of his profession; but you are
not now to learn that youths of the first families in
the provinces, or even in the kingdom, are often
placed in the service of the marine.
But they are officers, dear Madam: thisthis
individual wore the dress of a common mariner.
Not altogether. It was finer in its quality, and
more tasteful in its fashion, than is customary. I
have known Admirals do the same in their moments
of relaxation. Sailors of condition often love to
carry about them the testimonials of their profession,
without any of the trappings of their rank.
You then think he was an officerperhaps in
the King's service?
He might well have been so, though the fact,
that there is no cruiser in the port, would seem to
contradict it. But it was not so trifling a
circumstance
that awakened the unaccountable interest
that I feel. Gertrude, my love, it was my fortune
to have been much with seamen in early life. I
seldom
see one of that age, and of that spirited and
manly mien, without feeling emotion. But I tire
you; let us talk of other things.
Not in the least, dear Madam, Gertrude
hurriedly
interrupted. Since you think the stranger
a gentleman, there can be no harmthat is, it is not
quite so improper, I believeto speak of him. Can
there then be the danger he would make us think in
trusting ourselves in a ship of which we have so
good a report?
There was a strange, I had almost said wild,
admixture of irony and concern in his manner, that
is inexplicable! He certainly uttered nonsense part
of the time; but, then, he did not appear to do it
without a serious object. Gertrude, you are not as
familiar with nautical expressions as myself; and
perhaps you are ignorant that your good aunt, in her
admiration of a profession that she has certainly a
right to love, sometimes makes
I know itI know it; at least I often think so,
the other interrupted, in a manner which plainly
manifested that she found no pleasure in dwelling on
the disagreeable subject. It was exceedingly
presuming
,
Madam, in a stranger, however, to amuse
himself, if he did it, with so amiable and so trivial a
weakness, if indeed weakness it be.
It was, Mrs Wyllys steadily continuedshe
having, very evidently, such other matter in her
thoughts as to be a little inattentive to the sensitive
feelings of her companion;and yet he did not
appear to me like one of those empty minds that find
a pleasure in exposing the follies of others. You
may remember, Gertrude, that yesterday, while at
the ruin, Mrs de Lacey made some remarks
expressive
of her admiration of a ship under sail.
Vol. I. N
Yes, yes, I remember them, said the niece, a
little impatiently.
One of her terms was particularly incorrect, as
I happened to know from my own familiarity with
the language of sailors.
I thought as much, by the expression of your
eye, returned Gertrude; but
Listen, my love. It certainly was not
remarkable
that a lady should make a trifling error in the
use of so peculiar a language, but it is singular that
a seaman himself should commit the same fault in
precisely the same words. This did the youth of
whom we are speaking; and, what is no less
surprising
,
the old man assented to the same, just as if
they had been correctly uttered.
Perhaps, said Gertrude, in a low tone, they
may have heard, that attachment to this description
of conversation is a foible of Mrs de Lacey. I am
sure, after this, dear Madam, you cannot any longer
consider the stranger a gentleman!
I should think no more about it, love, were it
not for a feeling I can neither account for nor define.
I would I could again see him!
A slight exclamation from her companion
interrupted
her words; and, the next instant, the subject
of her thoughts leaped the wall, apparently in quest
of the rattan that had fallen at the feet of Gertrude,
and occasioned her alarm. After apologizing for his
intrusion on the private grounds of Mrs de Lacey,
and recovering his lost property, Wilder was slowly
preparing to retire, as if nothing had happened.
There was a softness and delicacy in his manner,
during the first moment of his appearance, which
was probably intended to convince the younger of
the ladies that he was not entirely without some
claims to the title she had so recently denied him,
and which was certainly not without its effect. The
countenance of Mrs Wyllvs was pale, and her lip
quivered, though the steadiness of her voice proved
it was not with alarm, as she hastily said,
Remain a moment, sir, if need does not require
your presence elsewhere. There is something so
remarkable in this meeting, that I could wish to
improve it.
Wilder bowed, and again faced the ladies, whom
he had just been about to quit, like one who felt
he had no right to intrude a moment longer than had
been necessary to recover that which had been lost
by his pretended awkwardness. When Mrs Wyllys
found that her wish was so unexpectedly realized,
she hesitated as to the manner in which she should
next proceed.
I have been thus bold, sir, she said, in some
embarrassment, on account of the opinion you so
lately expressed concerning the vessel which now
lies ready to put to sea, the instant she is favoured
with a wind.
`The Royal Caroline?' Wilder carelessly
replied.
That is her name, I believe.
I hope, Madam, that nothing which I have said,
he hastily continued, will have an effect to
prejudice
you against the ship. I will pledge myself that
she is made of excellent materials, and then I have
not the least doubt but she is very ably commanded.
And yet have you not hesitated to say, that you
consider a passage in this very vessel more
dangerous
than one in any other ship that will probably
leave a port of the Provinces in many months to
come.
I did, answered Wilder, with a manner not to
be mistaken.
Will you explain your reasons for this opinion?
If I remember rightly, I gave them to the lady
whom I had the honour to see an hour ago.
That individual, sir, is no longer here, was the
grave reply of Wyllys; neither is she to trust her
person in the vessel. This young lady and myself,
with our attendants, will be the only passengers.
I understood it so, returned Wilder, keeping
his thoughtful gaze riveted on the speaking
countenance
of the deeply interested Gertrude.
And, now that there is no apprehension of any
mistake, may I ask you to repeat the reasons why
you think there will be danger in embarking in the
`Royal Caroline?'
Wilder started, and even had the grace to colour,
as he met the calm and attentive look of Mrs Wyllys's
searching, but placid eye.
You would not have me repeat, Madam, he
stammered, what I have already said on the subject?
I would not, sir; once will suffice for such an
explanation; still am I persuaded you have other
reasons for your words.
It is exceedingly difficult for a seaman to speak
of ships in any other than technical language, which
must be the next thing to being unintelligible to one
of your sex and condition. You have never been at
sea, Madam?
Very often, sir.
Then may I hope, possibly, to make myself
understood. You must be conscious, Madam, that
no small part of the safety of a ship depends on the
very material point of keeping her right side
upper-most
:
sailors call it `making her stand up.' Now,
I need not say, I am quite sure, to a lady of your
intelligence, that, if the `Caroline' fall on her beam,
there will be imminent hazard to all on board.
Nothing can be clearer; but would not the
same risk be incurred in any other vessel?
Without doubt, if any other vessel should trip
But I have pursued my profession for many years,
without meeting with such a misfortune, but once.
Then, the fastenings of the bowsprit
Are good as ever came from the hand of
rigger
,
said a voice behind them.
The whole party turned; and beheld, at a little
distance, the old seaman already introduced,
mounted on some object on the other side of the
wall, against which he was very coolly leaning, and
whence he overlooked the whole of the interior of
the grounds.
I have been at the water side to look at the boat,
at the wish of Madam de Lacey, the widow of my
late noble Commander and Admiral; and, let other
men think as they may, I am ready to swear that
the `Royal Caroline' has as well secured a bowsprit
as any ship that carries the British flag! Ay, nor is
that all I will say in her favour; she is throughout
neatly and lightly sparred, and has no more of a
wall-side than the walls of yonder church
tumble-home
.
I am an old man, and my reckoning has got
to the last leaf of the log-book; therefore it is little
interest that I have, or can have, in this brig or that
schooner, but this much will I say, which is, that it
is just as wicked, and as little likely to be forgiven,
to speak scandal of a wholesome and stout ship, as
it is to talk amiss of mortal Christian.
The old man spoke with energy, and a great show
of honest indignation, which did not fail to make an
impression on the ladies, at the same time that it
brought certain ungrateful admonitions to the
conscience
of the understanding Wilder.
You perceive, sir, said Mrs Wyllys, after
waiting
in vain for the reply of the young seaman, that
it is very possible for two men, of equal advantages,
to disagree on a professional point. Which am I to
believe?
Whichever your own excellent sense should tell
you is most likely to be correct. I repeat, and in a
sincerity to whose truth I call Heaven to witness, that
N 2
no mother or sister of mine should, with my consent,
embark in the `Caroline.'
This is incomprehensible! said Mrs Wyllys,
turning to Gertrude, and speaking only for her ear.
My reason tells me we have been trifled with by
this young man; and yet are his protestations so
earnest, and apparently so sincere, that I cannot shake
off the impression they have made. To which of the
two, my love, do you feel most inclined to yield your
credence?
You know how very ignorant I am, dear Madam,
of all these things, said Gertrude, dropping her eyes
to the faded sprig she was plucking; but, to me,
that old wretch has a very presuming and vicious
look.
You then think the younger most entitled to our
belief?
Why not; since you, also, think he is a
gentleman
?
I know not that his superior situation in life
entitles
him to greater credit. Men often obtain such
advantages only to abuse them.I am afraid, sir,
continued Mrs Wyllys, turning to the expecting
Wilder, that unless you see fit to be more frank,
we shall be compelled to refuse you our faith, and
still persevere in our intention to profit, by the
opportunity
of the `Royal Caroline,' to get to the
Carolinas.
From the bottom of my heart, Madam, do I
regret
the determination.
It may still be in your power to change it, by
being explicit.
Wilder appeared to muse, and once or twice his
lips moved, as if he were about to speak. Mrs
Wyllys and Gertrude awaited his intentions with
intense interest; but, after a long and seemingly
hesitating pause, he disappointed both, by saying,
I am sorry that I have not the ability to make
myself better understood. It can only be the fault
of my dullness; for I again affirm that the danger is
as apparent to my eyes as the sun at noon day.
Then we must continue blind, sir, returned
Mrs Wyllys, with a cold salute. I thank you for
your good and kind intentions, but you cannot blame
us for not consenting to follow advice which is
buried
in so much obscurity. Although in our own
grounds, we shall be pardoned the rudeness of
leaving
you. The hour appointed for our departure has
now arrived.
Wilder returned the grave bow of Mrs Wyllys
with one quite as formal as her own; though he
bent with greater grace, and with more cordiality,
to the deep but hurried curtesy of Gertrude
Grayson
.
He remained in the precise spot, however, in
which they left him, until he saw them enter the
villa; and he even fancied he could catch the anxious
expression of another timid glance which the latter
threw in his direction, as her light form appeared to
float from before his sight. Placing one hand on the
wall, the young sailor then leaped into the highway.
As his feet struck the ground, the slight shock seemed
to awake him from his abstraction, and he became
conscious that he stood within six feet of the old
mariner, who had now twice stepped so rudely
between
him and the object he had so much at heart.
The latter did not allow him time to give utterance
to his disappointment; for he was the first himself
to speak.
Come, brother, he said, in friendly, confidential
tones, and shaking his head, like one who wished to
show to his companion that he was aware of the
deception he had attempted to practise; come,
brother, you have stood far enough on this tack, and
it is time to try another. Ay, I've been young
myself
in my time, and I know what a hard matter it
is to give the devil a wide birth, when there is fun
to be found in sailing in his company: But old age
brings us to our reckonings; and, when the life is
getting on short allowance with a poor fellow, he
begins to think of being sparing of his tricks, just
as water is saved in a ship, when the calms set in,
after it has been spilt about decks like rain, for weeks
and months on end. Thought comes with gray hairs,
and no one is the worse for providing a little of it
among his other small stores.
I had hoped, when I gave you the bottom of the
hill, and took the top myself, returned Wilder,
without even deigning to look at his disagreeable
companion, that we had parted company for ever.
As you seem, however, to prefer the high ground, I
leave you to enjoy it at your leisure; I shall descend
into the town.
The old man shuffled after him, with a gait that
rendered it difficult for Wilder, who was by this time
in a fast walk, to outstrip him, without resorting to
the undignified expedient of an actual flight. Vexed
alike with himself and his tormentor, he was
tempted
to offer some violence to the latter; and then,
recalled to his reccollection by the dangerous
impulse
,
he moderated his pace, and continued his
route, with a calm determination to be superior to
any emotions that such a pitiful object could excite.
You were going under such a press of sail,
young Master, said the stubborn old mariner, who
still kept a pace or two in his rear, that I had to set
every thing to hold way with you; but you now seem
to be getting reasonable, and we may as well lighten
the passage by a little profitable talk. You had nearly
made the oldish lady believe the good ship `Royal
Caroline' was the flying Dutchman!
And why did you see fit to undeceive her?
bluntly demanded Wilder.
Would you have a man, who has followed blue
water fifty years, scandalize wood and iron after so
wild a manner? The character of a ship is as dear
to an old sea-dog, as the character of his wife or his
sweetheart.
Hark ye, friend; you live, I suppose, like other
people, by eating and drinking?
A little of the first, and a good deal of the last,
returned the other, with a chuckle.
And you get both, like most seaman, by hard
work, great risk, and the severest exposure?
Hum! `Making our money like horses, and
spending it like asses!'that is said to be the way
with us all.
Now, then, have you an opportunity of making
some with less labour; you may spend it to suit your
own fancy. Will you engage in my service for a few
hours, with this for your bounty, and as much more
for wages, provided you deal honestly?
The old man stretched out a hand, and took the
guinea which Wilder had showed over his shoulder,
without appearing to deem it at all necessary to face
his recruit.
It's no sham! said the latter, stopping to ring
the metal on a stone.
'Tis gold, as pure as ever came from the Mint.
The other very coolly pocketed the coin; and
then, with a certain hardened and decided way, as
if he were now ready for any thing, he demanded,
What hen-roost am I to rob for this?
You are to do no such pitiful act; you have only
to perform a little of that which, I fancy, you are no
stranger to: Can you keep a false log?
Ay; and swear to it, on occasion. I understand
you. You are tired of twisting the truth like a new
laid rope, and you wish to turn the job over to me.
Something so. You must unsay all you have
said concerning yonder ship; and, as you have had
cunning enough to get on the weather-side of Mrs
de Lacey, you must improve your advantage, by
making matters a little worse than I have
represented
them to be. Tell me, that I may judge of your
qualifications, did you, in truth, ever sail with the
worthy Rear-Admiral?
As I am an honest and religious Christian, I
never heard of the honest old man before yesterday.
Oh! you may trust me in these matters! I am not
likely to spoil a history for want of facts.
I think you will do. Now listen to my plan.
Stop, worthy messmate, interrupted the other:
`Stones can hear,' they say on shore: we sailors
know that the pumps have ears on board a ship:
have you ever seen such a place as the `Foul
Anchor'
tavern, in this town?
I have been there.
I hope you like it well enough to go again. Here
we will part. You shall haul on the wind, being the
lightest sailer, and make a stretch or two among
these houses, until you are well to windward of
yonder
church. You will then have plain sailing down
upon hearty Joe Joram's, where is to be found as
snug an anchorage, for an honest trader, as at any
inn in the Colonies. I will keep away down this
hill, and, considering the difference in our rate of
sailing, we shall not be long after one another in
port.
And what is to be gained by so much
manuvering
?
Can you listen to nothing which is not
steeped
in rum?
You offend me by the word. You shall see what
it is to send a sober messenger on your errands, when
the time comes. But, suppose we are seen speaking
to each other on the highwaywhy, as you are in
such low repute just now, I shall lose my character
with the ladies altogether.
There may be reason in that. Hasten, then, to
meet me; for, as they spoke of embarking soon,
there is not a minute to lose.
No fear of their breaking ground so suddenly,
returned the old man, holding the palm of his hand
above his head to catch the wind. There is not
yet air enough to cool the burning cheeks of that
young beauty; and, depend on it, the signal will not
be given to them until the sea breeze is fairly come
in.
Wilder waved his hand, and stepped lightly along
the road the other had indicated to him, ruminating
on the figure which the fresh and youthful charms
of Gertrude had extorted from one even as old and
as coarse as his new ally. His companion followed
his person for a moment, with an amused look, and
an ironical cast of the eye; and then he also
quickened
his pace, in order to reach the place of
rendezvous
in sufficient season.
CHAPTER X.
Forewarn him, that he use no scurrilous words.
Winter's Tale
.
As Wilder approached the Foul Anchor, he
beheld every symptom of some powerful excitement
existing within the bosom of the hitherto peaceful
town. More than half the women, and perhaps one
fourth of all the men, within a reasonable proximity
to that well known inn, were assembled before its
door, listening to one of the former sex, who
declaimed
,
in tones so shrill and penetrating, as not to
leave the proprietors of the curious and attentive
countenances, in the outer circle of the crowd, the
smallest rational ground of complaint on the score
of impartiality. Our adventurer hesitated, with the
sudden consciousness of one but newly embarked
in such enterprises as that in which he had so
recently
enlisted, when he first saw these signs of
commotion; nor did he determine to proceed until
he caught a glimpse of his aged confederate,
elbowing
his way through the mass of bodies, with a
perseverance
and energy that promised to bring him
right speedily into the very presence of her who
uttered
such loud and piercing plaints. Encouraged
by this example, the young man advanced, but was
content to take his position, for a moment, in a
situation
that left him entire command of his limbs,
and, consequently, in a condition to make a timely
retreat, should the latter measure prove at all
expedient
.
I call on you, Earthly Potter, and you,
Preserved
Green, and you, Faithful Wanton, cried Desire,
as he came within hearing, pausing to catch a
morsel
of breath, before she proceeded in her affecting
appeal to the neighbourhood; and you too,
Upright
Crook, and you too, Relent Flint, and you,
Wealthy Poor, to be witnesses and testimonials in
my behalf. You, and all and each of you, can
qualify
,
if need should be, that I have ever been a slaving
and loving consort of this man who has deserted me
in my age, leaving so many of his own children on
my hands, to feed and to rear, besides
What certainty is it, interrupted the landlord
of the Foul Anchor most inopportunely, that
the good-man has absconded? It was a merry day,
the one that is just gone, and it is quite in reason to
believe your husband was, like some others I can
namea thing I shall not be so unwise as to do
a little of what I call how-come-ye-so, and that
his nap holds on longer than common. I'll
engage
we shall all see the honest tailor creeping out
of some of the barns shortly, as fresh and as ready
for his bitters as if he had not wet his throat with
cold water since the last time of general
rej'icing
.
A low but pretty general laugh followed this effort
of tavern wit, though it failed in exciting even a
smile on the disturbed visage of Desire, which, by
its doleful outline, appeared to have taken leave of
all its risible properties for ever.
Not he, not he, exclaimed the disconsolate
consort of the good-man; he has not the heart to
get himself courageous, in loyal drinking, on such an
occasion as a merry-making on account of his
Majesty's
glory; he was a man altogether for work; and
it is chiefly for his hard labour that I have reason to
complain. After being so long used to rely on his
toil, it is a sore cross to a dependant woman to be
thrown suddenly and altogether on herself for
support
.
But I'll be revenged on him, if there's law to
be found in Rhode Island, or in the Providence
Plantations! Let him dare to keep his pitiful
image out of my sight the lawful time, and then,
when he returns, he shall find himself, as many a
vagabond has been before him, without wife, as he
will be without house to lay his graceless head in.
*
*
It would seem, from this declaration, that certain legal
antiquarians, who have contended that the community is
indebted
to Desire for the unceremonious manner of clipping
the nuptial knot, which is so well known to exist, even to this
hour, in the community of which she was a member, are
entirely
in the wrong. It evidently did not take its rise in her
example, since she clearly alludes to it, as a means before
resorted to by the injured innocents of her own sex.
Then, catching a glimpse of the inquiring face of the
old seaman, who by this time had worked his way
to her very side, she abruptly added, Here is a
stranger in the place, and one who has lately arrived!
Did you meet a straggling runaway, friend, in your
journey hither?
I had too much trouble in navigating my old
bulk on dry land, to log the name and rate of every
Vol. I. O
craft I fell in with, returned the other, with infinite
composure; and yet, now you speak of such a
thing, I do remember to have come within hail of a
poor fellow, just about the beginning of the
morning-watch
,
somewhere hereaway, up in the bushes
between this town and the bit of a ferry that carries
one on to the main.
What sort of a man was he? demanded five or
six anxious voices, in a breath; among which the
tones of Desire, however, maintained their
supremacy
,
rising above those of all the others, like the
strains of a first-rate artist flourishing a quaver above
the more modest thrills of the rest of the troupe.
What sort of a man! Why a fellow with his
arms rigged athwart ship, and his legs stepped like
those of all other Christians, to be sure: but, now
you speak of it, I remember that he had a bit of a
sheep-shank in one of his legs, and rolled a good
deal as he went ahead.
It was he! added the same chorus of voices.
Five or six of the speakers instantly stole slyly out
of the throng, with the commendable intention of
hurrying after the delinquent, in order to secure the
payment of certain small balances of account, in
which the unhappy and much traduced good-man
stood indebted to the several parties. Had we leisure
to record the manner in which these praiseworthy
efforts, to save an honest penny, were conducted,
the reader might find much subject of amusement in
the secret diligence with which each worthy
tradesman
endeavoured to outwit his neighbour, on the
occasion, as well as in the cunning subterfuges which
were adopted to veil their real designs, when all met
at the ferry, deceived and disappointed in their
object
.
As Desire, however, had neither legal demand
on, nor hope of favour from, her truant husband, she
was content to pursue, on the spot, such further
inquiries
in behalf of the fugitive as she saw fit to make.
It is possible the pleasures of freedom, in the shape
of the contemplated divorce, were already floating
before her active mind, with the soothing
perspective
of second nuptials, backed by the influence of
such another picture as might be drawn from the
recollections of her first love; the whole having a
manifest tendency to pacify her awakened spirit, and
to give a certain portion of directness and energy to
her subsequent interrogatories.
Had he a thieving look? she demanded,
without
attending to the manner in which she was so
suddenly deserted by all those who had just
expressed
the strongest sympathy in her loss. Was he a
man that had the air of a sneaking runaway?
As for his head-piece, I will not engage to give
a very true account, returned the old mariner;
though he had the look of one who had been kept,
a good deal of his time, in the lee scuppers. If I
should give an opinion, the poor devil has had too
much
Idle time, you would say; yes, yes; it has been
his misfortune to be out of work a good deal
latterly
,
and wickedness has got into his head, for want of
something better to think of. Too much
Wife, interrupted the old man, emphatically.
Another general, and far less equivocal laugh, at the
expense of Desire, succeeded this blunt declaration.
Nothing intimidated by such a manifest assent to the
opinion of the hardy seaman, the undaunted virago
resumed,
Ah! you little know the suffering and
forbearance
I have endured with the man in so many long
years. Had the fellow you met the look of one who
had left an injured woman behind him?
I can't say there was any thing about him which
said, in so many words, that the woman he had left
at her moorings was more or less injured; returned
the tar, with commendable discrimination, but there
was enough about him to show, that, however and
wherever he may have stowed his wife, if wife she
was, he had not seen fit to leave all her outfit at
home. The man had plenty of female toggery around
his neck; I suppose he found it more agreeable than
her arms.
What! exclaimed Desire, looking aghast; has
he dared to rob me! What had he of mine? not the
gold beads!
I'll not swear they were no sham.
The villain! continued the enraged termagant,
catching her breath like a person that had just been
submerged in water longer than is agreeable to
human
nature, and forcing her way through the crowd,
with such vigour as soon to be in a situation to fly to
her secret hordes, in order to ascertain the extent of
her misfortune; the sacrilegious villain! to rob the
wife of his bosom, the mother of his own children,
and
Well, well, again interrupted the landlord of
the `Foul Anchor,' with his unseasonable voice, I
never before heard the good-man suspected of
roguery
,
though the neighbourhood was ever backward in
calling him chicken-hearted.
The old seaman looked the publican full in the
face, with much meaning in his eye, as he
answered
,
If the honest tailor never robbed any but that
virago, there would be no great thieving sin to be
laid to his account; for every bead he had about
him wouldn't serve to pay his ferryage. I could
carry all the gold on his neck in my eye, and see
none the worse for its company. But it is a shame
to stop the entrance into a licensed tavern, with such
a mob, as if it were an embargoed port; and so I
have sent the woman after her valuables, and all the
idlers, as you see, in her wake.
Joe Joram gazed on the speaker like a man
enthralled
by some mysterious charm; neither
answering
,
nor altering the direction of his eye, for near a
minute. Then, suddenly breaking out in a deep and
powerful laugh, as if he were not backward in
enjoying
the artifice, which certainly had produced the
effect of removing the crowd from his own door to
that of the absent tailor, he flourished his arm in the
way of greeting, and exclaimed,
Welcome, tarry Bob; welcome, old boy,
welcome
!
From what cloud have you fallen? and
before
what wind have you been running, that
Newport
is again your harbour?
Too many questions to be answered in an open
roadstead, friend Joram; and altogether too dry a
subject for a husky conversation. When I am
birthed
in one of your inner cabins, with a mug of flip
and a kid of good Rhode Island beef within
grappling
distance, why, as many questions as you choose,
and as many answers, you know, as suits my
appetite
.
And who's to pay the piper, honest Bob? whose
ship's purser will pay your check now? continued
the publican, showing the old sailor in, however,
with a readiness that seemed to contradict the doubt,
expressed by his words, of any reward for such
extraordinary
civility.
Who? interrupted the other, displaying the
money so lately received from Wilder, in such a
manner that it might be seen by the few by-standers
who remained, as though he would himself furnish
a sufficient apology for the distinguished manner in
which he was received; who but this gentleman?
I can boast of being backed by the countenance of
his Sacred Majesty himself, God bless him!
God bless him! echoed several of the loyal
lieges; and that too in a place which has since
O 2
heard such very different cries, and where the same
words would now excite nearly as much surprise,
though far less alarm, than an earthquake.
God bless him! repeated Joram, opening the
door of an inner room, and pointing the way to his
customer, and all that are favoured with his
countenance
!
Walk in, old Bob, and you shall soon
grapple
with half an ox.
Wilder, who had approached the outer door of
the tavern as the mob receded, witnessed the retreat
of the two worthies into the recesses of the house,
and immediately entered the bar-room himself.
While deliberating on the manner in which he should
arrive at a communication with his new confederate,
without attracting too much attention to so odd an
association, the landlord returned in person to
relieve
him. After casting a hasty glance around the
apartment, his look settled on our adventurer, whom
he approached in a manner half-doubting
half-decided
.
What success, sir, in looking for a ship? he
demanded
,
now recognizing, for the first time, the
stranger with whom he had before held converse
that morning. More hands than places to employ
them?
I am not sure it will so prove. In my walk on
the hill, I met an old seaman, who
Hum! interrupted the publican, with an
intelligible
,
though stolen, sign to follow. You will
find it more convenient, sir, to take your breakfast
in another room. Wilder followed his conductor,
who left the public apartment by a different door
from that by which he had led his other guest into
the interior of the house, wondering at the air of
mystery that the innkeeper saw fit to assume on the
occasion. After leading him by a circuitous passage,
the latter showed Wilder, in profound silence, up
a private stair-way, into the very attic of the
building
.
Here he rapped lightly at a door, and was bid
to enter, by a voice that caused our adventurer to
start by its deepness and severity. On finding
himself
,
however, in a low and confined room, he saw
no other occupant than the seaman who had just
been greeted by the publican as an old acquaintance,
and by a name to which he might, by his attire, well
lay claim to be entitledthat of tarry Bob. While
Wilder was staring about him, a good deal surprised
at the situation in which he was placed, the
landlord
retired, and he found himself alone with his
confederate. The latter was already engaged in
discussing the fragment of the ox, just mentioned,
and in quaffing of some liquid that seemed equally
adapted to his taste, although sufficient time had not
certainly been allowed to prepare the beverage he
had seen fit to order. Without allowing his visiter
leisure for much further reflection, the old mariner
made a motion to him to take the only vacant chair
in the room, while he continued his employment on
the surloin with as much assiduity as though no
interruption
had taken place.
Honest Joe Joram always makes a friend of his
butcher, he said, after ending a draught that
threatened
to drain the mug to the bottom. There is
such a flavour about his beef, that one might mistake
it for the fin of a halibut. You have been in foreign
parts, shipmate, or I may call you `messmate,' since
we are both anchored nigh the same kidbut you
have doubtless been in foreign countries?
Often; I should else be but a miserable
seaman
.
Then, tell me frankly, have you ever been in
the kingdom that can furnish such rationsfish,
flesh, fowl, and fruitsas this very noble land of
America, in which we are now both moored? and
in which I suppose we both of us were born?
It would be carrying the love of home a little
too far, to believe in such universal superiority,
returned Wilder, willing to divert the conversation
from his real object, until he had time to arrange his
ideas, and assure himself he had no other auditor but
his visible companion. It is generally admitted
that England excels us in all these articles.
By whom? by your know-nothings and
bold-talkers
.
But I, a man who has seen the four quarters
of the earth, and no small part of the water besides,
give the lie to such empty boasters. We are colonies,
friend, we are colonies; and it is as bold in a colony
to tell the mother that it has the advantage, in this or
that particular, as it would be in a foremast Jack to
tell his officer he was wrong, though he knew it to
be true. I am but a poor man, Mr By what name
may I call your Honour?
Me! my name?Harris.
I am but a poor man, Mr Harris; but I have had
charge of a watch in my time, old and rusty as I
seem, nor have I spent so many long nights on deck
without keeping thoughts at work, though I may not
have overhaul'd as much philosophy, in so doing, as
a paid parish priest, or a fee'd lawyer. Let me tell
you, it is a disheartening thing to be nothing but a
dweller in a colony. It keeps down the pride and
spirit of a man, and lends a hand in making him what
his masters would be glad to have him. I shall say
nothing of fruits, and meats, and other eatables, that
come from the land of which both you and I have
heard and know too much, unless it be to point to
yonder sun, and then to ask the question, whether
you think King George has the power to make it
shine on the bit of an island where he lives, as it
shines here in his broad provinces of America?
Certainly not: and yet you know that every one
allows that the productions of England are so much
superior
Ay, ay; a colony always sails under the lee of
its mother. Talk does it all, friend Harris. Talk,
talk, talk; a man can talk himself into a fever, or
set a ship's company by the ears. He can talk a
cherry into a peach, or a flounder into a whale. Now
here is the whole of this long coast of America,
and all her rivers, and lakes, and brooks, swarming
with such treasures as any man might fatten on, and
yet his Majesty's servants, who come among us, talk
of their turbots, and their sole, and their carp, as if
the Lord had only made such fish, and the devil had
let the others slip through his fingers, without asking
leave.
Wilder turned, and fastened a look of surprise on
the old man, who continued to eat, however, as if he
had uttered nothing but what might be considered as
a matter-of-course opinion.
You are more attached to your birth-place than
loyal, friend, said the young mariner, a little
austerely
.
I am not fish-loyal at least. What the Lord made,
one may speak of, I hope, without offence. As to
the Government, that is a rope twisted by the hands
of man, and
And what? demanded Wilder, perceiving that
the other hesitated.
Hum! Why, I fancy man will undo his own
work, when he can find nothing better to busy
himself
in. No harm in saying that either, I hope?
So much, that I must call your attention to the
business that has brought us together. You have not
so soon forgotten the earnest-money you received?
The old sailor shoved the dish from before him;
and, folding his arms, he looked his companion full
in the eye, as he calmly answered,
When I am fairly enlisted in a service, I am a
man to be counted on. I hope you sail under the
same colours, friend Harris?
It would be dishonest to be otherwise. There
is one thing you will excuse, before I proceed to
detail
my plans and wishes: I must take occasion to
examine this closet, in order to be sure that we are
actually alone.
You will find little there except the toggery of
some of honest Joe's female gender. As the door
is not fastened with any extraordinary care, you have
only to look for yourself, since seeing is believing.
Wilder did not seem disposed to wait for this
permission
;
he opened the door, even while the other
was speaking, and, finding that the closet actually
contained little else than the articles named by his
companion, he turned away, like a man who was
disappointed.
Were you alone when I entered? he demanded,
after a thoughtful pause of a moment.
Honest Joram, and yourself.
But no one else?
None that I saw, returned the other, with a
manner that betrayed a slight uneasiness; if you
think otherwise, let us overhaul the room. Should
my hand fall on a listener, the salute will not be
light.
Holdanswer me one question; who bade me
enter?
Tarry Bob, who had arisen with a good deal of
alacrity, now reflected in his turn for an instant, and
then he closed his musing, by indulging in a low
laugh.
Ah! I see that you have got your ideas a little
jammed. A man cannot talk the same, with a small
portion of ox in his mouth, as though his tongue had
as much sea-room as a ship four-and-twenty hours
out.
Then, you spoke?
I'll swear to that much, returned Bob,
resuming
his seat like one who had settled the whole
affair
to his entire satisfaction; and now, friend
Harris
,
if you are ready to lay bare your mind, I'm just
as ready to look at it.
Wilder did not appear to be quite as well content
with the explanation as his companion, but he drew
a chair, and prepared to open his subject.
I am not to tell you, friend, after what you have
heard and seen, that I have no very strong desire
that the lady with whom we have both spoken this
morning, and her companion, should sail in the
`Royal Caroline.' I suppose it is enough for our
purposes that you should know the fact; the reason
why I prefer they should remain where they are, can
be of no moment as to the duty you are to
undertake
.
You need not tell an old seaman how to gather
in the slack of a running idea! cried Bob,
chuckling
and winking at his companion in a way that
displeased
the latter by its familiarity; I have not
lived fifty years on blue water, to mistake it for the
skies.
You then fancy, sir, that my motive is no secret
to you?
It needs no spy-glass to see, that, while the old
people say, `Go,' the young people would like to
stay where they are.
You do both of the young people much
injustice
,
then; for, until yesterday, I never laid eyes on
the person you mean.
Ah! I see how it is; the owners of the `
Caroline'
have not been so civil as they ought, and you
are paying them a small debt of thanks!
That is possibly a means of retaliation that might
suit your taste, said Wilder, gravely; but which
is not much in accordance with mine. The whole
of the parties are utter strangers to me.
Hum! Then I suppose you belong to the
vessel
in the outer harbour; and, though you don't hate
your enemies, you love your friends. We must
contrive
the means to coax the ladies to take passage
in the slaver.
God forbid!
God forbid! Now I think, friend Harris, you set
up the backstays of your conscience a little too
taught. Though I cannot, and do not, agree with
you in all you have said concerning the `Royal
Caroline
,'
I see no reason to doubt but we shall have
but one mind about the other vessel. I call her a
wholesome looking and well proportioned craft, and
one that a King might sail in with comfort.
I deny it not; still I like her not.
Well, I am glad of that; and, since the matter
is fairly before us, master Harris, I have a word or
two to say concerning that very ship. I am an old
sea-dog, and one not easily blinded in matters of the
trade. Do you not find something, that is not in
character for an honest trader, in the manner in which
they have laid that vessel at her anchors, without the
fort, and the sleepy look she bears, at the same time
that any one may see she is not built to catch oysters,
or to carry cattle to the islands?
As you have said, I think her a wholesome and
a tight-built ship. Of what evil practice, however,
do you suspect her?perhaps she robs the revenue?
Hum! I am not sure it would be pleasant to
smuggle in such a vessel, though your contraband is
a merry trade, after all. She has a pretty battery, as
well as one can see from this distance.
I dare say her owners are not tired of her yet,
and would gladly keep her from falling into the hands
of the French.
Well, well, I may be wrong; but, unless sight
is going with my years, all is not as it would be on
board that slaver, provided her papers were true,
and she had the lawful name to her letters of marque.
What think you, honest Joe, in this matter?
Wilder turned, impatiently, and found that the
landlord had entered the room, with a step so light
as to have escaped his attention, which had been
drawn to his companion with a force that the reader
will readily comprehend. The air of surprise, with
which Joram regarded the speaker, was certainly
not affected; for the question was repeated, and in
still more definite terms, before he saw fit to reply.
I ask you, honest Joe, if you think the slaver, in
the outer harbour of this port, a true man?
You come across one, Bob, in your bold way,
with such startling questions, returned the publican,
casting his eyes obliquely around him, as if he would
fain make sure of the character of the audience to
which he spoke, such stirring opinions, that really
I am often non-plushed to know how to get the ideas
together, to make a saving answer.
It is droll enough, truly, to see the landlord of
the `Foul Anchor' dumb-foundered, returned the
old man, with perfect composure in mien and eye.
I ask you, if you do not suspect something wrong
about that slaver?
Wrong! Good heavens, mister Robert, recollect
what you are saying. I would not, for the custom
of his Majesty's Lord High Admiral, have any
discouraging
words be uttered in my house against the
reputation of any virtuous and fair-dealing slavers!
The Lord protect me from blacking the character of
any honest subject of the King!
Do you see nothing wrong, worthy and tender
Joram, about the ship in the outer harbour?
repeated
mister Robert, without moving eye, limb, or
muscle.
Well, since you press me so hard for an opinion,
and seeing that you are a customer who pays freely
for what he orders, I will say, that, if there is any
thing unreasonable, or even illegal, in the deportment
of the gentlemen
You sail so nigh the wind, friend Joram, coolly
Vol. I. P
interrupted the old man, as to keep every thing
shaking. Just bethink you of a plain answer: Have
you seen any thing wrong about the slaver?
Nothing, on my conscience, then, said the
publican
,
puffing not unlike a cetaceous fish that had
come to the surface to breathe; as I am an
unworthy
sinner, sitting under the preaching of good
and faithful Dr Dogma, nothingnothing.
No! Then are you a duller man than I had rated
you at! Do you
suspect
nothing?
Heaven protect me from suspicions! The devil
besets all our minds with doubts; but weak, and evil
inclined, is he who submits to them. The officers
and crew of that ship are free drinkers, and as
generous
as princes: Moreover, as they never forget to
clear the score before they leave the house, I call
themhonest!
And I call thempirates!
Pirates! echoed Joram, fastening his eye, with
marked distrust, on the countenance of the attentive
Wilder.  `Pirate' is a harsh word, mister Robert,
and should not be thrown in any gentleman's face,
without testimony enough to clear one in an action
of defamation, should such a thing get fairly before
twelve sworn and conscientious men. But I
suppose
you know what you say, and before whom you
say it.
I do; and now, as it seems that your opinion in
this matter amounts to just nothing at all, you will
please
To do any thing you order, cried Joram, very
evidently delighted to change the subject.
To go and ask the customers below if they are
dry, continued the other, beckoning for the
publican
to retire by the way he entered, with the air of
one who felt certain of being obeyed. As soon as
the door was closed on the retiring landlord, he
turned
to his remaining companion, and continued, You
seem as much struck aback as unbelieving Joe
himself
,
at what you have just heard.
It is a harsh suspicion, and should be well
supported
,
old man, before you venture to repeat it.
What pirate has lately been heard of on this coast?
There is the well-known Red Rover, returned
the other, dropping his voice, and casting a furtive
look around him, as if even he thought
extraordinary
caution was necessary in uttering the
formidable
name.
But he is said to keep chiefly in the Caribbean
Sea.
He is a man to be any where, and every where.
The King would pay him well who put the rogue
into the hands of the law.
A thing easier planned than executed, Wilder
thoughtfully answered.
That is as it may be. I am an old fellow, and
fitter to point out the way than to go ahead. But
you are like a newly fitted ship, with all your rigging
tight, and your spars without a warp in them. What
say you to make your fortune by selling the knaves
to the King? It is only giving the devil his own a few
months sooner or later.
Wilder started, and turned away from his
companion
like one who was little pleased by the manner in
which he expressed himself. Perceiving the
necessity
of a reply, however, he demanded,
And what reason have you for believing your
suspicions true? or what means have you for
effecting
your object, if true, in the absence of the royal
cruisers?
I cannot swear that I am right; but, if sailing on
the wrong tack, we can only go about, when we find
out the mistake. As to means, I confess they are
easier named than mustered.
Go, go; this is idle talk; a mere whim of your
old brain, said Wilder, coldly; and the less said
the soonest mended. All this time we are forgetting
our proper business. I am half inclined to think,
mister Robert, you are holding out false lights, in
order
to get rid of the duty for which you are already
half paid.
There was a look of satisfaction in the
countenance
of the old tar, while Wilder was speaking, that
might have struck his companion, had not the young
man risen, while speaking, to pace the narrow room,
with a thoughtful and hurried step.
Well, well, the former rejoined, endeavouring
to disguise his evident contentment, in his
customary
,
selfish, but shrewd expression, I am an old
dreamer, and often have I thought myself swimming
in the sea when I have been safe moored on dry
land! I believe there must soon be a reckoning with
the devil, in order that each may take his share of
my poor carcass, and I be left the Captain of my
own ship. Now for your Honour's orders.
Wilder returned to his seat, and disposed himself
to give the necessary instructions to his confederate,
in order that he might counteract all he had already
said in favour of the outward-bound vessel.
CHAPTER XI.
The man is, notwithstanding, sufficient;three thousand
ducats;I think I may take his bond.
Merchant of Venice
.
As the day advanced, the appearances of a fresh
sea breeze setting in gradually grew stronger; and,
with the increase of the wind, were to be seen all
the symptoms of an intention to leave the harbour
on the part of the Bristol trader. The sailing of a
large ship was an event of much more importance
in an American port, sixty years ago, than at the
present hour, when a score is frequently seen to
arrive
and depart from one haven in a single day.
Although
claiming to be inhabitants of one of the
principal
towns of the colony, the good people of
Newport
did not witness the movements on board the
`Caroline with that species of indolent regard
which is the fruit of satiety in sights as well as in
graver things, and with which, in the course of time,
the evolutions of even a fleet come to be
contemplated
.
On the contrary, the wharves were crowded
with boys, and indeed with idlers of every growth.
Even many of the more considerate and industrious
of the citizens were seen loosening the close grasp
they usually kept on the precious minutes, and
allowing
them to escape uncounted, though not
entirely
unheeded, as they yielded to the ascendency
of curiosity over interest, and strayed from their
shops, and their work-yards, to gaze upon the noble
spectacle of a moving ship.
The tardy manner in which the crew of the
Caroline made their preparations, however,
exhausted
the patience of more than one time-saving
citizen. Quite as many of the better sort of the
spectators had left the wharves as still remained,
and yet the vessel spread to the breeze but the
solitary
sheet of canvas which has been already named.
Instead of answering the wishes of hundreds of
weary eyes, the noble ship was seen sheering about
her anchor, inclining from the passing wind, as her
bows were alternately turned to the right and to the
left, like a restless courser restrained by the grasp of
the groom, chafing his bit, and with difficulty
keeping
those limbs upon the earth with which he is
shortly to bound around the ring. After more than
an hour of unaccountable delay, a rumour was spread
among the crowd that an accident had occurred, by
which some important individual, belonging to the
complement of the vessel, was severely injured.
P 2
But this rumour passed away also, and was nearly
forgotten, when a sheet of flame was seen issuing
from a bow-port of the Caroline, driving before
it a cloud of curling and mounting smoke, and which
was succeeded by the instant roar of a discharge of
artillery. A bustle, like that which usually precedes
the immediate announcement of any long attended
event, took place among the weary expectants on
the land, and every one now felt certain, that,
whatever
might have occurred, it was settled that the ship
should proceed.
Of all this delay, the several movements on board,
the subsequent signal of sailing, and of the
impatience
in the crowd, Wilder had been a grave and
close observer. Posted with his back against the
upright fluke of a condemned anchor, on a wharf a
little apart from that occupied, by most of the other
spectators, he had remained an hour in the same
position
,
scarcely bending his look to his right hand or
to his left. When the gun was fired he started, not
with the nervous impulse which had made a hundred
others do precisely the same thing, but to turn an
anxious and rapid glance along the streets that came
within the range of his eye. From this hasty and
uneasy examination, he soon returned into his former
reclining posture, though the wandering of his
glances
,
and the whole expression of his meaning
countenance
,
would have told an observer that some
event, to which the young mariner looked forward
with excessive interest, was on the eve of its
consummation
.
As minute after minute, however,
rolled
by, his composure was gradually restored, and a
smile of satisfaction lighted his features, while his
lips moved like those of a man who expressed his
pleasure in a soliloquy. It was in the midst of these
agreeable meditations, that the sound of many voices
met his ears; and, turning, he saw a large party
within a few yards of where he stood. He was not
slow to detect among them the forms of Mrs Wyllys
and Gertrude, attired in such a manner as to leave
no doubt that they were at length on the eve of
embarking.
A cloud, driving before the sun, does not produce
a greater change in the aspect of the earth, than
was wrought in the expression of Wilder's
countenance
,
by this unexpected sight. He was just
implicitly
relying on the success of an artifice, which,
though sufficiently shallow, he flattered himself was
deep enough to act on the timidity and credulity of
woman; and, now, was he suddenly awoke from his
self-gratulation, to prove the utter disappointment of
his hopes. Muttering a suppressed but deep
execration
against the perfidy of his confederate, he shrunk
as much as possible behind the fluke of the anchor,
and fastened his eyes sullenly on the ship.
The party which accompanied the travellers to
the water side was, like all other parties made to
take leave of valued friends, taciturn and restless.
Those who spoke, did so with a rapid and impatient
utterance, as though they wished to hurry the very
separation they regretted; and the features of those
who said nothing looked full of meaning. Wilder
heard several affectionate and warm-hearted wishes
given, and promises extorted, from youthful voices,
all of which were answered in the soft and mournful
tones of Gertrude, and yet he obstinately refused to
bend even a stolen look in the direction of the
speakers.
At length, a footstep, within a few feet of him,
induced
a hasty glance aside. His eye met that of
Mrs Wyllys. The lady started, as well as our young
mariner, at the sudden recognition; but, recovering
her self-possession, she observed, with admirable
coolness,
You perceive, sir, that we are not to be
deterred
from an enterprise once undertaken, by any
ordinary dangers.
I hope you may not have reason, Madam, to
repent
your courage.
A short, but painfully thoughtful pause succeeded,
on the part of Mrs Wyllys. Casting a look behind
her, in order to ascertain that she was not overheard,
she drew a step nigher to the youth, and said, in a
voice even lower than before,
It is not yet too late: Give me but the shadow
of a reason for what you have said, and I will wait
for another ship. My feelings are foolishly inclined
to believe you, young man, though my judgment
tells me there is but too much probability that you
trifle with our womanish fears.
Trifle! On such a matter I would trifle with
none of your sex; and least of all with you!
This is extraordinary! For a stranger it is
inexplicable
!
Have you a fact, or a reason, which I can
plead to the friends of my young charge?
You know them already.
Then, sir, am I compelled, against my will, to
believe your motive is one that you have some
powerful
considerations for wishing to conceal, coolly
returned the disappointed and even mortified
governess
.
For your own sake, I hope it is not
unworthy
.
I thank you for all that is well intended; if you
have spoken aught which is otherwise, I forgive it.
They parted, with the restraint of people who
feel that distrust exists between them. Wilder again
shrunk behind his cover, maintaining a proud
position
,
and a countenance that was grave to austerity.
His situation, however, compelled him to become
an auditor of most of what was now said.
The principal speaker, as was meet on such an
occasion
,
was Mrs de Lacey, whose voice was often
raised in sage admonitions and professional opinions,
blended in a manner that all would admire, though
none of her sex, but they who had enjoyed the
singular
good fortune of sharing in the intimate
confidence
of a flag-officer, might ever hope to imitate.
And now, my dearest niece, concluded the
relict of the Rear-Admiral, after exhausting her
breath, and her store of wisdom, in numberless
exhortations
to be careful of her health, to write often,
to repeat the actual words of her private message
to her brother the General, to keep below in gales
of wind, to be particular in the account of any
extraordinary
sight she might have the good fortune
to behold in the passage, and, in short, in all other
matters likely to grow out of such a leave-taking;
and now, my dearest niece, I commit you to the
mighty deep, and One far mightierto Him who
made it. Banish from your thoughts all recollections
of any thing you may have heard concerning the
imperfections of the `Royal Caroline;' for the
opinion
of the aged seaman, who sailed with the
lamented
Admiral, assures me they are all founded in
mistake
.
[The treacherous villain! muttered
Wilder
.]
Who spoke? said Mrs de Lacey; but,
receiving
no reply, she continued; His opinion is
also exactly in accordance with my own, on more
mature reflection. To be sure, it is a culpable
neglect
to depend on bobstays and gammonings for the
security of the bow-spirit, but still even this is an
oversight which, as my old friend has just told me,
may be remedied by `preventers and lashings.' I
have written a note to the Master,Gertrude, my
dear, be careful ever to call the Master of the ship
Mister
Nichols; for none, but such as bear his
Majesty's
commission, are entitled to be termed
Captains
;
it is an honourable station, and should always
be treated with reverence, it being, in fact, next in
rank to a flag-officer,I have written a note to the
Master on the subject, and he will see the neglect
repaired; and so, my love, God bless you; take the
best possible care of yourself; write me by every
opportunity; remember my kindest love to your
father
,
and be very minute in your description of the
whales.
The eyes of the worthy and kind-hearted widow
were filled with tears as she ended; and there was a
touch of nature, in the tremour of her voice, that
produced a sympathetic feeling in all who heard her
words. The final parting took place under the
impression
of these kind emotions; and, before another
minute, the oars of the boat, which bore the
travellers
to the ship, were heard in the water.
Wilder listened to the well-known sounds with a
feverish interest, that he possibly might have found
it difficult to explain even to himself. A light touch
on the elbow first drew his attention from the
disagreeable
subject. Surprised at the circumstance, he
faced the intruder, who appeared to be a lad of
apparently
some fifteen years. A second look was
necessary
,
to tell the abstracted young mariner that he
again saw the attendant of the Rover; he who has
already been introduced in our pages under the name
of Roderick.
Your pleasure? he demanded, when his
amazement
,
at being thus interrupted in his meditations,
had a little subsided.
I am directed to put these orders into your own
hands, was the answer.
Orders! repeated the young man, with a curling
lip. The authority should be respected which
issues
its mandates through such a messenger.
The authority is one that it has ever proved
dangerous to disobey, gravely returned the boy.
Indeed! Then will I look into the contents
without
delay, lest I fall into some fatal negligence. Are
you bid to wait an answer?
On raising his eyes from the note the other had
given him, after breaking its seal, the young man
found that the messenger had already vanished.
Perceiving
how useless it would be to pursue so light a
form, amid the mazes of lumber that loaded the
wharf, and most of the adjacent shore, he opened
the letter and read as follows:
An accident has disabled the Master of the out
ward-bound ship called the `Royal Caroline!' Her
consignee is reluctant to intrust her to the officer
next in rank; but sail she must. I find she has
credit for her speed. If you have any credentials
of
character
and
competency
, profit by the occasion,
and earn the station you are finally destined to fill.
You have been named to some who are interested,
and you have been sought diligently. If this reach
you in season, be on the alert, and be decided.
Show no surprise at any co-operation you may un
expectedly meet. My agents are more numerous
than you had believed. The reason is obvious;
gold is yellow, though I am
Red
.
The signature, the matter, and the style of this
letter, left Wilder in no doubt as to its author.
Casting
a glance around him, he sprang into a skiff; and,
before the boat of the travellers had reached the
ship, that of Wilder had skimmed the water over
half the distance between her and the land. As he
plied his skulls with vigorous and skilful arms, he
soon stood upon her decks. Forcing his way among
the crowd of attendants from the shore, that are apt
to cumber a departing ship, he reached the part of
the vessel where a circle of busy and anxious faces
told him he should find those most concerned in her
fate. Until now, he had hardly breathed clearly,
much less reflected on the character of his sudden
enterprise. It was too late, however, to retreat, had
he been so disposed, or to abandon his purpose,
without
incurring the hazard of exciting dangerous
suspicions
.
A single instant served to recal his thoughts,
ere he demanded,
Do I see the owner of the `Caroline?'
The ship is consigned to our house, returned a
sedate, deliberate, and shrewd-looking individual, in
the attire of a wealthy, but also of a thrifty, trader.
I have heard that you have need of an
experienced
officer.
Experienced officers are comfortable things to
an owner in a vessel of value, returned the
merchant
.
I hope the `Caroline' is not without her
portion.
But I had heard, one to supply her Commander's
place, for a time, was greatly needed?
If her Commander were incapable of doing his
duty, such a thing might certainly come to pass. Are
you seeking a birth?
I have come to apply for the vacancy.
It would have been wiser, had you first
ascertained
there existed a vacancy to fill. But you have
not come to ask authority, in such a ship as this,
without sufficient testimony of your ability and
fitness
?
I hope these documents may prove satisfactory,
said Wilder, placing in his hands a couple of
unsealed
letters.
During the time the other was reading the
certificates
,
for such they proved to be, his shrewd eye
was looking over his spectacles at the subject of their
contents, and returning to the paper, in alternate
glances, in such a way as to render it very evident
that he was endeavouring to assure himself of the
fidelity of the words he read, by actual observation.
Hum! This is certainly very excellent testimony
in your favour, young gentleman; andcoming, as it
does, from two so respectable and affluent houses as
Spriggs, Boggs and Tweed, and Hammer and Hacket
entitled to great credit. A richer and
broader-bottomed
firm than the former, is not to be found in
all his Majesty's colonies; and I have great respect
for the latter, though envious people do say that they
over-trade a little.
Since, then, you esteem them so highly, I shall
not be considered hasty in presuming on their
friendship
.
Not at all, not at all, Mraaglancing
his eye again into one of the letters; ayMr
Wilder
;
there is never any presumption in a fair offer,
in a matter of business. Without offers to sell and
offers to buy, our property would never change
hands, sir, ha! ha! ha! never change to a profit, you
know, young gentleman.
I am aware of the truth of what you say, and
therefore I beg leave to repeat my offer.
All perfectly fair and perfectly reasonable. But
you cannot expect us, Mr Wilder, to make a vacancy
expressly for you to fill, though it must be admitted
that your papers are excellentas good as the note
of Spriggs, Boggs and Tweed themselvesnot to
make a vacancy expressly
I had supposed the Master of the ship so
seriously
injured
Injured, but not seriously, interrupted the wary
eonsignee, glancing his eye around at sundry
shippers
,
and one or two spectators, who were within
ear-shot; injured certainly, but not so much as to
quit the vessel. No, no, gentlemen; the good ship
`Royal Caroline' proceeds on her voyage, as usual,
under the care of that old and well-tried mariner,
Nicholas Nichols.
Then, sir, am I sorry to have intruded on your
time at so busy a moment, said Wilder, bowing
with a disappointed air, and falling back a step, as if
about to withdraw.
Not so hastynot so hasty; bargains are not to
Vol. I. Q
be concluded, young man, as you let a sail fall from
the yard. It is possible that your services may be
of use, though not perhaps in the responsible
situation
of Master. At what rate do you value the title
of `Captain?'
I care little for the name, provided the trust and
the authority are mine.
A very sensible youth! muttered the discreet
merchant; and one who knows how to distinguish
between the shadow and the substance! A
gentleman
of your good sense and character must know,
however, that the reward is always proportioned to
the nominal dignity. If I were acting for myself, in
this business, the case would be materially changed,
but, as an agent, it is a duty to consult the interest
of my principal.
The reward is of no account, said Wilder, with
an eagerness that might have overreached itself, had
not the individual with whom he was bargaining
fastened his thoughts on the means of cheapening the
other's services, with a steadiness from which they
rarely swerved, when bent on so commendable an
object as saving: I seek for service.
Then service you shall have; nor will you find
us niggardly in the operation. You cannot expect
an advance, for a run of no more than a month; nor
any perquisites in the way of stowage, since the ship
is now full to her hatches; nor, indeed, any great
price in the shape of wages, since we take you
chiefly
to accommodate so worthy a youth, and to
honour
the recommendations of so respectable a house
as Spriggs, Boggs and Tweed; but you will find us
liberal, excessive liberal. Stayhow know we that
you are the person named in the invoiI should say,
recommendation?
Does not the fact of possessing the letters
establish
my character?
It might in peaceable times; when the realm
was not scourged by war. A description of the
person
should have accompanied the documents, like
a letter of advice with the bill. As we take you at
some risk in this matter, you are not to be surprised
that the price will be affected by the circumstance.
We are liberal; I believe no house in the colonies
pays more liberally; but then we have a character
for prudence to lose.
I have already said, sir, that the price shall not
interrupt our bargain.
Good: There is pleasure in transacting business
on such liberal and honourable views! And yet I
wish a notarial seal, or a description of the person,
had accompanied the letters. This is the signature
of Robert Tweed; I know it well, and would be
glad to see it at the bottom of a promissory note for
ten thousand pounds; that is, with a responsible
endorser
;
but the uncertainty is much against your
pecuniary interest, young man, since we become, as
it were, underwriters that you are the individual
named.
In order that your mind may be at case on this
subject, Mr Bale, said a voice from among the little
circle that was listening, with characteristic interest,
to the progress of the bargain, I can testify, or,
should it be necessary, qualify to the person of the
gentleman.
Wilder turned in some haste, and in no little
astonishment, to discover the acquaintance whom
chance had thrown in so extraordinary, and possibly
in so disagreeable a manner, across his path; and
that, too, in a portion of the country where he
wished
to believe himself an entire stranger. To his
utter
amazement, he found that the new speaker was
no other than the landlord of the Foul Anchor.
Honest Joe stood with a perfectly composed look,
and with a face that might readily have been trusted
to confront a far more imposing tribunal, awaiting
the result of his testimony on the seemingly
wavering
mind of the consignee.
Ah! you have lodged the gentleman for a time,
and you can testify that he is a punctual paymaster
and a civil inmate. But I want documents fit to
be filed with the correspondence of the owners
at
home
.
I know not what sort of testimony you think fit
for such good company, returned the unmoved
publican
,
holding up his hand with an air of admirable
innocence; but, if the sworn declaration of a
housekeeper is of the sort you need, you are a
magistrate
,
and may begin to say over the words at
once.
Not I, not I, man. Though a magistrate, the
oath is informal, and would not be binding in law.
But what do you know of the person in question?
That he is as good a seaman, for his years, as
any in the colonies. There may be some of more
practice and greater experience; I dare say such are
to be found; but as to activity, watchfulness, and
prudence, it would be hard to find his equal
especially
for prudence.
You then are quite certain that this person is
the individual named in these papers?
Joram received the certificates with the same
admirable
coolness he had maintained from the
commencement
,
and prepared to read them with the
most scrupulous care. In order to effect this
necessary
operation, he had to put on his spectacles, (for
the landlord of the Foul Anchor was in the wane
of life), and Wilder fancied that he stood, during the
process, a notable example of how respectable
depravity
may become, in appearance, when supported
by a reverend air.
This is all very true, Mr Bale, continued the
publican, removing his glasses, and returning the
papers
.
They have forgotten to say any thing of the
manner in which he saved the `Lively Nancy,' off
Hatteras, and how he run the `Peggy and Dolly'
over the Savannah bar, without a pilot, blowing
great guns from the northward and eastward at the
time; but I, who followed the water, as you know,
in my younger days, have often heard both
circumstances
mentioned among sea-faring men, and I am a
judge of the difficulty. I have an interest in this
ship, neighbour Bale, (for though a rich man, and I
a poor one, we are nevertheless neighbours)I say
I have an interest in this ship; since she is a vessel
that seldom quits Newport without leaving
something
to jingle in my pocket, or I should not be
here to-day, to see her lift her anchor.
As the publican concluded, he gave audible
evidence
that his visit had not gone unrewarded, by
raising a music that was no less agreeable to the ears
of the thrifty merchant than to his own. The two
worthies laughed in an understanding way, and like
two men who had found a particular profit in their
intercourse with the Royal Caroline. The latter
then beckoned Wilder apart, and, after a little
further
preliminary discourse, the terms of the young
mariner's engagement were finally settled. The
true Master of the ship was to remain on board,
both as a security for the insurance, and in order to
preserve her reputation; but it was frankly admitted
that his hurt, which was no less than a broken leg,
and which the surgeons were then setting, would
probably keep him below for a month to come.
During the time he was kept from his duty, his
functions
were to be filled, in effect, by our adventurer.
These arrangements occupied another hour of time,
and then the consignee left the vessel, perfectly
satisfied
with the prudent and frugal manner in which
he had discharged his duty towards his principal.
Before stepping into the boat, however, with a view
to be equally careful of his own interests, he took
Q 2
an opportunity to request the publican to make a
proper and legal affidavit of all that he knew, of
his own knowledge, concerning the officer just
engaged
.
Honest Joram was liberal of his promises;
but, as he saw no motive, now that all was so
happily
effected, for incurring useless risks, he contrived
to evade their fulfilment, finding, no doubt, his
apology
for this breach of faith in the absolute poverty
of his information, when the subject came to be duly
considered, and construed literally by the terms
required
.
It is unnecessary to relate the bustle, the
reparation
of half-forgotten, and consequently neglected
business, the duns, good wishes, injunctions to
execute
commissions in some distant port, and all the
confused, and seemingly interminable, duties that
crowd themselves into the last ten minutes that
precede
the sailing of a merchant vessel, more
especially
if she is fortunate, or rather unfortunate
enough to have passengers. A certain class of men
quit a vessel, in such a situation, with the reluctance
that they would part with any other well
established
means of profit, creeping down her sides as lazily
as the leech, filled to repletion, rolls from his bloody
repast. The common seaman, with an attention
divided
by the orders of the pilot and the adieus of
acquaintances, runs in every direction but the right
one, and, perhaps at the only time in his life, seems
ignorant of the uses of the ropes he has so long been
accustomed to handle. Notwithstanding all these
vexatious delays, and customary incumbrances, the
Royal Caroline finally got rid of all her visiters
but one, and Wilder was enabled to indulge in a
pleasure that a seaman alone can appreciatothat
of clear decks and an orderly ship's company.
CHAPTER XII.
Good: Speak to the mariners: Fall to't yarely, or we run
ourselves aground.
Tempest
.
A GOOD deal of the day had been wasted during
the time occupied by the scenes just related. The
breeze had come in steady, but far from fresh. So
soon, however, as Wilder found himself left without
the molestation of idlers from the shore, and the busy
interposition of the consignee, he cast his eyes about
him, with the intention of immediately submitting
the ship to its power. Sending for the pilot, he
communicated
his determination, and withdrew himself
to a part of the deck whence he might take a proper
survey of the materials of his new command, and
where he might reflect on the unexpected and
extraordinary
situation in which he found himself.
The Royal Caroline was not entirely without
pretensions to the lofty name she bore. She was a
vessel of that happy size in which comfort and
convenience
had been equally consulted. The letter of
the Rover affirmed she had a reputation for her
speed; and her young and intelligent Commander
saw, with great inward satisfaction, that she was not
destitute of the means of enabling him to exhibit all
her finest properties. A healthy, active, and skilful
crew, justly proportioned spars, little top-hamper,
and an excellent trim, with a superabundance of light
sails, offered all the advantages his experience could
suggest. His eye lighted, as it glanced rapidly over
these several particulars of his command, and his
lips moved like those of a man who uttered an
inward
self-gratulation, or who indulged in some vaunt,
that propriety suggested should go no farther than his
own thoughts.
By this time, the crew, under the orders of the
pilot, were assembled at the windlass, and had
commenced
heaving-in upon the cable. The labour was
of a nature to exhibit their individual powers, as well
as their collective force, to the greatest advantage.
Their motion was simultaneous, quick, and full of
muscle. The cry was clear and cheerful. As if
to feel his influence, our adventurer lifted his own
voice, amid the song of the mariners, in one of those
sudden and inspiriting calls with which a sea officer
is wont to encourage his people. His utterance was
deep, animated, and full of authority. The seamen
started like mettled coursers when they first hear
the signal, each man casting a glance behind him, as
though he would scan the qualities of his new
superior
.
Wilder smiled, like one satisfied with his
success
;
and, turning to pace the quarter-deck, he found
himself once more confronted by the calm,
considerate
,
but certainly astonished eye of Mrs Wyllys.
After the opinions you were pleased to express
of this vessel, said the lady, in a manner of the
coldest irony, I did not expect to find you filling a
place of such responsibility here.
You probably knew, Madam, returned the
young mariner, that a sad accident had happened
to her Master?
I did; and I had heard that another officer had
been found, temporarily, to supply his place. Still,
I should presume, that, on reflection, you will not
think it remarkable I am amazed in finding who this
person is.
Perhaps, Madam, you may have conceived, from
our conversations, an unfavourable opinion of my
professional skill. But I hope that on this head you
will place your mind at ease; for
You are doubtless a master of the art! it would
seem, at least, that no trifling danger can deter you
from seeking proper opportunities to display this
knowledge. Are we to have the pleasure of your
company during the whole passage, or do you leave
us at the mouth of the port?
I am engaged to conduct the ship to the end of
her voyage.
We may then hope that the danger you either
saw or imagined is lessened in your judgment,
otherwise
you would not be so ready to encounter it in
our company.
You do me injustice, Madam, returned Wilder,
with warmth, glancing his eye unconsciously
towards
the grave, but deeply attentive Gertrude, as
he spoke; there is no danger that I would not
cheerfully encounter, to save you, or this young lady,
from harm.
Even this young lady must be sensible of your
chivalry! Then, losing the constrained manner
with which, until now, she had maintained the
discourse
,
in one more natural, and one far more in
consonance with her usually mild and thoughtful
mien, Mrs Wyllys continued, You have a powerful
advocate, young man, in the unaccountable interest
which I feel in your truth; an interest that my reason
would fain condemn. As the ship must need your
services, I will no longer detain you. Opportunities
cannot be wanting to enable us to judge both of your
inclination and ability to serve us. Gertrude, my
love, females are usually considered as incumbrances
in a vessel; more particularly when there is any
delicate
duty to perform, like this before us.
Gertrude started, blushed, and proceeded, after
her governess, to the opposite side of the
quarter-deck
,
followed by an expressive look from our
adventurer
,
which seemed to say, he considered her
presence any thing else but an incumbrance. As
the ladies immediately took a position apart from
every body, and one where they were least in the
way of working the ship, at the same time that they
could command an entire view of all her manuvres,
the disappointed sailor was obliged to cut short a
communication which he would gladly have
continued
until compelled to take the charge of the vessel
from the hands of the pilot. By this time, however,
the anchor was a-weigh, and the seamen were already
actively engaged in the process of making sail.
Wilder
lent himself, with feverish excitement, to the
duty; and, taking the words from the officer who was
issuing the necessary orders, he assumed the
immediate
superintendence in person.
As sheet after sheet of canvas fell from the yards,
and was distended by the complicated mechanism,
the interest that a seaman ever takes in his vessel
began to gain the ascendancy over all other feelings.
By the time every thing was set, from the royals
down, and the ship was cast with her head towards
the harbour's mouth, our adventurer had probably
forgotten (for the moment only, it is true) that he was
a stranger among those he was in so extraordinary a
manner selected to command, and how precious a
stake was intrusted to his firmness and decision.
After every thing was set to advantage, alow and
aloft, and the ship was brought close upon the wind,
his eye scanned every yard and sail, from the truck
to the hull, and concluded by casting a glance along
the outer side of the vessel, in order to see that not
even the smallest rope was in the water to impede
her progress. A small skiff, occupied by a boy, was
towing under the lee, and, as the mass of the vessel
began to move, it was skipping along the surface of
the water, light and buoyant as a feather.
Perceiving
that it was a boat belonging to the shore, Wilder
walked forward, and demanded its owner. A mate
pointed to Joram, who at that moment ascended
from the interior of the vessel, where he had been
settling the balance due from a delinquent, or, what
was in his eyes the same thing, a departing debtor.
The sight of this man recalled Wilder to a
recollection
of all that had occurred that morning, and
of the whole delicacy of the task he had undertaken
to perform. But the publican, whose ideas appeared
always concentrated when occupied on the subject
of gain, seemed troubled by no particular emotions
at the interview. He approached the young
mariner
,
and, saluting him by the title of Captain,
bade him a good voyage, with those customary
wishes
which seamen express, when about to separate on
such an occasion.
A lucky trip you have made of it, Captain
Wilder
,
he concluded, and I hope your passage will
be short. You'll not be without a breeze this
afternoon
;
and, by stretching well over towards
Montauck
,
you'll be able to make such an offing, on the
other tack, as to run the coast down in the morning.
If I am any judge of the weather, the wind will
have more easting in it, than you may happen to
find to your fancy.
And how long do you think my voyage is likely
to last? demanded Wilder, dropping his voice so
low as to reach no ears but those of the publican.
Joram cast a furtive glance aside; and,
perceiving
that they were alone, he suffered an expression
of hardened cunning to take possession of a
countenance
that ordinarily seemed set in dull, physical
contentment, as he replied, laying a finger on his
nose while speaking,
Didn't I tender the consignee a beautiful oath,
master Wilder?
You certainly exceeded my expectations with
your promptitude, and
Information! added the landlord of the `Foul
Anchor,' perceiving the other a little at a loss for a
word; yes, I have always been remarkable for the
activity of my mind in these small matters; but,
when a man once knows a thing thoroughly, it is a
great folly to spend his breath in too many words.
It is certainly a great advantage to be so well
instructed. I suppose you improve your knowledge
to a good account.
Ah! bless me, master Wilder, what would
become
of us all, in these difficult times, if we did not
turn an honest penny in every way that offers? I
have brought up several fine children in credit, and
it sha'n't be my fault if I don't leave them
something
too, besides my good name. Well, well; they
say, `A nimble sixpence is as good as a lazy shilling;'
but give me the man who don't stand shilly-shally
when a friend has need of his good word, or a lift
from his hand. You always know where to find
such a man; as our politicians say, after they have
gone through thick and thin in the cause, be it right
or be it wrong.
Very commendable principles! and such as will
surely be the means of exalting you in the world
sooner or later! But you forget to answer my
question
:
Will the passage be long, or short?
Heaven bless you, master Wilder! Is it for a
poor publican, like me, to tell the Master of this
noble ship which way the wind will blow next?
There is the worthy and notable Commander Nichols,
lying in his state-room below, he could do any thing
with the vessel; and why am I to expect that a
gentleman
so well recommended as yourself will do
less? I expect to hear that you have made a
famous
run, and have done credit to the good word
I have had occasion to say in your favour.
Wilder execrated, in his heart, the wary cunning
of the rogue with whom he was compelled, for the
moment, to be in league; for he saw plainly that a
determination not to commit himself a tittle further
than he might conceive to be absolutely necessary,
was likely to render Joram too circumspect, to
answer
his own immediate wishes. After hesitating a
moment, in order to reflect, he continued hastily,
You see that the ship is gathering way too fast
to admit of trifling. You know of the letter I
received
this morning?
Bless me, Captain Wilder! Do you take me for
a postmaster? How should I know what letters
arrive at Newport, and what stop on the main?
As timid a villain as he is thorough! muttered
the young mariner. But this much you may surely
say, Am I to be followed immediately? or is it
expected
that I should detain the ship in the offing,
under any pretence that I can devise?
Heaven keep you, young gentleman! These are
strange questions, to come from one who is fresh off
the sea, to a man that has done no more than look at
it from the land, these five-and-twenty years.
According
to my memory, sir, you will keep the ship
about south until you are clear of the islands; and
then you must make your calculations according to
the wind, in order not to get into the Gulf, where,
you know, the stream will be setting you one way,
while your orders say, `Go another.'
Luff! mind your luff, sir! cried the pilot, in a
stern voice, to the man at the helm; luff you can;
on no account go to leeward of the slaver!
Both Wilder and the publican started, as if they
found something alarming in the name of the vessel
just alluded to; and the former pointed to the skiff,
as he said,
Unless you wish to go to sea with us, Mr Joram,
it is time your boat held its master.
Ay, ay, I see you are fairly under way, and I
must leave you, however much I like your
company
,
returned the landlord of the `Foul Anchor,'
bustling over the side, and getting into his skiff in
the best manner he could. Well, boys, a good time
to ye; a plenty of wind, and of the right sort; a
safe passage out, and a quick return. Cast off.
His order was obeyed; the light skiff, no longer
Vol. I. R
impelled by the ship, immediately deviated from its
course; and, after making a little circuit, it became
stationary, while the mass of the vessel passed on,
with the steadiness of an elephant from whose back
a butterfly had just taken its flight. Wilder
followed
the boat with his eyes, for a moment; but his
thoughts were recalled by the voice of the pilot,
who again called, from the forward part of the
ship,
Let the light sails lift a little, boy; let her lift;
keep every inch you can, or you'll not weather the
slaver. Luff, I say, sir; luff.
The slaver! muttered our adventurer,
hastening
to a part of the ship whence he could command
a view of that important, and to him doubly
interesting
ship; ay, the slaver! it may be difficult,
indeed
,
to weather upon the slaver!
He had unconsciously placed himself near Mrs
Wyllys and Gertrude; the latter of whom was
leaning
on the rail of the quarter-deck, regarding the
strange vessel at anchor, with a pleasure far from
unnatural to her years and sex.
You may laugh at me, and call me fickle, and
perhaps credulous, dear Mrs Wyllys, the
unsuspecting
girl cried, just as Wilder had taken the foregoing
position, but I wish we were well out of this
`Royal Caroline,' and that our passage was to be
made in yonder beautiful ship!
It is indeed a beautiful ship! returned Wyllys;
but I know not that it would be safer, or more
comfortable, than the one we are in.
With what symmetry and order the ropes are
arranged! and how like a bird it floats upon the
water!
Had you particularized the duck, the
comparison
would have been exactly nautical, said the
governess, smiling mournfully; you show
capabilities
,
my love, to be one day a seaman's wife.
Gertrude blushed a little; and, turning back her
head to answer in the playful vein of her governess,
her eye met the riveted look of Wilder, fastened on
herself. The colour on her cheek deepened to a
carnation, and she was mute; the large gipsy hat
she wore serving to conceal both her face and the
confusion which so deeply suffused it.
You make no answer, child, as if you reflected
seriously on the chances, continued Mrs Wyllys,
whose thoughtful and abstracted mien, however,
sufficiently proved she scarcely knew what she
uttered
.
The sea is too unstable an element for my taste,
Gertrude coldly answered. Pray tell me, Mrs
Wyllys, is the vessel we are approaching a King's
ship? She has a warlike, not to say a threatening
exterior.
The pilot has twice called her a slaver.
A slaver! How deceitful then is all her beauty
and symmetry! I will never trust to appearances
again, since so lovely an object can be devoted to
so vile a purpose.
Deceitful indeed! exclaimed Wilder aloud,
under
an impulse that he found as irresistible as it was
involuntary. I will take upon myself to say, that
a more treacherous vessel does not float the ocean
than yonder finely proportioned and admirably
equipped
Slaver, added Mrs Wyllys, who had time to
turn, and to look all her astonishment, before the
young man appeared disposed to finish his own
sentence
.
Slaver; he said with emphasis, bowing at the
same time, as if he would thank her for the word.
After this interruption, a profound silence
occurred
.
Mrs Wyllys studied the disturbed features of
the young man, for a moment, with a countenance
that denoted a singular, though a complicated,
interest
;
and then she gravely bent her eyes on the water,
deeply occupied with intense, if not painful
reflection
.
The light symmetrical form of Gertrude
continued
leaning on the rail, it is true, but Wilder was
unable to catch another glimpse of her averted and
shadowed lineaments. In the mean while, events,
that were of a character to withdraw his attention
entirely from even so pleasing a study, were
hastening
to their accomplishment.
The ship had, by this time, passed between the
little island and the point whence Homespun had
embarked, and might now be said to have fairly left
the inner harbour. The slaver lay directly in her
track, and every man in the vessel was gazing with
deep interest, in order to see whether they might yet
hope to pass on her weather-beam. The measure
was desirable; because a seaman has a pride in
keeping
on the honourable side of every thing he
encounters
,
but chiefly because, from the position of the
stranger, it would be the means of preventing the
necessity of tacking before the Caroline should
reach a point more advantageous for such a
manuvre
.
The reader will, however, readily understand
that the interest of her new Commander took its
rise in far different feelings from those of professional
pride, or momentary convenience.
Wilder felt, in every nerve, the probability that a
crisis was at hand. It will be remembered that he
was profoundly ignorant of the immediate intentions
of the Rover. As the fort was not in a state for
present service, it would not be difficult for the latter
to seize upon his prey in open view of the
townsmen
,
and bear it off, in contempt of their feeble
means of defence. The position of the two ships
was favourable to such an enterprise. Unprepared,
and unsuspecting, the Caroline, at no time a
match for her powerful adversary, must fall an easy
victim; nor would there be much reason to
apprehend
that a single shot from the battery could reach
them, before the captor, and his prize, would be at
such a distance as to render the blow next to
impotent
,
if not utterly innocuous. The wild and
audacious
character of such an enterprise was in full
accordance
with the reputation of the desperate
freebooter
,
on whose caprice, alone, the act now seemed
solely to depend.
Under these impressions, and with the prospect
of such a speedy termination to his new-born
authority
,
it is not to be considered wonderful that our
adventurer
awaited the result with an interest far
exceeding
that of any of those by whom he was
surrounded
.
He walked into the waist of the ship,
and endeavoured to read the plan of his secret
confederates
,
by some of those indications that are
familiar
to a seaman. Not the smallest sign of any
intention to depart, or in any manner to change her
position, was, however, discoverable in the
pretended
slaver. She lay in the same deep, beautiful, but
treacherous quiet, as that in which she had reposed
throughout the whole of the eventful morning. But
a solitary individual could be seen amid the mazes
of her rigging, or along the wide reach of all her
spars. It was a seaman seated on the extremity of
a lower yard, where he appeared to busy himself
with one of those repairs that are so constantly
required
in the gear of a large ship. As the man was
placed on the weather side of his own vessel, Wilder
instantly conceived the idea that he was thus
stationed
to cast a grapnel into the rigging of the
Caroline
,
should such a measure become necessary, in
order to bring the two ships foul of each other.
With a view to prevent so rude an encounter, he
instantly
determined to defeat the plan. Calling to the
pilot, he told him the attempt to pass to windward
was of very doubtful success, and reminded him that
the safer way would be to go to leeward.
R 2
No fear, no fear, Captain, returned the
stubborn
conductor of the ship, who, as his authority
was so brief, was only the more jealous of its
unrestrained
exercise, and who, like an usurper of the
throne, felt a jealousy of the more legitimate power
which he had temporarily dispossessed; no fear of
me, Captain. I have trolled over this ground
oftener
than you have crossed the ocean, and I know the
name of every rock on the bottom, as well as the
town-crier knows the streets of Newport. Let her
luff, boy; luff her into the very eye of the wind;
luff, you can
You have the ship shivering as it is, sir, said
Wilder, sternly: Should you get us foul of the
slaver
,
who is to pay the cost?
I am a general underwriter, returned the
opinionated
pilot; my wife shall mend every hole I
make in your sails, with a needle no bigger than a
hair, and with such a palm as a fairy's thimble!
This is fine talking, sir, but you are already
losing the ship's way; and, before you have ended
your boasts, she will be as fast in irons as a
condemned
thief. Keep the sails full, boy; keep them a rap
full, sir.
Ay, ay, keep her a good full, echoed the pilot,
who, as the difficulty of passing to windward became
at each instant more obvious, evidently began to
waver
in his resolution. Keep her full-and-by,I
have always told you full-and-by,I don't know,
Captain, seeing that the wind has hauled a little, but
we shall have to pass to leeward yet; but you will
acknowledge, that, in such case, we shall be obliged
to go about.
Now, in point of fact, the wind, though a little
lighter than it had been, was, if any thing, a trifle more
favourable; nor had Wilder ever, in any manner,
denied that the ship would not have to tack, some
twenty minutes sooner, by going to leeward of the
other vessel, than if she had succeeded in her
delicate
experiment of passing on the more honourable
side; but, as the vulgarest minds are always the
most reluctant to confess their blunders, the
discomfited
pilot was disposed to qualify the concession he
found himself compelled to make, by some salvo of
the sort, that he might not lessen his reputation for
foresight, among his auditors.
Keep her away at once, cried Wilder, who was
beginning to change the tones of remonstrance for
those of command; keep the ship away, sir, while
you have room to do it, or, by the
His lips became motionless; for his eye
happened
to fall on the pale, speaking, and anxious
countenance
of Gertrude.
I believe it must be done, seeing that the wind
is hauling. Hard up, boy, and run her under the
stern of the ship at anchor. Hold! keep your luff
again; eat into the wind to the bone, boy; lift again;
let the light sails lift. The slaver has run a warp
directly across our track. If there's law in the
Plantations, I'll have her Captain before the Courts
for this!
What means the fellow? demanded Wilder,
jumping hastily on a gun, in order to get a better
view.
His mate pointed to the lee-quarter of the other
vessel, where, sure enough, a large rope was seen
whipping the water, as though in the very process of
being extended. The truth instantly flashed on the
mind of our young mariner. The Rover lay
secretly
moored with a spring, with a view to bring his
guns more readily to bear upon the battery, should
his defence become necessary, and he now profited,
by the circumstance, in order to prevent the trader
from passing to leeward. The whole arrangement
excited a good deal of surprise, and not a few
execrations
among the officers of the Caroline; though
none but her Commander had the smallest twinkling
of the real reason why the kedge had thus been laid,
and why a warp was so awkwardly stretched across
their path. Of the whole number, the pilot alone
saw cause to rejoice in the circumstance. He had,
in fact, got the ship in such a situation, as to render
it nearly as difficult to proceed in one way as in the
other; and he was now furnished with a sufficient
justification, should any accident occur, in the course
of the exceedingly critical manuvre, from whose
execution there was now no retreat.
This is an extraordinary liberty to take in the
mouth of a harbour, muttered Wilder, when his
eyes put him in possession of the fact just related.
You must shove her by to windward, pilot; there
is no remedy.
I wash my hands of the consequences, as I call
all on board to witness, returned the other, with
the air of a deeply offended man, though secretly
glad of the appearance of being driven to the very
measure he was a minute before so obstinately bent
on executing. Law must be called in here, if
sticks are snapped, or rigging parted. Luff to a hair,
boy; luff her short into the wind, and try a
halfboard
.
The man at the helm obeyed the order.
Releasing
his hold of its spokes, the wheel made a quick
evolution; and the ship, feeling a fresh impulse of
the wind, turned her head heavily towards the
quarter
whence it came, the canvas fluttering with a
noise like that produced by a flock of water-fowl
just taking wing. But, met by the helm again, she
soon fell off as before, powerless from having lost
her way, and settling bodily down toward the fancied
slaver, impelled by the air, which seemed, however,
to have lost much of its force, at the critical instant
it was most needed.
The situation of the Caroline was one which
a seaman will readily understand. She had forged
so far ahead as to lie directly on the weather-beam
of the stranger, but too near to enable her to fall-off
in the least, without imminent danger that the
vessels
would come foul. The wind was inconstant,
sometimes blowing in puffs, while at moments there
was a perfect lull. As the ship felt the former, her
tall masts bent gracefully towards the slaver, as if
to make the parting salute; but, relieved from the
momentary pressure of the inconstant air, she as
often rolled heavily to windward, without advancing
a foot. The effect of each change, however, was
to bring her still nigher to her dangerous neighbour,
until it became evident, to the judgment of the
youngest seaman in the vessel, that nothing but a
sudden shift of wind could enable her to pass ahead,
the more especially as the tide was on the change.
As the inferior officers of the Caroline were
not delicate in their commentaries on the dulness
which had brought them into so awkward and so
mortifying a position, the pilot endeavoured to
conceal
his own vexation, by the number and
vociferousness
of his orders. From blustering, he soon
passed into confusion, until the men themselves stood
idle, not knowing which of the uncertain and
contradictory
mandates they received ought to be first
obeyed. In the mean time, Wilder had folded his
arms with an appearance of entire composure, and
taken his station near his female passengers. Mrs
Wyllys closely studied his eye, with the wish of
ascertaining, by its expression, the nature and
extent
of their danger, if danger there might be, in
the approaching collision of two ships in water that
was perfectly smooth, and where one was
stationary
,
and the motion of the other scarcely perceptible.
The stern, determined look she saw settling about
the brow of the young man excited an uneasiness
that she would not otherwise have felt, perhaps,
under
circumstances that, in themselves, bore no very
vivid appearance of hazard.
Have we aught to apprehend, sir? demanded
the governess, endeavouring to conceal from her
charge the nature of her own disquietude.
I told you, Madam, the `Caroline' would prove
an unlucky ship.
Both females regarded the peculiarly bitter smile
with which Wilder made this reply as an evil omen,
and Gertrude clung to her companion as to one on
whom she had long been accustomed to lean.
Why do not the mariners of the slaver appear,
to assist usto keep us from coming too nigh?
anxiously
exclaimed the latter.
Why do they not, indeed! but we shall see them,
I think, ere long.
You speak and look, young man, as if you
thought there would be danger in the interview!
Keep near to me, returned Wilder, in tones
that were nearly smothered by the manner in which
he compressed his lips. In every event, keep as
nigh my person as possible.
Haul the spanker-boom to windward, shouted
the pilot; lower away the boats, and tow the
ship's head roundclear away the stream anchor
aft gib-sheetboard main tack, again.
The astonished men stood like statues, not
knowing
whither to turn, some calling to the rest to do
this or that, and some as loudly countermanding the
order; when an authoritative voice was heard
calmly
to say,
Silence in the ship.
The tones were of that sort which, while they
denote the self-possession of the speaker, never fail
to inspire the inferior with a portion of the
confidence
of him who commands. Every face was
turned
towards the quarter of the vessel whence the
sound proceeded, as if each ear was ready to catch
the smallest additional mandate. Wilder was
standing
on the head of the capstan, where he could
command
a full view on every side of him. With a quick
and understanding glance, he had made himself a
perfect master of the situation of his ship. His eye
was at the instant fixed anxiously on the slaver, as if
it would pierce the treacherous calm which still
reigned on all about her, in order to know how far
his exertions might be permitted to be useful. But
it appeared as if the stranger lay like some
enchanted
vessel on the water, not a human form even
appearing
about all her complicated machinery, except
the seaman already named, who still continued his
employment, as though the Caroline was not
within
a hundred miles of the place where he sat. The
lips of Wilder moved: it might be in bitterness; it
might be in satisfaction; for, a smile of the most
equivocal nature lighted his features, as he continued,
in the same deep, commanding voice as before,
Throw all abacklay every thing flat to the
masts, forward and aft.
Ay! echoed the pilot, lay every thing flat to
the masts.
Is there a shove-boat alongside the ship?
demanded
our adventurer.
The answer, from a dozen voices, was in the
affirmative
.
Show that pilot into her.
This is an unlawful order, exclaimed the other;
and I forbid any voice but mine to be obeyed.
Throw
him in, sternly repeated Wilder.
Amid the bustle and exertion of bracing round the
yards, the resistance of the pilot produced little or
no sensation. He was soon raised on the extended
arms of the two mates; and, after exhibiting his
limbs in sundry contortions in the air, he was
dropped
into the boat, with as little ceremony as though
he had been a billet of wood. The end of the
painter was cast after him; and then the
discomfited
guide was left, with singular indifference, to his
own meditations.
In the mean time, the order of Wilder had been
executed. Those vast sheets of canvas which, a
moment before, had been either fluttering in the air,
or were bellying inward or outward, as they touched
or filled, as it is technically called, were now all
pressing against their respective masts, impelling the
vessel to retrace her mistaken path. The manuvre
required the utmost attention, and the nicest delicacy
in its direction. But her young Commander proved
himself, in every particular, competent to his task.
Here, a sail was lifted; there, another was brought
with a flatter surface to the air; now, the lighter
canvas was spread; and now it disappeared, like
thin vapour suddenly dispelled by the sun. The
voice of Wilder, throughout, though calm, was
breathing
with authority. The ship itself seemed, like an
animated being, conscious that her destinies were
reposed in different, and more intelligent, hands than
before. Obedient to the new impulse they had
received
,
the immense cloud of canvas, with all its tall
forest of spars and rigging, rolled to and fro; and
then, having overcome the state of comparative rest
in which it had been lying, the vessel heavily yielded
to the pressure, and began to recede.
Throughout the whole of the time necessary to
extricate the Caroline, the attention of Wilder
was divided between his own ship and his
inexplicable
neighbour. Not a sound was heard to issue from
the imposing and death-like stillness of the latter.
Not a single anxious countenance, not even one
lurking
eye, was to be detected, at any of the numerous
outlets by which the inmates of an armed vessel can
look abroad upon the deep. The seaman on the
yard continued his labour, like a man unconscious
of any thing but his own existence. There was,
however, a slow, though nearly imperceptible,
motion
in the ship itself, which was apparently made,
like the lazy movement of a slumbering whale, more
by listless volition, than through any agency of human
hands.
Not the smallest of these changes escaped the
keen and understanding examination of Wilder. He
saw, that, as his own ship retired, the side of the
slaver was gradually exposed to the Caroline.
The muzzles of the threatening guns gaped
constantly
on his vessel, as the eye of the crouching tiger
follows the movement of its prey; and at no time,
while nearest, did there exist a single instant that
the decks of the latter ship could not have been
swept, by a general discharge from the battery of the
former. At each successive order issued from his
own lips, our adventurer turned his eye, with
increasing
interest, to ascertain whether he would be
permitted
to execute it; and never did he feel certain
that he was left to the sole management of the
Caroline
until he found that she had backed from her
dangerous proximity to the other; and that, obedient
to a new disposition of her sails, she was falling off,
before the light air, in a place where he could hold
her entirely at command.
Finding that the tide was getting unfaourable,
and the wind too light to stem it, the sails were then
drawn to her yards in festoons, and an anchor was
dropped to the bottom.
Vol. I. 8
CHAPTER XIII.
What have here? A man, or a fish?
The Tempest
.
The
Caroline now lay within a cable's length
of the supposed slaver. In dismissing the pilot,
Wilder had assumed a responsibility from which a
seaman usually shrinks; since, in the case of any
untoward
accident in leaving the port, it would involve
a loss of insurance, and his own probable
punishment
.
How far he had been influenced, in taking
so decided a step, by a knowledge of his being
beyond
,
or above, the reach of the law, will probably
be made manifest in the course of the narrative; the
only immediate effect of the measure, was, to draw
the whole of his attention, which had before been
so much divided between his passengers and the
ship, to the care of the latter. But, so soon as his
vessel was secured, for a time at least, and his mind
was no longer excited by the expectation of a scene
of immediate violence, our adventurer found leisure
to return to his former, though (to so thorough a
seaman
)
scarcely more agreeable occupation. The
success of his delicate manuvre had imparted to
his countenance a glow of something very like
triumph
;
and his step, as he advanced towards Mrs
Wyllys and Gertrude, was that of a man who
enjoyed
the consciousness of having acquitted himself
dexterously, in circumstances that required no small
exhibition of professional skill. At least, such was
the construction the former lady put upon his kindling
eye and exulting air; though the latter might,
possibly
,
be disposed to judge of his motives with greater
indulgence. Perhaps both were ignorant of the
secret
reasons of his self-felicitation; and it is possible
that a sentiment, of a far more generous nature than
either of them could imagine, had a full share of its
influence in his present feelings.
Be this as it might, Wilder no sooner saw that the
Caroline was swinging to her anchor, and that his
services were of no further immediate use, than he
sought an opportunity to renew a conversation which
had hitherto been so vague, and so often interrupted.
Mrs Wyllys had long been viewing the neighbouring
vessel with a steady look; nor did she now turn her
gaze from the motionless and silent object, until the
young mariner was near her person. She was then
the first to speak.
Yonder vessel must possess an extraordinary,
not to say an insensible, crew! exclaimed the
governess
,
in a tone bordering on astonishment. If
such things were, it would not be difficult to fancy
her a spectre-ship.
She is truly an admirably proportioned and a
beautiful equipped trader!
Did my apprehensions deceive me? or were
we in actual danger of getting the two vessels
entangled
?
There was certainly some reason for
apprehension
;
but you see we are safe.
For which we have to thank your skill. The
manner in which you have just extricated us from
the late danger, has a direct tendency to contradict
all that you were pleased to foretel of that which is
to come.
I well know, Madam, that my conduct may bear
an unfavourable construction, but
You thought it no harm to laugh at the
weakness
of three credulous females, continued Mrs
Wyllys, smiling. Well, you have had your
amusement
;
and now, I hope, you will be more disposed
to pity what is said to be a natural infirmity of
woman's
mind.
As the governess concluded, she glanced her eye
at Gertrude, with an expression that seemed to say,
it would be cruel, now, to trifle further with the
apprehensions
of one so innocent and so young. The
look of Wilder followed her own; and when he
answered
,
it was with a sincerity that was well
calculated
to carry conviction in its tones.
On the faith which a gentleman owes to all your
sex, Madam, what I have already told you I still
continue to believe.
The gammonings and the top-gallant-masts!
No, no, interrupted the young mariner, slightly
laughing, and at the same time colouring a good
deal; perhaps not all of that. But neither mother,
wife, nor sister of mine, should make this passage
in the `Royal Caroline.'
Your look, your voice, and your air of good
faith, make a strange contradiction to your words,
young man; for, while the former almost tempt me
to believe you honest, the latter have not a shade of
reason to support them. Perhaps I ought to be
ashamed of such a weakness, and yet I will
acknowledge
,
that the mysterious quiet, which seems to
have settled for ever on yonder ship, has excited an
inexplicable uneasiness, that may in some way be
connected with her character.She is certainly a
slaver?
She is certainly beautiful! exclaimed Gertrude.
Very beautiful! Wilder gravely rejoined.
There is a man still seated on one of her yards,
who appears to be entranced in his occupation,
continued Mrs Wyllys, leaning her chin thoughtfully
on her hand, as she gazed at the object of which she
was speaking. Not once, during the time we were
in so much danger of getting the ships entangled,
did that seaman bestow so much as a stolen glance
towards us. He resembles the solitary individual in
the city of the transformed; for not another mortal
is there to keep him company, so far as we may
discover.
Perhaps his comrades sleep, said Gertrude.
Sleep! Mariners do not sleep in an hour and a
day like this! Tell me, Mr Wilder, (you that are a
seaman should know), is it usual for the crew to
sleep when a strange vessel is so nighnear even to
touching, I might almost say?
It is not.
I thought as much; for I am not an entire novice
in matters of your daring, your hardy, your
noble
profession! returned the governess, with deep
emphasis
.
And, had we gone foul of the slaver, do
you think her crew would have maintained their
apathy?
I think not, Madam.
There is something, in all this assumed
tranquillity
,
which might induce one to suspect the worst of
her character. Is it known that any of her crew
have had communication with the town, since her
arrival?
It is.
I have heard that false colours have been seen
on the coast, and that ships have been plundered,
and their people and passengers maltreated, during
the past summer. It is even thought that the famous
Rover has tired of his excesses on the Spanish Main,
and that a vessel was not long since seen in the
Caribbean sea, which was thought to be the cruiser
of that desperate pirate!
Wilder made no reply. His eyes, which had been
fastened steadily, though respectfully, on those of
the speaker, fell to the deck, and he appeared to
await whatever her further pleasure might choose to
utter. The governess mused a moment; and then,
with a change in the expression of her countenance
which proved that her suspicion of the truth was too
S 2
light to continue without further and better
confirmation
,
she added,
After all, the occupation of a slaver is bad
enough, and unhappily by far too probable, to render
it necessary to attribute any worse character to the
stranger. I would I knew the motive of your
singular
assertions, Mr Wilder?
I cannot better explain them, Madam: unless
my manner produces its effect, I fail altogether in
my intentions, which at least are sincere.
Is not the risk lessened by your presence?
Lessened, but not removed.
Until now, Gertrude had rather listened, as if
unavoidably
,
than seemed to make one of the party.
But here she turned quickly, and perhaps a little
impatiently, to Wilder, and, while her cheeks
glowed
,
she demanded, with a smile that might have
brought even a more obdurate man to his
confession
,
Is it forbidden to be more explicit?
The young Commander hesitated, perhaps as
much to dwell upon the ingenuous features of the
speaker, as to decide upon his answer. The colour
mounted into his own embrowned cheek, and his
eye lighted with a gleam of open pleasure; then, as
though suddenly reminded that he was delaying to
reply, he said,
I am certain, that, in relying on your discretion,
I shall be safe.
Doubt it not, returned Mrs Wyllys. In no
event shall you ever be betrayed.
Betrayed! For myself, Madam, I have little
fear. If you suspect me of personal apprehension,
you do me great injustice.
We suspect you of nothing unworthy, said
Gertrude
hastily, butwe are very anxious for
ourselves
.
Then will I relieve your uneasiness, though at
the expense of
A call, from one of the mates to the other,
arrested
his words for the moment, and drew his attention
to the neighbouring ship.
The slaver's people have just found out that
their ship is not made to put in a glass case, to be
looked at by women and children, cried the
speaker
,
in tones loud enough to send his words into the
fore-top, where the messmate he addressed was
attending
to some especial duty.
Ay, ay, was the answer; seeing us in motion,
has put him in mind of his next voyage. They keep
watch aboard the fellow, like the sun in Greenland:
six months on deck, and six months below!
The witticism produced, as usual, a laugh among
the seamen, who continued their remarks in a
similar
vein, but in tones more suited to the deference
due to their superiors.
The eyes, however, of Wilder had fastened
themselves
on the other ship. The man so long seated
on the end of the main-yard had disappeared, and
another sailor was deliberately walking along the
opposite quarter of the same spar, steadying himself
by the boom, and holding in one hand the end of a
rope, which he was apparently about to reeve in
the place where it properly belonged. The first
glance told Wilder that the latter was Fid, who was
so far recovered from his debauch as to tread the
giddy height with as much, if not greater, steadiness
than he would have rolled along the ground, had his
duty called him to terra firma. The countenance of
the young man, which, an instant before, had been
flushed with excitement, and which was beaming
with the pleasure of an opening confidence, changed
directly to a look of gloom and reserve. Mrs
Wyllys
,
who had lost no shade of the varying expression
of his face, resumed the discourse, with some
earnestness
,
where he had seen fit so abruptly to break
it off.
You would relieve us, she said, at the expense
of
Life, Madam; but not of honour.
Gertrude, we can now retire to our cabin,
observed
Mrs Wyllys, with an air of cold displeasure,
in which disappointment was a good deal mingled
with resentment at the trifling of which she
believed
herself the subject. The eye of Gertrude was
no less averted and distant than that of her
governess
,
while the tint that gave lustre to its beam was
brighter, if not quite so resentful. As the two moved
past the silent Wilder, each dropped a distant salute,
and then our adventurer found himself the sole
occupant
of the quarter-deck. While his crew were
busied in coiling ropes, and clearing the decks, their
young Commander leaned his head on the taffrail,
(that part of the vessel which the good relict of the
Rear-Admiral had so strangely confounded with a
very different object in the other end of the ship),
remaining for many minutes in an attitude of deep
abstraction. From this reverie he was at length
aroused, by a sound like that produced by the lifting
and falling of a light oar into the water. Believing
himself about to be annoyed by visiters from the
land, he raised his head, and cast a dissatisfied glance
over the vessel's side, to see who was approaching.
A light skiff, such as is commonly used by
fishermen
in the bays and shallow waters of America,
was lying within ten feet of the ship, and in a
position
where it was necessary to take some little pains
in order to observe it. It was occupied by a single
man, whose back was towards the vessel, and who
was apparently abroad on the ordinary business of
the owner of such a boat.
Are you in search of rudder-fish, my friend, that
you hang so closely under my counter? demanded
Wilder. The bay is said to be full of delicious
bass, and other scaly gentlemen, that would far better
repay your trouble.
He is well paid who gets the bite he baits for,
returned the other, turning his head, and exhibiting
the cunning eye and chuckling countenance of old
Bob Bunt, as Wilder's recent and treacherous
confederate
had announced his name to be.
How now! Dare you trust yourself with me, in
five-fathom water, after the villanous trick you have
seen fit
Hist! noble Captain, hist! interrupted Bob,
holding up a finger, to repress the other's animation,
and intimating, by a sign, that their conference must
be held in lower tones; there is no need to call all
hands to help us through a little chat. In what way
have I fallen to leeward of your favour, Captain?
In what way, sirrah! Did you not receive money,
to give such a character of this ship to the ladies as
(you said yourself) would make them sooner pass
the night in a churchyard, than trust foot on board
her?
Something of the sort passed between us,
Captain
;
but you forgot one half of the conditions, and
I overlooked the other; and I need not tell so expert
a navigator, that two halves make a whole. No
wonder, therefore, that the affair dropt through
between
us.
How! Do you add falsehood to perfidy? What
part of my engagement did I neglect?
What part! returned the pretended fisherman,
leisurely drawing in a line, which the quick eye of
Wilder saw, though abundantly provided with lead
at the end, was destitute of the equally material
implement
the
hook; What part, Captain! No less
a particular than the second guinea.
It was to have been the reward of a service
done, and not an earnest, like its fellow, to induce
you to undertake the duty.
Ah! you have helped me to the very word I
wanted. I fancied it was not in earnest, like the one
I got, and so I left the job half finished.
Half finished, scoundrel! you never commenced
what you swore so stoutly to perform.
Now are you on as wrong a course, my Master,
as if you steered due east to get to the Pole. I
religiously
performed one half my undertaking; and,
you will acknowledge, I was only half paid.
You would find it difficult to prove that you
even did that little.
Let us look into the log. I enlisted to walk up
the hill as far as the dwelling of the good Admiral's
widow, and there to make certain alterations in my
sentiments, which it is not necessary to speak of
between us.
Which you did not make; but, on the contrary,
which you thwarted, by telling an exactly
contradictory
tale.
True.
True! knave?Were justice done you, an
acquaintance
with a rope's end would be a merited
reward.
A squall of words!If your ship steer as wild
as your ideas, Captain, you will make a crooked
passage to the south. Do you not think it an easier
matter, for an old man like me, to tell a few lies,
than to climb yonder long and heavy hill? In strict
justice, more than half my duty was done when I
got into the presence of the believing widow; and
then I concluded to refuse the half of the reward
that was unpaid, and to take bounty from t'other
side.
Villain! exclaimed Wilder, a little blinded by
resentment, even your years shall no longer
protect
you from punishment. Forward, there! send
a crew into the jolly boat, sir, and bring me this old
fellow in the skiff on board the ship. Pay no
attention
to his outcries; I have an account to settle with
him, that cannot be balanced without a little noise.
The mate, to whom this order was addressed, and
who had answered the hail, jumped on the rail, where
he got sight of the craft he was commanded to chase.
In less than a minute he was in the boat, with four
men, and pulling round the bows of the ship, in
order
to get on the side necessary to effect his object.
The self-styled Bob Bunt gave one or two strokes
with his skulls, and sent the skiff some twenty or
thirty fathoms off, where he lay, chuckling like a
man who saw only the success of his cunning,
without
any apparent apprehensions of the consequences.
But, the moment the boat appeared in view, he laid
himself to the work with vigorous arms, and soon
convinced the spectators that his capture was not to
be achieved without abundant difficulty.
For some little time, it was doubtful what course
the fugitive meant to take; for he kept whirling and
turning in swift and sudden circles, completely
confusing
and baffling his pursuers, by his skilful and
light evolutions. But, soon tiring of this taunting
amusement, or perhaps apprehensive of exhausting
his own strength, which was powerfully and most
dexterously exerted, it was not long before he darted
off in a perfectly straight line, taking the direction
of the Rover.
The chase now grew hot and earnest, exciting the
clamour and applause of most of the nautical
spectators
.
The result, for a time, seemed doubtful; but,
if any thing, the jolly boat, though some distance
astern, began to gain, as it gradually overcame the
resistance of the water. In a very few minutes,
however, the skiff shot under the stern of the other
ship, and disappeared, bringing the hull of the vessel
in a line with the Caroline and its course. The
pursuers were not long in taking the same direction;
and then the seamen of the latter ship began,
laughingly
,
to climb the rigging, in order to command a
further view, over the intervening object.
Nothing, however, was to be seen beyond but
water, and the still more distant island, with its little
fort. In a few minutes, the crew of the jolly boat
were observed pulling back in their path, returning
slowly, like men who were disappointed. All
crowded
to the side of the ship, in order to hear the
termination
of the adventure; the noisy assemblage
even drawing the two passengers from the cabin to
the deck. Instead, however, of meeting the questions
of their shipmates with the usual wordy narrative of
men of their condition, the crew of the boat wore
startled and bewildered looks. Their officer sprang
to the deck without speaking, and immediately sought
his Commander.
The skiff was too light for you, Mr Nighthead,
Wilder calmly observed, as the other approached,
having never moved, himself, from the place where
he had been standing during the whole proceeding.
Too light, sir! Are you acquainted with the man
who pulled it?
Not particularly well: I only know him for a
knave.
He should be one, since he is of the family of
the devil!
I will not take on myself to say he is as bad as
you appear to think, though I have little reason to
believe he has any honesty to cast into the sea.
What has become of him?
A question easily asked, but hard to answer.
In the first place, though an old and a gray-headed
fellow, he twitched his skiff along as if it floated in
air. We were not a minute, or two at the most,
behind
him; but, when we got on the other side of the
slaver, boat and man had vanished!
He doubled her bows while you were crossing
the stern.
Did you see him, then?
I confess we did not.
It could not be, sir; since we pulled far enough
ahead to examine on both sides at once; besides, the
people of the slaver knew nothing of him.
You saw the slaver's people?
I should have said her man; for there is
seemingly
but one hand on board her.
And how was he employed?
He was seated in the chains, and seem'd to have
been asleep. It is a lazy ship, sir; and one that
takes more money from her owners, I fancy, than it
ever returns!
It may be so. Well, let the rogue escape. There
is the prospect of a breeze coming in from the sea,
Mr Earing; we will get our top-sails to the mast-heads
again, and be in readiness for it. I could like yet to
see the sun set in the water.
The mates and the crew went cheerfully to their
task, though many a curious question was asked, by
the wondering seamen, of their shipmates who had
been in the boat, and many a solemn answer was
given, while they were again spreading the canvas,
to invite the breeze. Wilder turned, in the mean
time, to Mrs Wyllys, who had been an auditor of
his short conversation with the mate.
You perceive, Madam, he said, that our
voyage
does not commence without its omens.
When you tell me, inexplicable young man, with
the air of singular sincerity you sometimes possess,
that we are unwise in trusting to the ocean, I am
half inclined to put faith in what you say; but when
you attempt to enforce your advice with the
machinery
of witchcraft, you only induce me to
proceed
.
Man the windlass! cried Wilder, with a look
Vol. I. T
that seemed to tell his companions, If you are so
stout of heart, the opportunity to show your
resolution
shall not be wanting. Man the windlass there!
We will try the breeze again, and work the ship into
the offing while there is light.
The clattering of handspikes preceded the
mariners'
song. Then the heavy labour, by which the
ponderous iron was lifted from the bottom, was
again resumed, and, in a few more minutes, the ship
was once more released from her hold upon the land.
The wind soon came fresh off the ocean, charged
with the saline dampness of the element. As the
air fell upon the distended and balanced sails, the
ship bowed to the welcome guest; and then, rising
gracefully from its low inclination, the breeze was
heard singing, through the maze of rigging, the
music
that is ever grateful to a seaman's ear. The
welcome
sounds, and the freshness of the peculiar air,
gave additional energy to the movements of the
men. The anchor was stowed, the ship cast, the
lighter sails set, the courses had fallen, and the bows
of the Caroline were throwing the spray before
her, ere another ten minutes had gone by.
Wilder had now undertaken himself the task of
running his vessel between the islands of
Connannicut
and Rhode. Fortunately for the heavy
responsibility
he had assumed, the channel was not
difficult
,
and the wind had veered so far to the east as
to give him a favourable opportunity, after making
a short stretch to windward, of laying through in a
single reach. But this stretch would bring him
under
the necessity of passing very near the Rover,
or of losing no small portion of his 'vantage ground.
He did not hesitate. When the vessel was as nigh
the weather shore as his busy lead told him was
prudent
,
the ship was tacked, and her head laid
directly
towards the still motionless and seemingly
unobservant
slaver.
The approach of the Caroline was far more
propitious than before. The wind was steady, and
her crew held her in hand, as a skilful rider governs
the action of a fiery and mettled steed. Still the
passage was not made without exciting a breathless
interest in every soul in the Bristol trader. Each
individual had his own secret cause of curiosity.
To the seamen, the strange ship began to be the
subject
of wonder; the governess, and her ward, scarce
knew the reasons of their emotions; while Wilder
was but too well instructed in the nature of the
hazard that all but himself were running. As
before
,
the man at the wheel was about to indulge his
nautical pride, by going to windward; but, although
the experiment would now have been attended with
but little hazard, he was commanded to proceed
differently
.
Pass the slaver's lee-beam, sir, said Wilder to
him, with a gesture of authority; and then the young
Captain went himself to lean on the weather-rail,
like every other idler on board, to examine the
object
they were so fast approaching. As the
Caroline
came boldly up, seeming to bear the breeze
before
her, the sighing of the wind, as it murmured
through the rigging of the stranger, was the only
sound that issued from her. Not a single human
face, not even a secret and curious eye, was any
where to be seen. The passage was of course rapid;
and, as the two vessels, for an instant, lay with heads
and sterns nearly equal, Wilder thought it was to be
made without the slightest notice from the imaginary
slaver. But he was mistaken. A light, active form,
in the undress attire of a naval officer, sprang upon
the taffrail, and waved a sea-cap in salute. The
instant
the fair hair was blowing about the
countenance
of this individual, Wilder recognized the
quick, keen eye and features of the Rover.
Think you the wind will hold here, sir?
shouted
the latter, at the top of his voice.
It has come in fresh enough to be steady, was
the answer.
A wise mariner would get all his easting in time;
to me, there is a smack of West-Indies about it.
You believe we shall have it more at south?
I do: But a taught bow-line, for the night, will
carry you clear.
By this time the Caroline had swept by, and
she was now luffing, across the slaver's bows, into
her course again. The figure on the taffrail waved
high the sea-cap in adieu, and disappeared.
Is it possible that such a man can traffic in
human
beings! exclaimed Gertrude, when the sounds
of both voices had ceased.
Receiving no reply, she turned quickly, to regard
her companion. The governess was standing like a
being entranced, with her eyes looking on vacancy;
for they had not changed their direction since the
motion of the vessel had carried her beyond the
countenance of the stranger. As Gertrude took her
hand, and repeated the question, the recollection of
Mrs Wyllys returned. Passing her own hand over
her brow, with a bewildered air, she forced a smile,
as she said,
The meeting of vessels, or the renewal of any
maritime experience, never fails to revive my
earliest
recollections, love. But surely that was an
extraordinary
being, who has at length shown himself
in the slaver!
For a slaver, most extraordinary!
Wyllys leaned her head on her hand for an instant,
and then turned to seek the person of Wilder. The
young mariner was standing near, studying the
expression
of her countenance, with an interest
scarcely
less remarkable than her own air of thought.
Tell me, young man, is yonder individual the
Commander of the slaver?
He is.
You know him?
We have met.
And he is called
The Master of yon ship. I know no other name.
Gertrude, we will seek our cabin. When the
land is leaving us, Mr Wilder will have the goodness
to let us know.
The latter bowed his assent, and the ladies then
left the deck. The Caroline had now the
prospect
of getting speedily to sea. In order to effect
this object, Wilder had every thing, that would
draw, set to the utmost advantage. One hundred
times, at least, however, did he turn his head, to
steal a look at the vessel he had left behind. She
ever lay as when they passeda regular, beautiful,
but motionless object, in the bay. From each of
these furtive examinations, our adventurer invariably
cast an excited and impatient glance at the sails of
his own ship; ordering this to be drawn tighter to
the spar beneath, or that to be more distended along
its mast.
The effect of so much solicitude, united with so
much skill, was to urge the Bristol trader through
her element at a rate she had rarely, if ever,
surpassed
.
It was not long before the land ceased to be
seen on her two beams, and then it was only to be
traced in the blue islands in their rear, or in a long,
dim horizon, to the north and west, where the
limits
of the vast Continent stretches for countless
leagues. The passengers were now summoned to
take their parting look at the land, and the officers
were seen noting their departures. Just before the
day shut in, and ere the islands were entirely sunk
into the waves, Wilder ascended to an upper yard,
T 2
bearing in his hand a glass. His gaze, towards the
haven he had left, was long, anxious, and abstracted.
But his descent was distinguished by a more quiet
eye, and a calmer mien. A smile, like that of
success
,
played about his lips; and he gave his orders
clearly, in a cheerful, encouraging voice. They
were obeyed as briskly. The elder mariners pointed
to the seas, as they cut through them, and affirmed
that never had the Caroline made such progress.
The mates cast the log, and nodded their
approbation
,
as one announced to the other the unwonted
speed of the ship. In short, content and hilarity
reigned on board; for it was deemed that their
passage
was commenced under such auspices as would
lead it to a speedy and a prosperous termination. In
the midst of these encouraging omens, the sun dipped
into the sea, illuming, as it fell, a wide reach of the
chill and gloomy element. Then the shades of the
hour began to gather over the vast surface of the
illimitable waste.
CHAPTER XIV.
So foul and fair a day I have not seen.
Macbeth
.
The
first watch of the night was marked by no
change. Wilder had joined his passengers, cheerful,
and with that air of enjoyment which every officer
of the sea is more or less wont to exhibit, when he
has disengaged his vessel from the dangers of the land,
and has fairly launched her on the trackless and
fathomless
abyss of the ocean. He no longer alluded
to the hazards of the passage, but strove, by the
thousand nameless assiduities which his station
enabled
him to manifest, to expel all recollection of
what had passed from their minds. Mrs Wyllys lent
herself to his evident efforts to remove their
apprehensions
;
and one, ignorant of what had occurred
between them, would have thought the little party,
around the evening's repast, was a contented and
unsuspecting group of travellers, who had
commenced
their enterprise under the happiest auguries.
Still there was that, in the thoughtful eye and
clouded brow of the governess, as at times she
turned
her bewildered look on our adventurer, which
denoted a mind far from being at ease. She listened
to the gay and peculiar, because professional, sallies
of the young mariner, with smiles that were
indulgent
,
while they were melancholy, as though his
youthful spirits, exhibited as they were by touches
of a humour that was thoroughly and quaintly
nautical
,
recalled familiar, but sad, images to her fancy.
Gertrude had less alloy in her pleasure. Home, with
a beloved and indulgent father, were before her;
and she felt, while the ship yielded to each fresh
impulse
of the wind, as if another of those weary miles,
which had so long separated them, was already
conquered
.
During these short but pleasant hours, the
adventurer
,
who had been so oddly called into the
command
of the Bristol trader, appeared in a new
character
.
Though his conversation was characterized
by the frank manliness of a seaman, it was,
nevertheless
,
tempered by the delicacy of perfect breeding.
The beautiful mouth of Gertrude often struggled to
conceal the smiles which played around her lips and
dimpled her cheeks, like a soft air ruffling the surface
of some limpid spring; and once or twice, when the
humour of Wilder came unexpectedly across her
youthful fancy, she was compelled to yield to the
impulses
of an irresistible merriment.
One hour of the free intercourse of a ship can do
more towards softening the cold exterior in which
the world encrusts the best of human feelings, than
weeks of the unmeaning ceremonies of the land.
He who has not felt this truth, would do well to
distrust
his own companionable qualities. It would seem
that man, when he finds himself in the solitude of
the ocean, feels the deepest how great is his
dependancy
on others for happiness. Then it is that he
yields to sentiments with which he trifled, in the
wantonness of abundance, and is glad to seek relief
in the sympathies of his kind. A community of
hazard
makes a community of interest, whether person
or property composes the stake. Perhaps a
metaphysical
,
and a too literal, reasoner might add, that,
as in such situations each one is conscious the
condition
and fortunes of his neighbour are the mere
indexes of his own, they acquire value in his eyes
from their affinity to himself. If this conclusion be
true, Providence has happily so constituted the best
of the species, that the sordid feeling is too latent to
be discovered; and least of all was any one of the
three, who passed the first hours of the night around
the cabin table of the Royal Caroline, to be
included
in so selfish a class. The nature of the
intercourse
,
which had rendered the first hours of their
acquaintance so singularly equivocal, appeared to be
forgotten in the freedom of the moment; or, if it
were remembered at all, it merely served to give the
young seaman additional interest in the eyes of the
females, as much by the mystery of the circumstances
as by the evident concern he had manifested in their
behalf.
The bell had struck eight; and the hoarse
long-drawn
call, which summoned the sleepers to the
deck, was heard, before either of the party seemed
aware of the lateness of the hour.
It is the middle watch, said Wilder, smiling as
he observed that Gertrude started at the strange
sounds, and sat listening, like a timid doe that
catches
the note of the hunter's horn. We seamen are
not always musical, as you may judge by the strains
of the spokesman on this occasion. There are,
however, ears in the ship to whom his notes are even
more discordant than to your own.
You mean the sleepers? said Mrs Wyllys.
I mean the watch below. There is nothing so
sweet to the foremast mariner as his sleep; for it is
the most precarious of all his enjoyments; on the
other hand, perhaps, it is the most treacherous
companion
the Commander knows.
And why is the rest of the superior so much less
grateful than that of the common man?
Because he pillows his head on responsibility.
You are young, Mr Wilder, for a trust like this
you bear.
It is a service which makes us all prematurely
old.
Then, why not quit it? said Gertrude, a little
hastily.
Quit it! he replied, gazing at her intently, for
an instant, while he suspended his reply. It would
be to me like quitting the air we breathe.
Have you so long been devoted to your
profession
?
resumed Mrs Wyllys, bending her
thoughtful
eye, from the ingenuous countenance of her
pupil, once more towards the features of him she
addressed.
I have reason to think I was born on the sea.
Think! You surely know your birth-place.
We are all of us dependant on the testimony of
others, said Wilder, smiling, for the account of
that important event. My earliest recollections are
blended with the sight of the ocean, and I can hardly
say that I am a creature of the land at all.
You have, at least, been fortunate in those who
have had the charge to watch over your education,
and your younger days.
I have! he answered, with strong emphasis.
Then, after shading his face an instant with his
hands, he arose, and added, with a melancholy
smile: And now to my last duty for the
twenty-four
hours. Have you a disposition to look at the
night? So skilful and so stout a sailor should not
seek her birth, without passing an opinion on the
weather.
The governess took his offered arm, and, with his
aid, ascended the stairs of the cabin in silence, each
seemingly finding sufficient employment in
meditation
.
She was followed by the more youthful, and
therefore more active Gertrude, who joined them,
as they stood together, on the weather side of the
quarter-deck.
The night was rather misty than dark. A full and
bright moon had arisen; but it pursued its path,
through the heavens, behind a body of dusky clouds,
that was much too dense for any borrowed rays to
penetrate. Here and there, a straggling gleam
appeared
to find its way through a covering of vapour
less dense than the rest, and fell upon the water like
the dim illumination of a distant taper. As the wind
was fresh and easterly, the sea seemed to throw
upward
,
from its agitated surface, more light than it
received
;
long lines of white, glittering foam
following
each other, and lending, at moments, a
distinctness
to the surface of the waters, that the heavens
themselves wanted. The ship was bowed low on
its side; and, as it entered each rolling swell of the
ocean, a wide crescent of foam was driven ahead,
as if the element gambolled along its path. But,
though the time was propitious, the wind not
absolutely
adverse, and the heavens rather gloomy than
threatening, an uncertain (and, to a landsman, it
might seem an unnatural) light gave to the view a
character of the wildest loneliness.
Gertrude shuddered, on reaching the deck, while
she murmured an expression of strange delight.
Even Mrs Wyllys gazed upon the dark waves, that
were heaving and setting in the horizon, around
which was shed most of that radiance that seemed
so supernatural, with a deep conviction that she was
now entirely in the hands of the Being who had
created the waters and the land. But Wilder
looked
upon the scene as one fastens his gaze on a placid
sky. To him the view possessed neither novelty,
nor dread, nor charm. Not so, however, with his
more youthful and slightly enthusiastic companion.
After the first sensations of awe had a little subsided,
she exclaimed, in the fullest ardour of admiration,
One such sight would repay a month of
imprisonment
in a ship! You must find deep enjoyment
in these scenes, Mr Wilder; you, who have them
always at command.
Yes, yes; there is pleasure to be found in them,
without doubt. I would that the wind had veer'd
a point or two! I like not that sky, nor yonder
misty
horizon, nor this breeze hanging so dead at east.
The vessel makes great progress, returned Mrs
Wyllys, calmly, observing that the young man spoke
without consciousness, and fearing the effect of his
words on the mind of her pupil. If we are going
on our course, there is the appearance of a quick
and prosperous passage.
True! exclaimed Wilder, as though he had just
become conscious of her presence. Quite
probable
,
and very true. Mr Earing, the air is getting too
heavy for that duck. Hand all your top-gallant sails,
and haul the ship up closer. Should the wind hang
here at east-with-southing, we may want what offing
we can get.
The mate replied in the prompt and obedient
manner which seamen use to their superiors; and,
after scanning the signs of the weather for a moment,
he promptly proceeded to see the order executed.
While the men were on the yards furling the light
canvas, the females walked apart, leaving the young
Commander to the uninterrupted discharge of his
duty. But Wilder, so far from deeming it necessary
to lend his attention to so ordinary a service, the
moment
after he had spoken, seemed perfectly
unconscious
that the mandate had issued from his mouth.
He stood on the precise spot where the view of the
ocean and the heavens had first caught his eye, and
his gaze still continued fastened on the aspect of the
two elements. His look was always in the direction
of the wind, which, though far from a gale, often
fell upon the sails of the ship in heavy and sullen
puffs. After a long and anxious examination, the
young mariner muttered his thoughts to himself, and
commenced pacing the deck with rapid footsteps.
Still he would make sudden and short pauses, and
again rivet his gaze on the point of the compass
whence the blasts came sweeping across the waste
of waters; as though he distrusted the weather, and
would fain cause his keen glance to penetrate the
gloom of night, in order to relieve some painful
doubts. At length his step became arrested, in one
of those quick turns that he made at each end of his
narrow walk. Mrs Wyllys and Gertrude stood nigh,
and were enabled to read something of the anxious
character of his countenance, as his eye became
suddenly fastened on a distant point of the ocean,
though in a quarter exactly opposite to that whither
his former looks had been directed.
Do you so much distrust the weather? asked
the governess, when she thought his examination
had endured long enough to become ominous of evil.
One looks not to leeward for the signs of the
weather, in a breeze like this, was the answer.
What see you, then, to fasten your eye on thus
intently?
Wilder slowly raised his arm, and was about to
point with his finger, when the limb suddenly fell
again.
It was delusion! he muttered, turning quickly
on his heel, and pacing the deck still more rapidly
than ever.
His companions watched the extraordinary, and
apparently unconscious, movements of the young
Commander, with amazement, and not without a
little secret dismay. Their own looks wandered
over the expanse of troubled water to leeward, but
nowhere could they see more than the tossing
element
,
capped with those ridges of garish foam which
served only to make the chilling waste more dreary
and imposing.
We see nothing, said Gertrude, when Wilder
again stopped in his walk, and once more gazed, as
before, on the seeming void.
Look! he answered, directing their eyes with
his finger: Is there nothing there?
Nothing.
You look into the sea. Here, just where the
heavens
and the waters meet; along that streak of misty
light, into which the waves are tossing themselves,
like little hillocks on the land. There; now 'tis
smooth again, and my eyes did not deceive me. By
heavens, it is a ship!
Sail, ho! shouted a voice, from out atop, which
sounded in the ears of our adventurer like the
croaking of some sinister spirit, sweeping across the
deep.
Whereaway? was the stern demand.
Here on our lee-quarter, sir, returned the
seaman
,
at the top of his voice. I make her out a
ship close-hauled; but, for an hour past, she has
looked more like mist than a vessel.
Ay, he is right, muttered Wilder; and yet
'tis a strange thing that a ship should be just there.
Vol. I. U
And why stranger than that we are here?
Why! said the young man, regarding Mrs
Wyllys, who had put this question, with a perfectly
unconscious eye. I say, 'tis strange she should be
there. I would she were steering northward.
But you give no reason. Are we always to have
warnings from you, she continued, with a smile,
without reasons? Do you deem us so utterly
unworthy
of a reason? or do you think us incapable
of thought on a subject connected with the sea?
You have failed to make the essay, and are too quick
to decide. Try us this once. We may possibly
deceive
your expectations.
Wilder laughed faintly, and bowed, as if he
recollected
himself. Still he entered into no
explanation
;
but again turned his gaze on the quarter of the
ocean where the strange sail was said to be. The
females followed his example, but ever with the
same want of success. As Gertrude expressed her
disappointment aloud, the soft tones of the
complainant
found their way to the ears of our
adventurer
.
You see the streak of dim light, he said, again
pointing across the waste. The clouds have lifted
a little there, but the spray of the sea is floating
between
us and the opening. Her spars look like the
delicate work of a spider, against the sky, and yet
you see there are all the proportions, with the three
masts, of a noble ship.
Aided by these minute directions, Gertrude at
length caught a glimpse of the faint object, and soon
succeeded in giving the true direction to the look of
her governess also. Nothing was visible but the dim
outline, not unaptly described by Wilder himself as
resembling a spider's web.
It must be a ship! said Mrs Wyllys; but at a
vast distance.
Hum! Would it were farther. I could wish that
vessel any where but there.
And why not there? Have you reason to dread
an enemy has been waiting for us in this particular
spot?
No: Still I like not her position. Would to God
she were going north!
It is some vessel from the port of New York,
steering to his Majesty's islands in the Caribbean
sea.
Not so, said Wilder, shaking his head; no
vessel, from under the heights of Never-sink, could
gain that offing with a wind like this!
It is then some ship going into the same place,
or perhaps bound for one of the bays of the Middle
Colonies!
Her road would be too plain to be mistaken.
See; the stranger is close upon a wind.
It may be a trader, or a cruiser coming
from
one of the places I have named.
Neither. The wind has had too much northing,
the last two days, for that.
It is a vessel that we have overtaken, and which
has come out of the waters of Long Island Sound.
That, indeed, may we yet hope, muttered
Wilder
,
in a smothered voice.
The governess, who had put the foregoing
questions
,
in order to extract from the Commander of
the Caroline the information he so pertinaciously
withheld, had now exhausted all her own
knowledge
on the subject, and was compelled to await his
further pleasure in the matter, or resort to the less
equivocal means of direct interrogation. But the
busy state of Wilder's thoughts left her no
immediate
opportunity to pursue the subject. He soon
summoned
the officer of the watch to his councils, and
they consulted together, apart, for many minutes.
The hardy, but far from quick witted, seaman who
filled the second station in the ship saw nothing so
remarkable in the appearance of a strange sail, in
the precise spot where the dim and nearly aerial
image of the unknown vessel was still visible; nor
did he hesitate to pronounce her some honest trader,
bent, like themselves, on her purpose of lawful
commerce. It would seem that his Commander
thought otherwise, as will appear by the short
dialogue
that passed between them.
Is it not extraordinary that she should be just
there? demanded Wilder, after they had, each in
turn, made a closer examination of the faint object,
by the aid of an excellent night-glass.
She would be better off, here, returned the
literal
seaman, who only had an eye for the nautical
situation of the stranger; and we should be none
the worse for being a dozen leagues more to the
eastward, ourselves. If the wind holds here at
eastby-south-half-south
,
we shall have need of all that
offing. I got jammed once between Hatteras and
the Gulf
But, do you not perceive that she is where no
vessel could or ought to be, unless she has run
exactly
the same course with ourselves? interrupted
Wilder. Nothing, from any harbour south of New
York, could have such northing, as the wind has
been; while nothing, from the Colony of York,
would stand on this tack, if bound east; or would be
here, if going southward.
The plain-going ideas of the honest mate were
open to a reasoning which the reader may find a
little
obscure; for his mind contained a sort of chart
of the ocean, to which he could at any time refer,
with a proper discrimination between the various
winds, and all the different points of the compass.
When properly directed, he was not slow to see, as
a mariner, the probable justice of his young
Commander's
inferences; and then wonder, in its turn,
began to take possession of his more obtuse faculties.
It is downright unnatural, truly, that the fellow
should be there! he replied, shaking his head, but
meaning no more than that it was entirely out of the
order of nautical propriety; I see the philosophy
of what you say, Captain Wilder; and little do I
know how to explain it. It is a ship, to a mortal
certainty!
Of that there is no doubt. But a ship most
strangely placed!
I doubled the Good-Hope in the year '46,
continued
the other, and saw a vessel lying, as it might
be, here, on our weather-bowwhich is just
opposite
to this fellow, since he is on our lee-quarter
but there I saw a ship standing for an hour across
our fore-foot, and yet, though we set the azimuth,
not a degree did he budge, starboard or larboard,
during all that time, which, as it was heavy weather,
was, to say the least, something out of the common
order.
It was remarkable! returned Wilder, with an
air so vacant, as to prove that he rather communed
with himself than attended to his companion.
There are mariners who say that the flying
Dutchman cruises off that Cape, and that he often
gets on the weather side of a stranger, and bears
down upon him, like a ship about to lay him aboard.
Many is the King's cruiser, as they say, that has
turned her hands up from a sweet sleep, when the
look-outs have seen a double decker coming down
in the night, with ports up, and batteries lighted;
but then this can't be any such craft as the
Dutchman
,
since she is, at the most, no more than a large
sloop of war, if a cruiser at all.
No, no, said Wilder, this can never be the
Dutchman.
Yon vessel shows no lights; and, for that
matter
,
U 2
she has such a misty look, that one might well
question its being a ship at all. Then, again, the
Dutchman is always seen to windward, and the
strange sail we have here lies broad upon our
lee-quarter
!
It is no Dutchman, said Wilder, drawing a long
breath, like a man a waking from a trance.
Main-topmast-cross-trees
,
there!
The man who was stationed aloft answered to
this hail in the customary manner, the short
conver-sation
that succeeded being necessarily maintained
in shouts, rather than in speeches.
How long have you seen the stranger? was the
first demand of Wilder.
I have just come aloft, sir; but the man I
relieved
tells me more than an hour.
And has the man you relieved come down? or
what is that I see sitting on the lee side of the
mast-head
?
'Tis Bob Brace, sir; who says he cannot sleep,
and so he stays upon the yard to keep me
company
.
Send the man down. I would speak to him.
While the wakeful seaman was descending the
rigging, the two officers continued silent, each
seeming
to find sufficient occupation in musing on what
had already passed.
And why are you not in your hammock? said
Wilder, a little sternly, to the man who, in obedience
to his order, had descended to the quarter-deck.
I am not sleep-bound, your Honour, and
therefore
I had the mind to pass another hour aloft.
And why are you, who have two night-watches
to keep already, so willing to enlist in a third?
To own the truth, sir, my mind has been a little
misgiving about this passage, since the moment we
lifted our anchor.
Mrs Wyllys and Gertrude, who were auditors,
insensibly
drew nigher, to listen, with a species of
interest
which betrayed itself by the thrilling of nerves,
and an accelerated movement of the pulse.
And you have your doubts, sir! exclaimed the
Captain, in a tone of slight contempt. Pray, may
I ask what you have seen, on board here, to make
you distrust the ship.
No harm in asking, your Honour, returned the
seaman, crushing the hat he held between two hands
that had a gripe like a couple of vices, and so I
hope there is none in answering. I pulled an oar
in the boat after the old man this morning, and I
cannot say I like the manner in which he got from
the chase. Then, there is something in the ship to
leeward that comes athwart my fancy like a drag,
and I confess, your Honour, that I should make but
little headway in a nap, though I should try the
swing of a hammock.
How long is it since you made the ship to
leeward
?
gravely demanded Wilder.
I will not swear that a real living ship has been
made out at all, sir. Something I did see, just
before
the bell struck seven, and there it is, just as
clear and just as dim, to be seen now by them that
have good eyes.
And how did she bear when you first saw her?
Two or three points more toward the beam
than it is now.
Then we are passing her! exclaimed Wilder,
with a pleasure too evident to be concealed.
No, your Honour, no. You forget, sir, the ship
has come closer to the wind since the middle watch
was set.
True, returned his young Commander, in a
tone of disappointment; true, very true. And her
bearing has not changed since you first made her?
Not by compass, sir. It is a quick boat that, or
it would never hold such way with the `Royal
Caroline,' and that too upon a stiffened bow-line,
which every body knows is the real play of this
ship.
Go, get you to your hammock. In the morning
we may have a better look at the fellow.
Andyou hear me, sir, added the attentive
mate, do not keep the men's eyes open below, with
a tale as long as the short cable, but take your own
natural rest, and leave all others, that have clear
consciences, to do the same.
Mr Earing, said Wilder, as the seaman
reluctantly
proceeded towards his place of rest, we
will bring the ship upon the other tack, and get
more easting, while the land is so far from us.
This course will be setting us upon Hatteras.
Besides
Yes, sir, the mate replied, observing his
superior
to hesitate, as you were saying,besides, no
one can foretel the length of a gale, nor the real
quarter it may come from.
Precisely. No one can answer for the weather.
The men are scarcely in their hammocks; turn them
up at once, sir, before their eyes are heavy, and we
will bring the ship's head the other way.
The mate instantly sounded the well-known cry,
which summoned the watch below to the assistance
of their shipmates on the deck. Little delay occurred,
and not a word was uttered, but the short,
authoritative
mandates which Wilder saw fit to deliver from
his own lips. No longer pressed up against the
wind, the ship, obedient to her helm, gracefully
began
to incline her head from the waves, and to bring
the wind abeam. Then, instead of breasting and
mounting the endless hillocks, like a being that toiled
heavily along its path, she fell into the trough of the
sea, from which she issued like a courser, who,
having
conquered an ascent, shoots along the track with
redoubled velocity. For an instant the wind
appeared
to have lulled, though the wide ridge of foam,
which rolled along on each side the vessel's bows,
sufficiently proclaimed that she was skimming lightly
before it. In another moment, the tall spars began
to incline again to the west, and the vessel came
swooping up to the wind, until her plunges and shocks
against the seas were renewed as violently as before.
When every yard and sheet were properly trimmed
to meet the new position of the vessel, Wilder
turned
anxiously to get a glimpse of the stranger. A
minute was lost in ascertaining the precise spot
where he ought to appear; for, in such a chaos of
water, and with no guide but the judgment, the eye
was apt to deceive itself, by referring to the nearer
and more familiar objects by which the spectator
was surrounded.
The stranger has vanished! said Earing, with
a voice in whose tones mental relief and distrust
were both, at the same moment, oddly manifesting
themselves.
He should be on this quarter; but I confess I
see him not!
Ay, ay, sir; this is the way that the midnight
cruiser off the Hope is said to come and go. There
are men who have seen that vessel shut in by a fog,
in as fine a star-light night as was ever met in a
southern latitude. But then this cannot be the
Dutchman, since it is so many long leagues from the
pitch of the Cape to the coast of North-America.
Here he lies; and, by heaven! he has already
gone about! cried Wilder.
The truth of what our young adventurer had just
affirmed was indeed now sufficiently evident to the
eye of any seaman. The same diminutive and misty
tracery, as before, was to be seen on the light
back-ground
of the threatening horizon, looking not unlike
the faintest shadows cast upon some brighter surface
by the deception of the phantasmagoria. But to the
mariners, who so well knew how to distinguish
between
the different lines of her masts, it was very
evident that her course had been suddenly and
dexterously
changed, and that she was now steering no
longer to the south and west, but, like themselves,
holding her way towards the north-east. The fact
appeared to make a sensible impression on them
all; though probably, had their reasons been sifted,
they would have been found to be entirely different.
That ship has truly tacked! Earing exclaimed,
after a long, meditative pause, and with a voice in
which distrust, or rather awe, was beginning to get
the ascendancy. Long as I have followed the sea,
have I never before seen a vessel tack against such
a head-beating sea. He must have been all shaking
in the wind, when we gave him the last look, or we
should not have lost sight of him.
A lively and quick-working vessel might do it,
said Wilder; especially if strong handed.
Ay, the hand of Beelzebub is always strong; and
a light job would he make of it, in forcing even a
dull craft to sail.
Mr Earing, interrupted Wilder, we will pack
upon the `Caroline,' and try our sailing with this
taunting stranger. Get the main tack aboard, and
set the top-gallant-sail.
The slow-minded mate would have remonstrated
against the order, had he dared; but there was that,
in the calm, subdued, but deep tones of his young
Commander, which admonished him of the hazard.
He was not wrong, however, in considering the duty
he was now to perform as one not without some
risk. The ship was already moving under quite as
much canvas as he deemed it prudent to show at
such an hour, and with so many threatening
symptoms
of heavier weather hanging about the horizon.
The necessary orders were, however, repeated as
promptly as they had been given. The seamen had
already begun to consider the stranger, and to
converse
among themselves concerning his appearance
and situation; and they obeyed with an alacrity that
might perhaps have been traced to a secret but
common
wish to escape from his vicinity. The sails
were successively and speedily set; and then each
man folded his arms, and stood gazing steadily and
intently at the shadowy object to leeward, in order
to witness the effect of the change.
The Royal Caroline seemed, like her crew,
sensible of the necessity of increasing her speed.
As she felt the pressure of the broad sheets of
canvas
that had just been distended, the ship bowed
lower, and appeared to recline on the bed of water
which rose under her lee nearly to the scuppers. On
the other side, the dark planks, and polished copper,
lay bare for many feet, though often washed by the
waves that came sweeping along her length, green
and angrily, still capped, as usual, with crests of
lucid
foam. The shocks, as the vessel tilted against
the billows, were becoming every moment more
severe
;
and, from each encounter, a bright cloud of
spray arose, which either fell glittering on the deck,
or drove, in brilliant mist, across the rolling water,
far to leeward.
Wilder long watched the ship, with an excited
mien, but with all the intelligence of a seaman.
Once or twice, when she trembled, and appeared to
stop, in her violent encounter with a wave, as
suddenly as though she had struck a rock, his lips
severed, and he was about to give the order to
reduce the sail; but a glance at the misty looking
image on the western horizon seemed ever to cause
his mind to change its purpose. Like a desperate
adventurer, who had cast his fortunes on some
hazardous
experiment, he appeared to await the issue
with a resolution that was as haughty as it was
unconquerable
.
That top-mast is bending like a whip, muttered
the careful Earing, at his elbow.
Let it go; we have spare spars to put in its
place, was the answer.
I have always found the `Caroline' leaky after
she has been strained by driving her against the sea.
We have our pumps.
True, sir; but, in my poor judgment, it is idle
to think of outsailing a craft that the devil
commands
,
if he does not altogether handle it.
One will never know that, Mr Earing, till he
tries.
We gave the Dutchman a chance of that sort;
and, I must say, we not only had the most canvas
spread, but much the best of the wind: And what
good did it all do? there he lay, under his three
topsails
,
driver, and jib; and we, with studding sails
alow and aloft, couldn't alter his bearing a foot.
The Dutchman is never seen in a northern
latitude
.
Well, I cannot say he is, returned Earing, in a
sort of compelled resignation; but he who has put
that flyer off the Cape may have found the cruise so
profitable, as to wish to send another ship into these
seas.
Wilder made no reply. He had either humoured
the superstitious apprehension of his mate enough,
or his mind was too intent on its principal object, to
dwell longer on a foreign subject.
Notwithstanding the seas that met her advance,
in such quick succession as greatly to retard her
progress
,
the Bristol trader had soon toiled her way
through a league of the troubled element. At every
plunge she took, the bow divided a mass of water,
that appeared, at each instant, to become more vast
and more violent in its rushing; and more than once
the struggling hull was nearly buried forward, in
some wave which it had equal difficulty in mounting
or penetrating.
The mariners narrowly watched the smallest
movements
of their vessel. Not a man left her deck, for
hours. The superstitious awe, which had taken such
deep hold of the untutored faculties of the chief mate,
had not been slow to extend its influence to the
meanest of her crew. Even the accident which had
befallen their former Commander, and the sudden
and mysterious manner in which the young officer,
who now trod the quarter-deck, so singularly firm
and calm, under circumstances deemed so imposing,
had their influence in heightening the wild
impression
.
The impunity with which the Caroline
bore such a press of canvas, under the circumstances
in which she was placed, added to their kindling
admiration
;
and, ere Wilder had determined, in his
own mind, on the powers of his ship, in comparison
with those of the vessel that so strangely hung in
the horizon, he was himself becoming the subject
of unnatural and revolting suspicions to his own
crew.
CHAPTER XV.
I' the name of truth,
Are ye fantastical, or that indeed
Which outwardly ye show?
Macbeth
.
The
divison of employment that is found in
Europe, and which brings, in its train, a peculiar and
corresponding limitation of ideas, has never yet
existed
in our country. If our artisans have, in
consequence
,
been less perfect in their several
handicrafts
,
they have ever been remarkable for
intelligence
of a more general character. Superstition is,
Vol. I. X
however, a quality that seems indigenous to the ocean.
Few common mariners are exempt from its influence,
in a greater or less degree; though it is found to
exist
,
among the seamen of different people, in forms
that are tempered by their respective national habits
and peculiar opinions. The sailor of the Baltic has
his secret rites, and his manner of propitiating the
gods of the wind; the Mediterranean mariner tears
his hair, and kneels before the shrine of some
impotent
saint, when his own hand might better do the
service he implores; while the more skilful
Englishman
sees the spirits of the dead in the storm, and
hears the cries of a lost messmate in the gusts that
sweep the waste he navigates. Even the better
instructed
and still more reasoning American has not
been able to shake entirely off the secret influence
of a sentiment that seems the concomitant of his
condition.
There is a majesty, in the might of the great deep,
that has a tendency to keep open the avenues of that
dependant credulity which more or less besets the
mind of every man, however he may have fortified
his intellect by thought. With the firmament above
him, and wandering on an interminable waste of
water
,
the less gifted seaman is tempted, at every step
of his pilgrimage, to seek the relief of some
propitious
omen. The few which are supported by
scientific
causes give support to the many that have their
origin only in his own excited and doubting
temperament
.
The gambols of the dolphin, the earnest and
busy passage of the porpoise, the ponderous sporting
of the unwieldy whale, and the screams of the
marine
birds, have all, like the signs of the ancient
soothsayers, their attendant consequences of good
or evil. The confusion between things which are
explicable, and things which are not, gradually brings
the mind of the mariner to a state in which any
exciting
and unnatural sentiment is welcome, if it be
for no other reason than that, like the vast element
on which he passes his life, it bears the impression
of what is thought a supernatural, because it is an
incomprehensible, power.
The crew of the Royal Caroline had not even
the advantage of being natives of a land where
necessity
and habit have united to bring every man's
faculties into exercise, to a certain extent at least.
They were all from that distant island that has been,
and still continues to be, the hive of nations, which
are probably fated to carry her name to a time when
the sight of her fallen power shall be sought as a
curiosity, like the remains of a city in a desert.
The whole events of that day of which we are
now writing had a tendency to arouse the latent
superstition
of these men. It has already been said,
that the calamity which had befallen their former
Commander, and the manner in which a stranger
had succeeded to his authority, had their influence in
increasing their disposition to doubt. The sail to
leeward appeared most inopportunely for the
character
of our adventurer, who had not yet enjoyed a
fitting opportunity to secure the confidence of his
inferiors, before such untoward circumstances
occurred
as threatened to deprive him of it for ever.
There has existed but one occasion for introducing
to the reader the mate who filled the station in the
ship next to that of Earing. He was called
Nighthead
;
a name that was, in some measure, indicative
of a certain misty obscurity that beset his superior
member. The qualities of his mind may be
appreciated
by the few reflections he saw fit to make on
the escape of the old mariner whom Wilder had
intended
to visit with a portion of his indignation. This
individual, as he was but one degree removed from
the common men in situation, so was he every way
qualified to maintain that association with the crew
which was, in some measure, necessary between
them. His influence among them was commensurate
to his opportunities of intercourse, and his sentiments
were very generally received with a portion of that
deference which is thought to be due to the opinions
of an oracle.
After the ship had been worn, and during the time
that Wilder, with a view to lose sight of his
unwelcome
neighbour, was endeavouring to urge her
through the seas in the manner already described,
this stubborn and mystified tar remained in the waist
of the vessel, surrounded by a few of the older and
more experienced seamen, holding converse on the
remarkable appearance of the phantom to leeward,
and of the extraordinary manner in which their
unknown
officer saw fit to attest the enduring qualities
of their own vessel. We shall commence our
relation
of the dialogue at a point where Nighthead saw
fit to discontinue his distant inuendos, in order to
deal more directly with the subject he had under
discussion.
I have heard it said, by older sea-faring men
than any in this ship, he continued, that the devil
has been known to send one of his mates aboard a
lawful trader, to lead her astray among shoals and
quicksands, in order that be might make a wreck,
and get his share of the salvage, among the souls of
the people. What man can say who gets into the
cabin, when an unknown name stands first in the
shipping list of a vessel?
The stranger is shut in by a cloud! exclaimed
one of the mariners, who, while he listened to the
philosophy of his officer, still kept an eye riveted on
the mysterious object to leeward.
Ay, ay; it would occasion no surprise to see that
craft steering into the moon! Luck is like a
flyblock
and its yard: when one goes up, the other
comes down. They say the red-coats ashore have
had their turn of fortune, and it is time we honest
seamen look out for our squalls. I have doubled
the Horn, brothers, in a King's ship, and I have seen
the bright cloud that never sets, and have held a
living corposant in my own hand: But these are
things which any man may look on, who will go upon
a yard in a gale, or ship aboard a Southseaman: Still,
I pronounce it uncommon for a vessel to see her
shadow in the haze, as we have ours at this moment;
for there it comes again!hereaway, between the
after-shroud and the backstayor for a trader to
carry sail in a fashion that would make every knee
in a bomb-ketch work like a tooth-brush fiddling
across a passenger's mouth, after he had had a smart
bout with the sea sickness.
And yet the lad holds the ship in hand, said the
oldest of all the seamen, who kept his gaze fastened
on the proceedings of Wilder; he is driving her
through it in a mad manner, I will allow; but yet,
so far, he has not parted a yarn.
Yarns! repeated the mate, in a tone of strong
contempt; what signify yarns, when the whole
cable
is to snap, and in such a fashion as to leave no
hope for the anchor, except in a buoy rope? Hark
ye, old Bill; the devil never finishes his jobs by
halves: What is to happen will happen bodily; and
no easing-off, as if you were lowering the Captain's
lady into a boat, and he on deck to see fair play.
Mr Nighthead knows how to keep a ship's
reckoning
in all weathers! said another, whose manner
sufficiently announced the dependance he himself
placed on the capacity of the second mate.
And no credit to me for the same. I have seen
all services, and handled every rig, from a lugger to
a double-decker! Few men can say more in their
own favour than myself; for the little I know has
been got by much hardship, and small schooling.
But what matters information, or even seamanship,
against witchcraft, or the workings of one whom I
X 2
don't choose to name, seeing that there is no use in
offending any gentleman unnecessarily? I say,
brothers
,
that this ship is packed upon in a fashion that
no prudent seaman ought to, or would, allow.
A general murmur announced that most, if not all,
of his hearers accorded in his opinion.
Let us examine calmly and reasonably, and in a
manner becoming enlightened Englishmen, into the
whole state of the case, the mate continued,
casting
an eye obliquely over his shoulder, perhaps to
make sure that the individual, of whose displeasure
he stood in such salutary awe, was not actually at
his elbow. We are all of us, to a man, native-born
islanders, without a drop of foreign blood among us;
not so much as a Scotchman or an Irishman in the
ship. Let us therefore look into the philosophy of
this affair, with that sort of judgment which becomes
our breeding. In the first place, here is honest
Nicholas Nichols slips from this here water-cask,
and breaks me a leg! Now, brothers, I've known
men to fall from tops and yards, and lighter damage
done. But what matters it, to a certain person, how
far he throws his man, since he has only to lift a
finger
to get us all hanged? Then, comes me aboard
here a stranger, with a look of the colonies about
him, and none of your plain-dealing, out-and-out,
smooth English faces, such as a man can cover with
the flat of his hand.
The lad is well enough to the eye, interrupted
the old mariner.
Ay, therein lies the whole deviltry of this
matter
!
He is good-looking, I grant ye; but it is not
such good-looking as an Englishman loves. There
is a meaning about him that I don't like; for I never
likes too much meaning in a man's countenance,
seeing that it is not always easy to understand what
he would be doing. Then, this stranger gets to be
Master of the ship, or, what is the same thing, next
to Master; while he who should be on deck giving
his orders, in a time like this, is lying in his birth
unable
to tack himself, much less to put the vessel
about; and yet no man can say how the thing came
to pass.
He drove a bargain with the consignee for the
station, and right glad did the cunning merchant
seem to get so tight a youth to take charge of the
`Caroline.'
Ah! a merchant is, like the rest of us, made of
nothing better than clay; and, what is worse, it is
seldom that, in putting him together, he is dampened
with salt water. Many is the trader that has douzed
his spectacles, and shut his account-books, to step
aside to over-reach his neighbour, and then come
back to find that he has over-reached himself. Mr
Bale, no doubt, thought he was doing the clever
thing for the owners, when he shipped this Mr
Wilder
;
but then, perhaps, he did not know that the
vessel was sold to  It becomes a
plain-going
seaman to have a respect for all he sails under;
so I will not, unnecessarily, name the person who, I
believe, has got, whether he came by it in a fair
purchase or not, no small right in this vessel.
I have never seen a ship got out of irons more
handsomely than he handled the `Caroline' this
very morning.
Nighthead now indulged in a low, but what to his
listeners appeared to be an exceedingly meaning,
laugh.
When a ship has a certain sort of Captain, one
is not to be surprised at any thing, he answered,
the instant his significant merriment had ceased.
For my own part, I shipped to go from Bristol to
the Carolinas and Jamaica, touching at Newport
out and home; and I will say, boldly, I have no wish
to go any where else. As to backing the `Caroline'
from her awkward birth alongside the slaver, why,
it was well done; most too well for so young a
mariner. Had I done the thing myself, it could not
have been much better. But what think you,
brothers
,
of the old man in the skiff? There was a
chase, and an escape, such as few old sea-dogs have
the fortune to behold! I have heard of a smuggler
that was chased a hundred times by his Majesty's
cutters, in the chops of the Channel, and which
always
had a fog handy to run into, but out of which
no man could truly say he ever saw her come again!
This skiff may have plied between the land and that
Guernseyman, for any thing I know to the contrary;
but it is not a boat I wish to pull a scull in.
That
was
a remarkable flight! exclaimed the
elder seaman, whose faith in the character of our
adventurer
began to give way gradually, before such
an accumulation of testimony.
I call it so; though other men may possibly
know better than I, who have only followed the
water
five-and-thirty years. Then, here is the sea
getting
up in an unaccountable manner! and look at
these rags of clouds, which darken the heavens! and
yet there is light enough, coming from the ocean, for
a good scholar to read by!
I've often seen the weather as it is now.
Ay, who has not? It is seldom that any man,
let him come from what part he will, makes his first
voyage as Captain. Let who will be out to-night
upon the water, I'll engage he has been there before.
I have seen worse looking skies, and even worse
looking water, than this; but I never knew any good
come of either. The night I was wreck'd in the
bay of
In the waist there! cried the calm,
authoritative
tones of Wilder.
Had a warning voice arisen from the turbulent
and rushing ocean itself, it would not have sounded
more alarming, in the startled ears of the conscious
seamen, than this sudden hail. Their young
Commander
found it necessary to repeat it, before even
Nighthead, the proper and official spokesman, could
muster resolution to answer.
Get the fore-top-gallant-sail on the ship, sir,
continued Wilder, when the customary reply let
him know that he had been heard.
The mate and his companions regarded each other,
for a moment, in dull admiration; and many a
melancholy
shake of the head was exchanged, before
one of the party threw himself into the
weather-rigging
,
and proceeded aloft, with a doubting mind, in
order to loosen the sail in question.
There was certainly enough, in the desperate
manner
with which Wilder pressed the canvas on the
vessel, to excite distrust, either of his intentions or
judgment, in the opinions of men less influenced by
superstition than those it was now his lot to
command
.
It had long been apparent to Earing, and
his more ignorant, and consequently more obstinate,
brother officer, that their young superior had the
same desire to escape from the spectral-looking ship,
which so strangely followed their movements, as
they had themselves. They only differed in the
mode; but this difference was so very material, that
the two mates consulted together apart, and then
Earing, something stimulated by the hardy opinions
of his coadjutor, approached his Commander, with
the determination of delivering the results of their
united judgments, with that sort of directness which
he thought the occasion now demanded. But there
was that in the steady eye and imposing mien of
Wilder, that caused him to touch on the dangerous
subject with a discretion and circumlocution that
were a little remarkable for the individual. He
stood watching the effect of the sail recently spread,
for several minutes, before he even presumed to
open his mouth. But a terrible encounter, between
the vessel and a wave that lifted its angry crest
apparently
some dozen feet above the approaching
bows, gave him courage to proceed, by admonishing
him afresh of the danger of continuing silent.
I do not see that we drop the stranger, though
the ship is wallowing through the water so heavily,
he commenced, determined to be as circumspect as
possible in his advances.
Wilder bent another of his frequent glances on
the misty object in the horizon, and then turned his
frowning eye towards the point whence the wind
proceeded, as if he would defy its heaviest blasts;
he, however, made no answer.
We have ever found the crew discontented at
the pumps, sir, resumed the other, after a pause
sufficient for the reply he in vain expected; I need
not tell an officer, who knows his duty so well, that
seamen rarely love their pumps.
Whatever I may find necessary to order, Mr
Earing, this ship's company will find it necessary to
execute.
There was a deep settled air of authority, in the
manner with which this tardy answer was given, that
did not fail of its impression. Earing recoiled a step,
with a submissive manner, and affected to be lost in
consulting the driving masses of the clouds; then,
summoning his resolution, he attempted to renew the
attack in a different quarter.
Is it your deliberate opinion, Captain Wilder,
he said, using the title to which the claim of our
adventurer
might well be questioned, with a view to
propitiate him; is it then your deliberate opinion,
that the `Royal Caroline' can, by any human means,
be made to drop yonder vessel?
I fear not, returned the young man, drawing a
breath so long, that all his secret concern seemed
struggling in his breast for utterance.
And, sir, with proper submission to your better
education and authority in this ship, I
know
not. I
have often seen these matches tried in my time; and
well do I know that nothing is gained by straining a
vessel, with the hope of getting to windward of one
of these flyers!
Take you the glass, Earing, and tell me under
what canvas the stranger holds his way, and what
may be his distance, said Wilder, thoughtfully, and
without appearing to advert at all to what the other
had just observed.
The honest and well-meaning mate deposed his
hat on the quarter-deck, and, with an air of great
respect, did as he was desired. Nor did he deem it
necessary to give a precipitate answer to either of
the interrogatories. When, however, his look had
been long, grave, and deeply absorbed, he closed the
glass with the palm of his broad hand, and replied,
with the manner of one whose opinion was
sufficiently
matured.
If yonder sail had been built and fitted like other
mortal craft, he said, I should not be backward
in pronouncing her a full-rigged ship, under three
single-reefed topsails, courses, spanker, and jib.
Has she no more?
To that I would qualify, provided an
opportunity
were given me to make sure that she is, in all
respects
,
as other vessels are.
And yet, Earing, with all this press of canvas,
by the compass we have not left her a foot.
Lord, sir, returned the mate, shaking his head,
like one who was well convinced of the folly of
such efforts, if you should split every cloth in the
main-course, by carrying on the ship you will never
alter the bearings of that craft an inch, till the sun
rises! Then, indeed, such as have eyes, that are
good enough, might perhaps see her sailing about
among the clouds; though it has never been my
fortune
,
be it bad or be it good, to fall in with one of
these cruisers after the day has fairly dawned.
And the distance? said Wilder; you have not
yet spoken of her distance.
That is much as people choose to measure. She
may be here, nigh enough to toss a biscuit into our
tops; or she may be there, where she seems to be,
hull down in the horizon.
But, if where she seems to be?
Why, she
seems
to be a vessel of about six
hundred
tons; and, judging from appearances only, a
man might be tempted to say she was a couple of
leagues, more or less, under our lee.
I put her at the same! Six miles to windward
is not a little advantage, in a hard chase. By
heavens
,
Earing, I'll drive the `Caroline' out of water,
but I'll leave him!
That might be done, if the ship had wings like
a curlew, or a sea-gull; but, as it is, I think we are
more likely to drive her under.
She bears her canvas well, so far. You know
not what the boat can do, when urged.
I have seen her sailed in all weathers, Captain
Wilder, but
His mouth was suddenly closed. A vast black
wave reared itself between the ship and the eastern
horizon, and came rolling onward, seeming to
threaten
to ingulf all before it. Even Wilder watched the
shock with breathless anxiety, conscious, for the
moment
,
that he had exceeded the bounds of sound
discretion in urging his ship so powerfully against
such a mass of water. The sea broke a few fathoms
from the bows of the Caroline, and sent its surge
in a flood of foam upon her decks. For half a
minute
,
the forward part of the vessel disappeared, as
though, unable to mount the swell, it were striving
to go through it, and then she heavily emerged,
gemmed
with a million of the scintillating insects of the
ocean. The ship had stopped, trembling in every
joint, throughout her massive and powerful frame,
like some affrighted courser; and, when she resumed
her course, it was with a moderation that appeared
to warn those who governed her movements of their
indiscretion.
Earing faced his Commander in silence, perfectly
conscious that nothing he could utter contained an
argument
like this. The seamen no longer hesitated to
mutter their disapprobation aloud, and many a
prophetic
opinion was ventured concerning the
consequences
of such reckless risks. To all this Wilder
turned a deaf or an insensible ear. Firm in his own
secret purpose, he would have braved a greater
hazard
,
to accomplish his object. But a distinct though
smothered shriek, from the stern of the vessel,
reminded
him of the fears of others. Turning quickly
on his heel, he approached the still trembling
Gertrude
and her governess, who had both been,
throughout
the whole of those long and tedious hours,
inobtrusive
,
but deeply interested, observers of his
smallest
movements.
The vessel bore that shock so well, I have great
reliance on her powers, he said in a soothing voice,
but with words that were intended to lull her into a
blind security. With a firm ship, a thorough seaman
is never at a loss!
Mr Wilder, returned the governess, I have
seen much of this terrible element on which you
live. It is therefore vain to think of deceiving me.
I know that you are urging the ship beyond what
is usual. Have you sufficient motive for this
hardihood
?
Madam,I have!
And is it, like so many of your motives, to
continue
Vol. I. Y
locked for ever in your own breast? or may
we, who are equal participators in its consequences,
claim to share equally in the reason?
Since you know so much of the profession,
returned
the young man, slightly laughing, but in tones
that were rendered perhaps more alarming by the
sounds produced in the unnatural effort, you need
not be told, that, in order to get a ship to windward,
it is necessary to spread her canvas.
You can, at least, answer one of my questions
more directly: Is this wind sufficiently favourable to
pass the dangerous shoals of the Hatteras?
I doubt it.
Then, why not go to the place whence we
came?
Will you consent to return? demanded the
youth, with the swiftness of thought.
I would go to my father, said Gertrude, with a
rapidity so nearly resembling his own, that the
ardent
girl appeared to want breath to utter the little
she said.
And I am willing, Mr Wilder, to abandon the
ship entirely, calmly resumed the governess. I
require no explanation of all your mysterious
warnings
;
restore us to our friends in Newport, and no
further questions shall ever be asked.
It might be done! muttered our adventurer;
it might be done!A few busy hours would do it,
with this wind.Mr Earing!
The mate was instantly at his elbow. Wilder
pointed to the dim object to leeward; and, handing
him the glass, desired that he would take another
view. Each looked, in his turn, long and closely.
He shows no more sail! said the Commander
impatiently, when his own prolonged gaze was
ended.
Not a cloth, sir. But what matters it, to such a
craft, how much canvas is spread, or how the wind
blows?
Earing, I think there is too much southing in
this breeze; and there is more brewing in yonder
streak of dusky clouds on our beam. Let the ship
fall off a couple of points, or more, and take the
strain off the spars, by a pull upon the weather
braces.
The simple-minded mate heard the order with an
astonishment he did not care to conceal. There
needed no explanation, to teach his experienced
faculties
,
that the effect would be to go over the same
track they had just passed, and that it was, in
substance
,
abandoning the objects of the voyage. He
presumed to defer his compliance, in order to
remonstrate
.
I hope there is no offence for an elderly seaman,
like myself, Captain Wilder, in venturing an opinion
on the weather, he said. When the pocket of
the owner is interested, my judgment approves of
going about, for I have no taste for land that the
wind blows on, instead of off. But, by easing the
ship with a reef or two, she would be jogging
seaward
;
and all we gain would be clear gain; because
it is so much off the Hatteras. Besides, who can
say that to-morrow, or the next day, we sha'n't have
a puff out of America, here at north-west?
A couple of points fall off, and a pull upon your
weather braces, said Wilder, with startling
quickness
.
It would have exceeded the peaceful and
submissive
temperament of the honest Earing, to have
delayed
any longer. The orders were given to the
inferiors
;
and, as a matter of course, they were obeyed
though ill-suppressed and portentous sounds of
discontent
,
at the undetermined, and seemingly
unreasonable
,
changes in their officer's mind, might have
been heard issuing from the mouths of Nighthead,
and other veterans of the crew.
But to all these symptoms of disaffection Wilder
remained, as before, utterly indifferent. If he heard
them at all, he either disdained to yield them any
notice, or, guided by a temporizing policy, he chose
to appear unconscious of their import. In the mean
time, the vessel, like a bird whose wing had wearied
with struggling against the tempest, and which
inclines
from the gale to dart along an easier course,
glided swiftly away, quartering the crests of the
waves, or sinking gracefully into their troughs, as
she yielded to the force of a wind that was now
made to be favourable. The sea rolled on, in a
direction
that was no longer adverse to her course; and,
as she receded from the breeze, the quantity of sail
she had spread was no longer found trying to her
powers of endurance. Still she had, in the opinion
of all her crew, quite enough canvas exposed to a
night of such a portentous aspect. But not so, in
the judgment of the stranger who was charged with
the guidance of her destinies. In a voice that still
admonished his inferiors of the danger of
disobedience
,
he commanded several broad sheets of
studding-sails
to be set, in quick succession. Urged by
these new impulses, the ship went careering over
the waves; leaving a train of foam, in her track,
that rivalled, in its volume and brightness, the
tumbling
summit of the largest swell.
When sail after sail had been set, until even
Wilder
was obliged to confess to himself that the
Royal
Caroline, staunch as she was, would bear no
more, our adventurer began to pace the deck again,
and to cast his eyes about him, in order to watch the
fruits of his new experiment. The change in the
course of the Bristol trader had made a
corresponding
change in the apparent direction of the stranger,
who yet floated in the horizon like a diminutive and
misty shadow. Still the unerring compass told the
watchful mariner, that she continued to maintain the
same relative position as when first seen. No effort,
on the part of Wilder, could apparently alter her
bearing an inch. Another hour soon passed away,
during which, as the log told him, the Caroline had
rolled through more than three leagues of water, and
still there lay the stranger in the west, as though it
were merely a lessened shadow of herself, cast by
the Caroline upon the distant and dusky clouds.
An alteration in his course exposed a broader
surface
of his canvas to the eyes of the spectators, but
in nothing else was there any visible change. If his
sails had been materially increased, the distance and
the obscurity prevented even the understanding
Earing
from detecting it. Perhaps the excited mind of
the worthy mate was too much disposed to believe
in the miraculous powers possessed by his
unaccountable
neighbour, to admit of the full exercise
of his experienced faculties on the occasion; but
even Wilder, who vexed his sight, in often-repeated
examinations, was obliged to confess to himself, that
the stranger seemed to glide, across the waste of
waters, more like a body floating in the air, than a
ship resorting to the ordinary expedients of mariners.
Mrs Wyllys and her charge had, by this time,
retired
to their cabin; the former secretly felicitating
herself on the prospect of soon quitting a vessel that
had commenced its voyage under such sinister
circumstances
as to have deranged the equilibrium of
even her well-governed and highly-disciplined mind.
Gertrude was left in ignorance of the change. To
her uninstructed eye, all appeared the same on the
wilderness of the ocean; Wilder having it in his
power to alter the direction of his vessel as often as
he pleased, without his fairer and more youthful
passenger being any the wiser for the same.
Not so, however, with the intelligent Commander
Y 2
of the Caroline himself. To him there was
neither
obscurity nor doubt, in the midst of his
midnight
path. His eye had long been familiar with
every star that rose from out the waving bed of the
sea, to set in another dark and ragged outline of the
element; nor was there a blast, that swept across
the ocean, that his burning cheek could not tell from
what quarter of the heavens it poured out its power.
He knew, and understood, each inclination made by
the bows of his ship; his mind kept even pace with
her windings and turnings, in all her trackless
wanderings
;
and he had little need to consult any of
the accessories of his art, to tell him what course to
steer, or in what manner to guide the movements of
the nice machine he governed. Still was he unable
to explain the extraordinary evolutions of the
stranger
.
His smallest change seemed rather anticipated
than followed; and his hopes of eluding a vigilance,
that proved so watchful, was baffled by a facility of
manuvring, and a superiority of sailing, that really
began to assume, even to his intelligent eyes, the
appearance of some unaccountable agency.
While our adventurer was engaged in the gloomy
musings that such impressions were not ill adapted
to excite, the heavens and the sea began to exhibit
another aspect. The bright streak which had so
long hung along the eastern horizon, as though the
curtain of the firmament had been slightly opened
to admit a passage for the winds, was now suddenly
closed; and heavy masses of black clouds began to
gather in that quarter, until vast volumes of the
vapour
were piled upon the water, blending the two
elements in one. On the other hand, the dark
canopy
lifted in the west, and a long belt of lurid light
was shed over the view. In this flood of bright and
portentous mist the stranger still floated, though there
were moments when his faint and fanciful outlines
seemed to be melting into thin air.
CHAPTER XVI.
Yet again? What do you here? Shall we give o'er, and
drown? Have you a mind to sink?
Tempest
.
Our
watchful adventurer was not blind to these
well-known and sinister omens. No sooner did the
peculiar atmosphere, by which the mysterious image
that he so often examined was suddenly surrounded,
catch his eye, than his voice was heard in the clear,
powerful, and exciting notes of warning.
Stand by, he called aloud, to in all studding
sails! Down with them! he added, scarcely
giving
his former words time to reach the ears of his
subordinates. Down with every rag of them, fore
and aft the ship! Man the top-gallant clew-lines, Mr
Earing. Clew up, and clew down! In with every
thing, cheerily, men! In!
This was a language to which the crew of the
Caroline were no strangers, and one which was
doubly welcome; since the meanest seaman of them
all had long thought that his unknown Commander
had been heedlessly trifling with the safety of the
vessel, by the hardy manner in which he
disregarded
the wild symptoms of the weather. But they
undervalued the keen-eyed vigilance of Wilder. He
had certainly driven the Bristol trader through the
water at a rate she had never been known to have
gone before; but, thus far, the facts themselves
attested
in his favour, since no injury was the
consequence
of what they deemed his temerity. At the
quick, sudden order just given, however, the whole
ship was instantly in an uproar. A dozen seamen
called to each other, from different parts of the
vessel
,
each striving to lift his voice above the roaring
ocean; and there was every appearance of a general
and inextricable confusion; but the same authority
which had aroused them, thus unexpectedly, into
activity, produced order, from their ill-directed
though vigorous efforts.
Wilder had spoken, to awaken the drowsy, and to
excite the torpid. The instant he found each man
on the alert, he resumed his orders, with a calmness
that gave a direction to the powers of all, but still
with an energy that he well knew was called for by
the occasion. The enormous sheets of duck, which
had looked like so many light clouds in the murky
and threatening heavens, were soon seen fluttering
wildly, as they descended from their high places;
and, in a few minutes, the ship was reduced to the
action of her more secure and heavier canvas. To
effect this object, every man in the ship had exerted
his powers to the utmost, under the guidance of the
steady but rapid mandates of their Commander.
Then followed a short and apprehensive breathing
pause. Every eye was turned towards the quarter
where the ominous signs had been discovered; and
each individual endeavoured to read their import,
with an intelligence correspondent to the degree of
skill he might have acquired, during his particular
period of service, on that treacherous element which
was now his home.
The dim tracery of the stranger's form had been
swallowed by the flood of misty light, which, by this
time, rolled along the sea like drifting vapour,
semipellucid
,
preternatural, and seemingly tangible. The
ocean itself appeared admonished that a quick and
violent change was nigh. The waves had ceased to
break in their former foaming and brilliant crests;
but black masses of the water were seen lifting their
surly summits against the eastern horizon, no longer
relieved by their scintillating brightness, or shedding
their own peculiar and lucid atmosphere around
them. The breeze which had been so fresh, and
which had even blown, at times, with a force that
nearly amounted to a little gale, was lulling and
becoming
uncertain, as though awed by the more
violent
power that was gathering along the borders of
the sea, in the direction of the neighbouring
continent
.
Each moment, the eastern puffs of air lost
their strength, and became more and more feeble,
until, in an incredibly short period, the heavy sails
were heard flapping against the mastsa frightful
and ominous calm succeeding. At this instant, a
glancing, flashing gleam lighted the fearful obscurity
of the ocean; and a roar, like that of a sudden burst
of thunder, bellowed along the waters. The seamen
turned their startled looks on each other, and stood
stupid, as though a warning had been given, from
the heavens themselves, of what was to follow. But
their calm and more sagacious Commander put a
different construction on the signal. His lip curled,
in high professional pride, and his mouth moved
rapidly
,
while he muttered to himself, with a species of
scorn,
Does he think we sleep? Ay, he has got it
himself
,
and would open our eyes to what is coming!
What does he imagine we have been about, since the
middle watch was set?
Then, Wilder made a swift turn or two on the
quarter-deck, never ceasing to bend his quick glances
from one quarter of the heavens to another; from
the black and lulling water on which his vessel was
rolling, to the sails; and from his silent and
profoundly
expectant crew, to the dim lines of spars that were
waving above his head, like so many pencils tracing
their curvilinear and wanton images over the murky
volumes of the superincumbent clouds.
Lay the after-yards square! he said, in a voice
which was heard by every man on deck, though his
words were apparently spoken but little above his
breath. Even the creaking of the blocks, as the
spars came slowly and heavily round to the indicated
position, contributed to the imposing character of
the moment, and sounded, in the ears of all the
instructed
listeners, like notes of fearful preparation.
Haul up the courses! resumed Wilder, after a
thoughtful, brief interval, with the same eloquent
calmness of manner. Then, taking another glance
at the threatening horizon, he added, with emphasis,
Furl themfurl them both: Away aloft, and hand
your courses, he continued, in a shout; roll them
up, cheerily; in with them, boys, cheerily; in!
The conscious seamen took their impulses from
the tones of their Commander. In a moment,
twenty
dark forms were seen leaping up the rigging, with
the alacrity of so many quadrupeds; and, in another
minute, the vast and powerful sheets of canvas were
effectually rendered harmless, by securing them in
tight rolls to their respective spars. The men
descended
as swiftly as they had mounted to the yards;
and then succeeded another short and breathing
pause. At this moment, a candle would have sent
its flame perpendicularly towards the heavens. The
ship, missing the steadying power of the wind,
rolled
heavily in the troughs of the seas, which,
however
,
began to be more diminutive, at each instant;
as though the startled element was recalling, into the
security of its own vast bosom, that portion of its
particles which had, just before, been permitted to
gambol so madly over its surface. The water
washed
sullenly along the side of the ship, or, as she
labouring
rose from one of her frequent falls into the
hollows of the waves, it shot back into the ocean
from her decks, in numberless little glittering
cascades
.
Every hue of the heavens, every sound of
the element, and each dusky and anxious countenance
that was visible, helped to proclaim the intense
interest
of the moment. It was in this brief interval
of expectation, and inactivity, that the mates again
approached their Commander.
It is an awful night, Captain Wilder! said
Earing
,
presuming on his rank to be the first of the two
to speak.
I have known far less notice given of a shift of
wind, was the steady answer.
We have had time to gather in our kites, 'tis
true, sir; but there are signs and warnings, that come
with this change, at which the oldest seaman has
reason to take heed!
Yes, continued Nighthead, in a voice that
sounded
hoarse and powerful, even amid the fearful
accessories
of that scene; yes, it is no trifling
commission
that can call people, that I shall not name, out
upon the water in such a night as this. It was in
just such weather that I saw the `Vesuvius' ketch
go to a place so deep, that her own mortar would
not have been able to have sent a bomb into the
open air, had hands and fire been there fit to let it
off!
Ay; and it was in such a time that the
Greenlandman
was cast upon the Orkneys, in as flat a calm
as ever lay on the sea.
Gentlemen, said Wilder, with a peculiar and
perhaps an ironical emphasis on the word, what is
it you would have? There is not a breath of air
stirring, and the ship is naked to her topsails!
It would have been difficult for either of the two
malcontents to have given a very satisfactory answer
to this question. Both were secretly goaded by
mysterious and superstitious apprehensions, that
were powerfully aided by the more real and
intelligible
aspect of the night; but neither had so far
forgotten
his manhood, and his professional pride, as to
lay bare the full extent of his own weakness, at a
moment when he was liable to be called upon for
the exhibition of qualities of a far more positive and
determined character. Still, the feeling that was
uppermost betrayed itself in the reply of Earing,
though in an indirect and covert manner.
Yes, the vessel is snug enough now, he said,
though eye-sight has shown us all it is no easy
matter
to drive a freighted ship though the water as fast
as one of your flying craft can go, aboard of which
no man can say, who stands at the helm, by what
compass she steers, or what is her draught!
Ay, resumed Nighthead, I call the `Caroline'
fast for an honest trader, and few square-rigged boats
are there, who do not wear the pennants of the King,
that can eat her out of the wind, or bring her into
their wake, with studding-sails abroad. But this is
a time, and an hour, to make a seaman think. Look
at yon hazy light, here, in with the land, that is
coming so fast down upon us, and then tell me
whether it comes from the coast of America, or
whether it comes from out of the stranger who has
been so long running under our lee, but who has
got, or is fast getting, the wind of us at last, and yet
none here can say how, or why. I have just this
much, and no more, to say: Give me for consort a
craft whose Captain I know, or give me none!
Such is your taste, Mr Nighthead, said Wilder,
coldly; mine may, by some accident, be very
different
.
Yes, yes, observed the more cautious and
prudent
Earing, in time of war, and with letters of
marque aboard, a man may honestly hope the sail
he sees should have a stranger for her master; or
otherwise he would never fall in with an enemy. But,
though an Englishman born myself, I should rather
give the ship in that mist a clear sea, seeing that I
neither know her nation nor her cruise. Ah,
Captain
Wilder, yonder is an awful sight for the
morning
watch! Often, and often, have I seen the sun
rise in the east, and no harm done; but little good
can come of a day when the light first breaks in the
west. Cheerfully would I give the owners the last
month's pay, hard as I have earned it with my toil,
did I but know under what flag yonder stranger
sails.
Frenchman, Don, or Devil, yonder he comes
cried Wilder. Then, turning towards the silent and
attentive crew, he shouted, in a voice that was
appalling
by its vehemence and warning, Let run
the after halyards! round with the fore-yard! round
with it, men, with a will!
These were cries that the startled crew perfectly
understood. Every nerve and muscle were exerted
to execute the orders, in time to be in readiness for
the approaching tempest. No man spoke; but each
expended the utmost of his power and skill in direct
and manly efforts. Nor was there, in verity, a
moment
to lose, or a particle of human strength
expended
here, without a sufficient object.
The lucid and fearful-looking mist, which, for the
last quarter of an hour, had been gathering in the
north-west, was now driving down upon them with
the speed of a race-horse. The air had already
lost the damp and peculiar feeling of an easterly
breeze; and little eddies were beginning to flutter
among the mastsprecursors of the coming squall.
Then, a rushing, roaring sound was heard moaning
along the ocean, whose surface was first dimpled,
next ruffled, and finally covered, with one sheet of
clear, white, and spotless foam. At the next
moment
,
the power of the wind fell full upon the inert
and labouring Bristol trader.
As the gust approached, Wilder had seized the
slight opportunity, afforded by the changeful puffs of
air, to get the ship as much as possible before the
wind; but the sluggish movement of the vessel met
neither the wishes of his own impatience nor the
exigencies
Vol. I. Z
of the moment. Her bows had slowly and
heavily fallen off from the north, leaving her
precisely
in a situation to receive the first shock on her
broadside. Happy it was, for all who had life at
risk in that defenceless vessel, that she was not fated
to receive the whole weight of the tempest at a blow.
The sails fluttered and trembled on their massive
yards, bellying and collapsing alternately for a minute,
and then the rushing wind swept over them in a
hurricane
.
The Caroline received the blast like a stout
and buoyant ship, yielding readily to its impulse,
until
her side lay nearly incumbent on the element in
which she floated; and then, as if the fearful fabric
were conscious of its jeopardy, it seemed to lift its
reclining masts again, struggling to work its way
heavily through the water.
Keep the helm a-weather! Jam it a-weather,
for your life! shouted Wilder, amid the roar of the
gust.
The veteran seaman at the wheel obeyed the
order with steadiness, but in vain he kept his eyes
riveted on the margin of his head sail, in order to
watch the manner the ship would obey its power.
Twice more, in as many moments, the tall masts fell
towards the horizon, waving as often gracefully
upward
,
and then they yielded to the mighty pressure
of the wind, until the whole machine lay prostrate
on the water.
Reflect! said Wilder, seizing the bewildered
Earing by the arm, as the latter rushed madly up
the steep of the deck; it is our duty to be calm:
Bring hither an axe.
Quick as the thought which gave the order, the
admonished mate complied, jumping into the
mizzen-channels
of the ship, to execute, with his own
hands, the mandate that he well knew must follow.
Shall I cut? he demanded, with uplifted arms,
and in a voice that atoned for his momentary
confusion
,
by its steadiness and force.
Hold! Does the ship mind her helm at all?
Not an inch, sir.
Then cut, Wilder clearly and calmly added.
A single blow sufficed for the discharge of the
momentary act. Extended to the utmost powers of
endurance, by the vast weight it upheld, the lanyard
struck by Earing no sooner parted, than each of its
fellows snapped in succession, leaving the mast
dependant
on itself alone for the support of all its
ponderous and complicated hamper. The cracking
of the wood came next; and then the rigging fell,
like a tree that had been sapped at its foundation,
the little distance that still existed between it and
the sea.
Does she fall off? instantly called Wilder to
the observant seaman at the wheel.
She yielded a little, sir; but this new squall is
bringing her up again.
Shall I cut? shouted Earing from the main
rigging
,
whither he had leaped, like a tiger who had
bounded on his prey.
Cut! was the answer.
A loud and imposing crash soon succeeded this
order, though not before several heavy blows had
been struck into the massive mast itself. As before,
the seas received the tumbling maze of spars,
rigging
,
and sails; the vessel surging, at the same
instant
,
from its recumbent position, and rolling far
and heavily to windward.
She rights! she rights! exclaimed twenty
voices, which had been hitherto mute, in a suspense
that involved life and death.
Keep her dead away! added the still calm but
deeply authoritative voice of the young
Commander
.
Stand by to furl the fore-topsaillet it hang
a moment to drag the ship clear of the wreckcut,
cutcheerily, menhatchets and knivescut
with
all, and cut
off
all!
As the men now worked with the freshened
vigour
of revived hope, the ropes that still confined the
fallen spars to the vessel were quickly severed; and
the Caroline, by this time dead before the gale,
appeared barely to touch the foam that covered the
sea, like a bird that was swift upon the wing
skimming
the waters. The wind came over the waste
in gusts that rumbled like distant thunder, and with
a power that seemed to threaten to lift the ship and
its contents from its proper element, to deliver it to
one still more variable and treacherous. As a
prudent
and sagacious seaman had let fly the halyards
of the solitary sail that remained, at the moment
when the squall approached, the loosened but
lowered
topsail was now distended in a manner that
threatened to drag after it the only mast which still
stood. Wilder instantly saw the necessity of getting
rid of this sail, and he also saw the utter
impossibility
of securing it. Calling Earing to his side, he
pointed out the danger, and gave the necessary order.
Yon spar cannot stand such shocks much longer,
he concluded; and, should it go over the bows,
some fatal blow might be given to the ship at the
rate she is moving. A man or two must be sent aloft
to cut the sail from the yards.
The stick is bending like a willow whip,
returned
the mate, and the lower mast itself is sprung.
There would be great danger in trusting a life in
that top, while such wild squalls as these are
breathing
around us.
You may be right, returned Wilder, with a
sudden conviction of the truth of what the other had
said: Stay you then here; and, if any thing befal
me, try to get the vessel into port as far north as the
Capes of Virginia, at least;on no account attempt
Hatteras, in the present condition of
What would you do, Captain Wilder?
interrupted
the mate, laying his hand powerfully on the
shoulder of his Commander, who, he observed, had
already thrown his sea-cap on the deck, and was
preparing to divest himself of some of his outer
garments
.
I go aloft, to ease the mast of that topsail,
without
which we lose the spar, and possibly the ship.
Ay, ay, I see that plain enough; but, shall it be
said, Another did the duty of Edward Earing? It
is your business to carry the vessel into the Capes
of Virginia, and mine to cut the topsail adrift. If
harm comes to me, why, put it in the log, with a
word or two about the manner in which I played my
part: That is always the best and most proper
epitaph
for a sailor.
Wilder made no resistance, but resumed his
watchful
and reflecting attitude, with the simplicity of one
who had been too long trained to the discharge of
certain obligations himself, to manifest surprise that
another should acknowledge their imperative
character
.
In the mean time, Earing proceeded steadily
to perform what he had just promised. Passing into
the waist of the ship, he provided himself with a
suitable hatchet, and then, without speaking a
syllable
to any of the mute but attentive seamen, he
sprang into the fore-rigging, every strand and
rope-yarn
of which was tightened by the strain nearly to
snapping. The understanding eyes of his observers
comprehended his intention; and, with precisely the
same pride of station as had urged him to the
dangerous
undertaking, four or five of the older
mariners
jumped upon the ratlings, to mount with him
into an air that apparently teemed with a hundred
hurricanes.
Lie down out of that fore-rigging, shouted
Wilder, through a deck-trumpet; lie down; all, but
the mate, lie down! His words were borne past
Z 2
the inattentive ears of the excited and mortified
followers
of Earing, but they failed of their effect.
Each man was too much bent on his own earnest
purpose to listen to the sounds of recall. In less
than a minute, the whole were scattered along the
yards, prepared to obey the signal of their officer.
The mate cast a look about him; and, perceiving
that the time was comparatively favourable, he struck
a blow upon the large rope that confined one of the
angles of the distended and bursting sail to the lower
yard. The effect was much the same as would be
produced by knocking away the key-stone of an
illcemented
arch. The canvas broke from all its
fastenings
with a loud explosion, and, for an instant, was
seen sailing in the air ahead of the ship, as though
sustained
on the wings of an eagle. The vessel rose on
a sluggish wavethe lingering remains of the former
breezeand then settled heavily over the rolling
surge, borne down alike by its own weight and the
renewed violence of the gusts. At this critical
instant
,
while the seamen aloft were still gazing in the
direction in which the little cloud of canvas had
disappeared, a lanyard of the lower rigging parted
with a crack that even reached the ears of Wilder.
Lie down! he shouted fearfully through his
trumpet; down by the backstays; down for your
lives; every man of you, down!
A solitary individual, of them all, profited by the
warning, and was seen gliding towards the deck with
the velocity of the wind. But rope parted after
rope, and the fatal snapping of the wood instantly
followed. For a moment, the towering maze
tottered
,
and seemed to wave towards every quarter of
the heavens; and then, yielding to the movements
of the hull, the whole fell, with a heavy crash, into
the sea. Each cord, lanyard, or stay snapped, when
it received the strain of its new position, as though
it had been made of thread, leaving the naked and
despoiled hull of the Caroline to drive onward
before the tempest, as if nothing had occurred to
impede its progress.
A mute and eloquent pause succeeded this
disaster
.
It appeared as if the elements themselves were
appeased by their work, and something like a
momentary
lull in the awful rushing of the winds might
have been fancied. Wilder sprang to the side of the
vessel, and distinctly beheld the victims, who still
clung to their frail support. He even saw Earing
waving his hand, in adieu, with a seaman's heart,
and like a man who not only felt how desperate was
his situation, but one who knew how to meet his
fate with resignation. Then the wreck of spars,
with all who clung to it, was swallowed up in the
body of the frightful, preternatural-looking mist
which extended on every side of them, from the
ocean to the clouds.
Stand by, to clear away a boat! shouted
Wilder, without pausing to think of the impossibility
of one's swimming, or of effecting the least good, in
so violent a tornado.
But the amazed and confounded seamen who
remained
needed not instruction in this matter. No
man moved, nor was the smallest symptom of
obedience
given. The mariners looked wildly around
them, each endeavouring to trace, in the dusky
countenance
of the other, his opinion of the extent of
the evil; but not a mouth was opened among them all.
It is too lateit is too late! murmured Wilder
to himself; human skill and human efforts could
not save them!
Sail, ho! Nighthead muttered at his elbow, in
a voice that teemed with a species of superstitious
awe.
Let him come on, returned his young
Commander
,
bitterly; the mischief is ready finished
to his hands!
`Should yon be a mortal ship, it is our duty to
the owners and the passengers to speak her, if a
man can make his voice heard in this tempest, the
second mate continued, pointing, through the haze,
at the dim object that was certainly at hand.
Speak her!passengers! muttered Wilder,
involuntarily
repeating his words. No; any thing is
better than speaking her. Do you see the vessel
that is driving down upon us so fast? he sternly
demanded
of the watchful seaman who still clung to
the wheel of the Caroline.
Ay, ay, sir, was the brief, professional reply.
Give her a birthsheer away hard to port
perhaps he may pass us in the gloom, now we are
no higher than our decks. Give the ship a broad
sheer, I say, sir.
The same laconic answer as before was given;
and, for a few moments, the Bristol trader was seen
diverging a little from the line in which the other
approached
;
but a second glance assured Wilder that
the attempt was useless. The strange ship (and
every man on board felt certain it was the same that
had so long been seen hanging in the north-western
horizon) came on, through the mist, with a swiftness
that nearly equalled the velocity of the tempestuous
winds themselves. Not a thread of canvas was seen
on board her. Each line of spars, even to the
tapering
and delicate top-gallant-masts, was in its place,
preserving the beauty and symmetry of the whole
fabric; but nowhere was the smallest fragment of a
sail opened to the gale. Under her bows rolled a
volume of foam, that was even discernible amid the
universal agitation of the ocean; and, as she came
within sound, the sullen roar of the water might
have been likened to the noise of a cascade. At
first, the spectators on the decks of the Caroline
believed they were not seen, and some of the men
called madly for lights, in order that the disasters of
the night might not terminate in the dreaded
encounter
.
No! exclaimed Wilder; too many see us
there already!
No, no, muttered Nighthead; no fear but we
are seen; and by such eyes, too, as never yet
looked
out of mortal head!
The seamen paused. In another instant, the
long-seen
and mysterious ship was within a hundred feet
of them. The very power of that wind, which was
wont usually to raise the billows, now pressed the
element, with the weight of mountains, into its bed.
The sea was every where a sheet of froth, but no
water swelled above the level of the surface. The
instant a wave lifted itself from the security of the
vast depths, the fluid was borne away before the
tornado in driving, glittering spray. Along this frothy
but comparatively motionless surface, then, the
stranger
came booming, with the steadiness and grandeur
with which a dark cloud is seen to sail before the
hurricane. No sign of life was any where
discovered
about her. If men looked out, from their secret
places, upon the straitened and discomfited wreck
of the Bristol trader, it was covertly, and as darkly
as the tempest before which they drove. Wilder
held his breath, for the moment the stranger drew
nighest, in the very excess of suspense; but, as he
saw no signal of recognition, no human form, nor
any intention to arrest, if possible, the furious career
of the other, a smile of exultation gleamed across
his countenance, and his lips moved rapidly, as
though he found pleasure in being abandoned to his
distress. The stranger drove by, like a dark vision;
and, ere another minute, her form was beginning to
grow less distinct, in a thickening body of the spray
to leeward.
She is going out of sight in the mist! exclaimed
Wilder, when he drew his breath, after the fearful
suspense of the few last moments.
Ay, in mist, or clouds, responded Nighthead,
who now kept obstinately at his elbow, watching,
with the most jealous distrust, the smallest
movement
of his unknown Commander.
In the heavens, or in the sea, I care not,
provided
she be gone.
Most seamen would rejoice to see a strange sail,
from the hull of a vessel shaved to the deck like
this.
Men often court their destruction, from
ignorance
of their own interests. Let him drive on,
say I, and pray I! He goes four feet to our one;
and now I ask no better favour than that this
hurricane
may blow until the sun shall rise.
Nighthead started, and cast an oblique glance,
which resembled denunciation, at his companion.
To his blunted faculties, and superstitious mind,
there was profanity in thus invoking the tempest, at
a moment when the winds seemed already to be
pouring out their utmost wrath.
This is a heavy squall, I will allow, he said,
and such an one as many mariners pass whole lives
without seeing; but he knows little of the sea who
thinks there is not more wind where this comes
from.
Let it blow! cried the other, striking his hands
together a little wildly; I pray only for wind!
All the doubts of Nighthead, as to the character
of the young stranger who had so unaccountably got
possession of the office of Nicholas Nichols, if,
indeed
,
any remained, were now removed. He
walked
forward among the silent and thoughtful crew,
with the air of a man whose opinion was settled.
Wilder, however, paid no attention to the
movements
of his subordinate, but continued pacing the
deck for hours; now casting his eyes at the heavens,
or now sending frequent and anxious glances around
the limited horizon, while the Royal Caroline
still continued drifting before the wind, a shorn and
naked wreck.
END OF VOLUME I.An accident has disabled the Master of the out
ward-bound ship called the `Royal Caroline!' Her
consignee is reluctant to intrust her to the officer
next in rank; but sail she must. I find she has
credit for her speed. If you have any credentials
of
character
and
competency
, profit by the occasion,
and earn the station you are finally destined to fill.
You have been named to some who are interested,
and you have been sought diligently. If this reach
you in season, be on the alert, and be decided.
Show no surprise at any co-operation you may un
expectedly meet. My agents are more numerous
than you had believed. The reason is obvious;
gold is yellow, though I am
Red
.